status,title,company,location,date,blurb,tags,link,id,provider,query
new,Assistant Professor - Archaeology of Eastern North America,University of Toronto,"Toronto, ON",2020-01-11,"The Department of Anthropology in the University of Toronto Mississauga (UTM) invites applications for a full-time tenure stream position in anthropological archaeology with a focus on Eastern North America. The appointment will be at the rank of Assistant Professor, and will commence on July 1, 2020, or shortly thereafter.

Applicants must have earned a PhD in Anthropological Archaeology by the date of appointment, or shortly thereafter, with a demonstrated record of excellence in research and teaching. We seek a scholar with an innovative research program in the archaeology of Eastern North America with an ongoing field program, who is theoretically and substantively engaged in research that complements or strengthens interests of current faculty, particularly in areas such as material culture, environmental archaeology, public archaeology, and/or archaeology of descendant communities. Please visit our home page: Department of Anthropology at UTM, https://www.utm.utoronto.ca/anthropology. We seek scholars who are able to integrate Indigenous knowledge/Indigenous ways of knowing and Indigenous methodologies, as well as research and teaching methods, into the classroom.

Candidates must provide strong evidence of research excellence of an internationally competitive calibre, as evidenced by the submitted research statement, a record of contributions or publications in leading journals in the field or forthcoming publications meeting high international levels, presentations at significant conferences, accolades or awards, and strong endorsements by referees of high standing. Candidates must demonstrate research and professional work that engages with collaborative/collective knowledge building with Indigenous communities. Evidence of excellence in teaching is required and is demonstrated by a teaching dossier that includes a strong statement of teaching philosophy, teaching accomplishments, sample course syllabi, and teaching evaluations, as well as strong endorsements from referees. We seek candidates whose teaching demonstrates an engagement with Indigenous knowledges, epistemologies, and methodologies.

This position is part of the University of Torontos response to the calls to action in Canadas Truth and Reconciliation Commission (TRC) Report. Preference will be given to candidates who self-identify as Indigenous. Recognizing that there are a variety of terms that potential candidates may use to self-identify, the University uses the term Indigenous in this search to encompass the people of Turtle Island, including those who identify as First Nations, Mtis, Inuk (Inuit), Alaska Native, Native American, and Native Hawaiian people.

 The University of Toronto Mississauga has an interdisciplinary commitment, a multicultural student body, and a modern and spacious campus. The successful applicant will be expected to develop and maintain an active, outstanding, innovative, independent and externally funded program of research, to pursue excellence in teaching in the UTM Anthropology undergraduate program (http://www.utm.utoronto.ca/anthropology/), and to participate actively in the tri-campus University of Toronto Anthropology Graduate Program (http://www.anthropology.utoronto.ca/graduate/).


The successful candidate may be nominated for a Tier 2 Canada Research Chair. For information regarding eligibility criteria, please consult the CRC website: https://www.chairs-chaires.gc.ca/program-programme/index-eng.aspx.
Tier 2 Chairs are intended for exceptional emerging scholars. Nominees should be within ten years of receiving their PhD. Applicants who are more than 10 years from having earned their highest degree (and where career breaks exist, such as maternity, parental or extended sick leave, clinical training, etc.) may have their eligibility for a Tier 2 chair assessed through the programs Tier 2 justification process.


For further information on these federally endowed chairs, open to all nationalities, including eligibility criteria, please consult the Canada Research Chairs website. For more information about the CRC nomination process at the University of Toronto, contact Judith Chadwick, Assistant Vice-President, Research Services - crc@utoronto.ca.
Salary to be commensurate with qualifications and experience.

All qualified candidates are invited to apply online by clicking the link below. Applicants must submit a cover letter; a current curriculum vitae; a research statement outlining current and future research interests; up to three sample publications; and a teaching dossier to include a teaching statement, sample course syllabi, and teaching evaluations.

Applicants must also arrange to have three letters of reference sent directly by the referee via email (on letterhead, signed and dated) to secretary.utmanthro@utoronto.ca, addressed to Professor Esteban Parra, Chair of the Department of Anthropology, and with the Subject line Anthropological Archaeology Hire. In addition to their reference letters, candidates should include one or more letters of support from Indigenous elders, leaders, or organisations describing their collaborative work or involvement with Indigenous communities.

We ask that candidates combine requested documents into one or two files in PDF/MS Word files in the following format:
Letter, CV, research statement and teaching dossier, titled: 1904871-YourSurnameFirstname application.pdf (or .doc)
Publications can be a separate document if too large to bundle with the above; if a separate document, please title as: 1904871-YourSurnameFirstname publications.pdf (or .doc). Documents too large to be submitted to the online system will not be accepted (8.3MB max file size).
Submission guidelines can be found at http://uoft.me/how-to-apply. We recommend combining attached documents into one or two files in PDF/MS Word format.

If you have questions about this position or the program, please contact Professor Esteban Parra at anthrochair.utm@utoronto.ca.

All application materials, including reference letters, must be received by the closing date of February 18, 2020.

The University recognizes that scholars have varying career paths and that career interruptions due to personal circumstances can be part of an excellent academic record. Search committee members have been instructed to give careful consideration to, and be sensitive to the impact of, career interruptions in their assessments.

The University of Toronto is strongly committed to diversity within its community and especially welcomes applications from racialized persons/persons of colour, women, Indigenous/Aboriginal People of North America, persons with disabilities, LGBTQ persons, and others who may contribute to the further diversification of ideas.

The University is committed to the principles of the Accessibility for Ontarians with Disabilities Act (AODA). As such, we strive to make our recruitment, assessment, and selection processes as accessible as possible, and provide accommodations as required for applicants with disabilities. If you require any accommodations at any point during the application process, please contact uoft.careers@utoronto.ca. In addition, the office of Health & Wellbeing Programs and Services assists with providing accommodation to persons with disabilities in the workplace.

The Canada Research Chairs Program requires institutions to collect self-identification data from all applicants, following the programs best practices. This data is important to the Universitys ability to ensure that researchers from diverse groups are able to benefit from participation in the program. As part of your application, you will be required to submit a brief Diversity Survey, accessed via the online application system. Applicants are encouraged to self-identify in any of the groups where applicable. While completion of the survey is required, providing answers to the individual survey questions is voluntary, and applicants can log a response indicating that they decline the survey. For more information, please see http://UofT.me/UP .
Any information directly related to you is confidential and cannot be accessed by search committees or human resources staff. Aggregated and anonymized data regarding the applicant pool will be reported only to the chair of the selection committee, the committees equity advisor, and a small number of staff members in the Division of the Vice-President, Research and Innovation, for purposes of program administration and to meet reporting requirements.

All qualified candidates are encouraged to apply; however, Canadians and permanent residents will be given priority.",,https://ca.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=6d680ebdc0720123,6d680ebdc0720123,indeed,University of Toronto
new,Assistant Professor - Sustainable Water Processing for the R...,University of Toronto,"Toronto, ON",2020-01-11,"The Department of Chemical Engineering and Applied Chemistry invites applications for a tenure stream appointment in advanced approaches and technologies for water treatment (recovery-purification-recycle) and management for the natural resource sector. We have a specific interest in applications relating to the mining, metals, environmental, or oil and gas industries. The appointment will be at the rank of Assistant Professor with an expected start date of July 1, 2020, or shortly thereafter.

Applicants are expected to have a PhD in chemical, civil, environmental, metallurgical, materials or mechanical engineering, applied chemistry or related field at the time of appointment or soon after. Postdoctoral or industrial experience is an asset. The successful candidate will have demonstrated excellence in research and teaching, as well as innovation in research and teaching. Experience or a demonstrated strong interest in water and sustainability issues in the resource industry would be an asset.

Candidates must have research experience in at least two of the areas below. Any practical experience would be an asset.
Remediation and recovery of metals from extractive industry process water
Novel membrane processes for treatment or purification of industrial water and/or effluent streams including desalination by reverse, forward, pressure retarded osmosis and variants
Biological processes for process-affected water purification
Integration of advanced materials chemistry or nanomaterials in process water purification or treatment
Electrocatalytic, electrochemical, solar, or light mediated processes for process water treatment including electrodialysis
Aqueous chemistry of process-affected water
Advanced analytical tools and sensors for process-affected waters
Life cycle assessment of process water related systems
Water in the circular economy
Smart use of water and reducing the water footprint
Machine learning and artificial intelligence applications related to process water recovery, purification or treatment
Areas of application for candidates research may include, but are not limited to, acid mine drainage, environmental discharges to surface or underground waters, water usage in extractive metallurgy, industrial water reuse and recycling, urban resource recovery, mining and oil sands process affected water, or tailings management.

The candidates expertise will be expected to complement our existing strengths in the Institute for Water Innovation (IWI), the Pulp and Paper Centre, BioZone, the Institute for Sustainable Energy (ISE), and the Centre for Analytics and Artificial Intelligence Engineering (CARTE) among many other centres at the University of Toronto (see below for details). A track record and interest in collaboration across multiple disciplines (e.g., engineering, physical and environmental sciences, computer science and social sciences) is a key element of the position.

The successful candidate will be expected to initiate and lead an outstanding, independent, innovative, externally funded research program of international calibre, and teach in the chemical engineering curriculum at the undergraduate and post-graduate level. Collaborative and inter-disciplinary research and collegial interaction will be important elements in success. Eligibility to register as a Professional Engineer in Ontario is a desirable qualification.

Excellence in research is evidenced primarily by publications or forthcoming publications in leading journals or conferences, the submitted research statement, presentations at significant conferences, awards and accolades, and strong endorsements by referees of high standing.

Evidence of excellence in teaching will be demonstrated by the statement of teaching philosophy, teaching accomplishments, and a teaching dossier including sample syllabi and teaching evaluations or other evidence of superior performance in teaching-related activities, as well as strong endorsements. Other teaching related activities can include performance as a teaching assistant or course instructor, experience leading successful workshops or seminars, student mentorship, or excellent conference presentations or posters.

The Department of Chemical Engineering and Applied Chemistry at the University of Toronto is committed to its vision statement Through leading edge research and innovation, we integrate chemistry, biology and engineering to drive solutions to global challenges in energy, the environment and health. The Department of Chemical Engineering and Applied Chemistry as well as the Faculty of Applied Science and Engineering of the University of Toronto has had a long history of strength in environmental and process engineering, as well as extractive metallurgy and mining. Our intent is to enhance our strength in modern and future process water treatment and recovery technologies.

Salary will be commensurate with qualifications and experience.

All qualified applicants are invited to apply online by clicking on the link below. Please include the following materials: a cover letter; a curriculum vitae; a statement of research vision with a five to ten year horizon (three to five pages); up to three sample publications; as well as, a teaching dossier including a statement of teaching philosophy and interests, and if available sample course syllabi, teaching evaluations, or evidence of superior performance in other teaching-related activities as listed above. If you have any questions about this position, please contact chair.chemeng@utoronto.ca. All application materials must be submitted online. Please combine attachments into one file in PDF or Word formats. Submission guidelines can be found at http://uoft.me/how-to-apply. Applicants should also arrange for three letters of reference (signed and on letterhead) to be sent directly by the referees to facultysearch.chemeng@utoronto.ca by February 18, 2020.

More information on the Department of Chemical Engineering & Applied Chemistrys academic plan is available at: https://chem-eng.utoronto.ca/wp-content/uploads/2018/04/2015ChemE_SS_pg9-10_insert-.pdf. For more information on the Department, please visit www.chem-eng.utoronto.ca.

The University of Toronto is strongly committed to diversity within its community and especially welcomes applications from racialized persons / persons of colour, women, Indigenous / Aboriginal People of North America, persons with disabilities, LGBTQ persons, and others who may contribute to the further diversification of ideas.

As part of your application, you will be asked to complete a brief Diversity Survey. This survey is voluntary. Any information directly related to you is confidential and cannot be accessed by search committees or human resources staff. Results will be aggregated for institutional planning purposes. For more information, please see http://uoft.me/UP.

All qualified candidates are encouraged to apply; however, Canadians and permanent residents will be given priority.",,https://ca.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=6c4d0a3ab341a171,6c4d0a3ab341a171,indeed,University of Toronto
new,"Assistant Professor, Teaching Stream - Dental Anaesthesia",University of Toronto,"Toronto, ON",2020-01-11,"The Faculty of Dentistry, University of Toronto, invites applications for a full-time teaching stream position in Dental Anaesthesia. The appointment will be at the rank of Assistant Professor, Teaching Stream and will begin on July 1, 2020 or shortly thereafter.

The applicant must have a DDS/DMD/BDS degree, as well as a PhD degree in a field related to anaesthesia or an EdD, at the time of appointment. The candidate must have successfully completed advanced training in Dental Anaesthesia in a program whose accreditation has been accepted by the Royal College of Dental Surgeons of Ontario or the Commission on Dental Accreditation in the United States. Applicants must have at least one year of appropriate clinical experience in Dental Anaesthesia and be eligible for or have obtained a specialist certificate of registration in Ontario in Dental Anaesthesia.

We seek enthusiastic and innovative individuals with a demonstrated record of teaching excellence, as well as a demonstrated ability to enhance the domestic and international reputation of our programs and significantly add to the quality of the student experience. Additionally, candidates must possess a demonstrated commitment to excellent pedagogical practice and a demonstrated interest in teaching-related scholarly activities.

Evidence of teaching excellence and pedagogical inquiry can be demonstrated through teaching accomplishments, awards and accolades, presentations at significant conferences, the teaching dossier submitted as part of the application including a strong teaching statement, sample syllabi, course materials, and teaching evaluations, as well as strong letters of reference from referees of high standing. Candidates must possess a demonstrated ability to teach at both the undergraduate and graduate program levels as evidenced in the materials submitted for review as part of the application. Interest in the field of educational research is an asset.

The candidate is expected to teach at the didactic and clinical levels in both undergraduate and graduate programs in Dental Anaesthesia at the Faculty of Dentistry, as well as supervise graduate student research. In addition, the candidate must demonstrate the ability to develop and direct the graduate specialty program in Dental Anaesthesia.

Salary will be commensurate with qualifications and experience.

All qualified candidates are invited to apply by clicking on the link below. Applications must include a cover letter, detailed curriculum vitae, and a teaching dossier (to include a teaching statement, sample syllabi, course materials, and teaching evaluations). If you have questions about this position, please contact the Office of Dean, Faculty of Dentistry at dean@dentistry.utoronto.ca or 416-864-8300. All application materials must be submitted online.

Submission guidelines can be found at http://uoft.me/how-to-apply. We recommend combining documents into one or two files in PDF/MS Word format.


To be considered for the position, applicants must also arrange for at least three letters of reference, with at least one primarily addressing the candidates teaching, to be sent directly to Dean Daniel Haas via e-mail to dean@dentistry.utoronto.ca by the closing date.

All application materials, including reference letters, must be received by February 17, 2020.

For more information on the Faculty of Dentistry, please visit our website at www.dentistry.utoronto.ca.

The University of Toronto is strongly committed to diversity within its community and especially welcomes applications from racialized persons / persons of colour, women, Indigenous / Aboriginal People of North America, persons with disabilities, LGBTQ persons, and others who may contribute to the further diversification of ideas.

As part of your application, you will be asked to complete a brief Diversity Survey. This survey is voluntary. Any information directly related to you is confidential and cannot be accessed by search committees or human resources staff. Results will be aggregated for institutional planning purposes. For more information, please see http://uoft.me/UP.

All qualified candidates are encouraged to apply; however, Canadians and permanent residents will be given priority.",,https://ca.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=f15f249de9f60299,f15f249de9f60299,indeed,University of Toronto
new,Assistant Professor - Contractually Limited Term (Professori...,University of Toronto,"Toronto, ON",2020-01-23,"The Department of Economics in the Faculty of Arts & Science at the University of Toronto, St. George Campus, invites applications for a two-year contractually limited term appointment in the area of Applied Economics. The appointment will be at the rank of Assistant Professor and will commence on July 1, 2020, or shortly thereafter.

Applicants must have earned a PhD in Economics or related area by the time of appointment, or shortly thereafter, with a demonstrated record of excellence in research and teaching in Applied Economics. We seek candidates whose research and teaching interests complement our existing departmental strengths. The successful candidate must present clear evidence of an excellent teaching record and have the demonstrated capacity to adeptly teach our large-enrollment introductory and/or intermediate courses at the undergraduate level and possess excellent expository, organizational, and interpersonal skills.

Candidates must provide evidence of excellence in research, demonstrated by an innovative job market paper with a significant contribution to the literature and strong recommendations by referees of high standing. Further support can be provided by high quality working papers, publications in prominent journals or forthcoming publications, presentations at significant conferences, accolades, or awards.

Evidence of excellence in teaching can be demonstrated through teaching accomplishments, strong letters of references, a statement of teaching philosophy, teaching evaluations and sample syllabi, or other evidence of superior performance in teaching-related activities submitted as part of the application. Other teaching-related activities can include performance as a teaching assistant or course instructor, experience leading successful workshops or seminars, student mentorship, as well as excellent conference presentations or posters.

Salary will be commensurate with qualifications and experience.

Applications must be submitted online at https://econjobmarket.org/ .A complete application will include a curriculum vita, a job market paper, up to three working papers or publications, a teaching dossier (to include a statement of teaching philosophy, sample syllabi, and teaching evaluations or evidence of superior performance in other teaching-related activities as listed above, and three letters of reference (on letterhead and signed) to be uploaded directly by referees.
All applications materials, including reference letters, must be received online by March 16, 2020, 11:59pm EST. Please note that paper applications will not be accepted. If you have questions about this position please contact Professor Gustavo Bobonis at recruiting@economics.utoronto.ca.
For more information about the Department of Economics at the University of Toronto St. George campus please visit our home page at http://www.economics.utoronto.ca.
The University of Toronto is strongly committed to diversity within its community and especially welcomes applications from racialized persons / persons of colour, women, indigenous / Aboriginal People of North America, persons with disabilities, LGBTQ persons, and others who may contribute to the further diversification of ideas.
All qualified candidates are encouraged to apply; however Canadians and permanent residents will be given priority.",,https://ca.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=4f2a9004b5fc6fa7,4f2a9004b5fc6fa7,indeed,University of Toronto
new,Associate Professor / Professor - Choral Studies - Elmer Ise...,University of Toronto,"Toronto, ON",2020-01-11,"The Faculty of Music, University of Toronto invites applications for a full-time tenure stream position in the area of choral studies and choral conducting. The appointment will be at the rank of Associate Professor or Professor with an anticipated start date of January 1, 2021. The start date is negotiable. The successful candidate will be eligible to hold the endowed Elmer Iseler Chair in Conducting.

A doctoral degree in music, or a university degree in music with extensive exceptional professional experience is required. Applicants must have extensive experience in choral studies and choral conducting with a demonstrated record of excellence in teaching and a superior professional conducting profile.

Excellence in creative professional activities and research is required, evidenced by a track record of performances for major venues, organizations, and festivals, collaborations with established artists and ensembles, public presence through broadcasts, recordings, and digital media platforms, recognition through critical reception, academic and professional publications, and arts grant support. The successful candidate will also have demonstrated commitment to choral education in a wide range of styles and repertoire and an excellent track record in conducting education as demonstrated by the teaching dossier including a teaching statement, sample course materials, and teaching evaluations submitted as part of the application, as well as strong letters of reference.

Salary and rank will be commensurate with qualifications and experience.


Duties will include some combination of conducting one or more of the university choral ensembles and overseeing all Faculty of Music choral activities; teaching undergraduate and graduate music courses in choral music and conducting, which includes individual conducting lessons; research supervision and mentoring of conducting students at the masters and doctoral levels; and leadership in community choral engagement and collaborations.


The Faculty of Music is a division of the University of Toronto, Canadas largest university. Located in the heart of one of North Americas most diverse and culturally vibrant cities, the Faculty of Music plays a vital part in Torontos active musical life and offers degrees in composition, music education, music and health sciences, music technology and digital media, musicology/ethnomusicology/music theory, and performance, including jazz and opera. There are approximately 900 students, 570 undergraduate and 330 graduate students. The Choral Area currently includes four choirs involving approximately 200 music majors.

All qualified candidates are invited to apply by clicking on the link below. Applications must include a cover letter, a complete and current curriculum vitae, a teaching dossier (including a statement of teaching philosophy, sample course materials, and teaching evaluations), a statement outlining current and future research interests, and links to samples of your work including rehearsal and concert videos. All application materials must be submitted online.

Submission guidelines can be found at http://uoft.me/how-to-apply . We recommend combining attached documents into two or three files in PDF/MS Word format. Links to media files should be provided on a separate list. If you have any questions about this position please contact Prof. Don McLean at dean.music@utoronto.ca.

Applicants must also arrange to have three letters of reference, printed on letterhead, signed, and sent directly to the search committee: Prof. Don McLean, Search Committee Chair and Dean, Faculty of Music, at dean.music@utoronto.ca by the closing date of March 16, 2020.

Review of applications will begin on March 16, 2020. Applicants should endeavor to have all materials, including reference letters, submitted by then; however applications will be accepted until the position is filled.

For more information about the Faculty of Music, please visit our home page at http://www.music.utoronto.ca.

The University of Toronto is strongly committed to diversity within its community and especially welcomes applications from racialized persons / persons of colour, women, Indigenous / Aboriginal People of North America, persons with disabilities, LGBTQ persons, and others who may contribute to the further diversification of ideas.

As part of your application, you will be asked to complete a brief Diversity Survey. This survey is voluntary. Any information directly related to you is confidential and cannot be accessed by search committees or human resources staff. Results will be aggregated for institutional planning purposes. For more information, please see http://uoft.me/UP .

All qualified candidates are encouraged to apply; however, Canadians and permanent residents will be given priority.",,https://ca.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=b6031c11bd578c0a,b6031c11bd578c0a,indeed,University of Toronto
new,Assistant Professor - Occupational Science & Occupational Th...,University of Toronto,"Toronto, ON",2020-01-11,"The Department of Occupational Science and Occupational Therapy in the Faculty of Medicine at the University of Toronto invites applications for one full-time tenure stream appointment in the area of musculoskeletal conditions. The appointment will be at the rank of Assistant Professor. The expected start date is July 1, 2020 or shortly thereafter.

We are seeking candidates with scholarship in occupational science or occupational therapy focused on musculoskeletal conditions affecting populations across the lifespan. Scholarly work focusing on enabling occupational engagement and inclusion of people at risk for, or living with, musculoskeletal conditions is required. We seek candidates whose research and teaching interests complement and strengthen our existing departmental strengths. The successful candidates scholarship will situate occupation as a key determinant of health and well-being across their program of research and creative professional activities.

Applicants must have a PhD in occupational science, occupational therapy, rehabilitation science or a related field at the time of appointment, be occupational therapists eligible to practice in Ontario (i.e., registered/eligible to register with the College of Occupational Therapists of Ontario), will have completed a post-doctoral fellowship or equivalent (such as a scientist role at a university or research institute) for a minimum of one year, and will have demonstrated excellence in research and innovative scholarship, and a demonstrated commitment to excellence in teaching. The successful candidate will be expected to pursue an innovative and independent research program at the highest international level and to establish an outstanding, competitive, and externally funded research program.

Excellence in research will be demonstrated through a record of publications in leading international and discipline-related refereed journals as first and senior responsible author; competitive, national grants as principal investigator; the current and projected program of research; invited presentations at significant conferences; and strong endorsements by referees of high standing. A commitment to excellence in teaching will be demonstrated through teaching accomplishments in an entry-level Master of Occupational Therapy program; the teaching dossier, including a strong teaching statement, sample syllabi or other teaching materials, teaching evaluations; and strong letters of reference.

Salary will be commensurate with qualifications and experience.

The University of Toronto provides the opportunity to teach, conduct research and live in one of the most culturally diverse cities in the world. The University is affiliated with nine fully affiliated hospitals and research institutes and 25 affiliated community hospitals and health care sites and institutions and enjoys partnerships with many cognate departments and community organizations. For more information about the Department of Occupational Science and Occupational Therapy, please visit our website.


All qualified persons are invited to apply by clicking on the link below. Applications must include a cover letter; a current curriculum vitae; a research statement outlining current and future research interests; one recent article-length publication; and a teaching dossier, including a statement of teaching philosophy, sample course syllabi or other teaching materials, and teaching evaluations. All application materials must be submitted online.

Applicants must arrange to have three letters of reference sent directly by the referee via email (on letterhead and signed) to ot.chair@utoronto.ca by the closing date.

Submission guidelines can be found at: http://uoft.me/how-to-apply. We recommend combining attached documents into one or two files in PDF/MS Word format. If you have questions about this position, please contact ot.chair@utoronto.ca.


All application materials, including reference letters, must be received by February 18, 2020.

The University of Toronto is strongly committed to equity and diversity within its community and especially welcomes applications from racialized persons / persons of colour, Indigenous Peoples of North America, persons with disabilities, LGBTQ persons, and others who may contribute to the further diversification of ideas.

As part of your application, you will be asked to complete a brief Diversity Survey. This survey is voluntary. Any information directly related to you is confidential and cannot be accessed by search committees or human resources staff. Results will be aggregated for institutional planning purposes. For more information, please see http://uoft.me/UP.

All qualified persons are encouraged to apply; however, Canadians and permanent residents will be given priority.",,https://ca.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=a2744a60e5bae7b9,a2744a60e5bae7b9,indeed,University of Toronto
new,"Assistant Professor - Teaching Stream - Design, Safety and F...",University of Toronto,"Toronto, ON",2020-01-11,"The Department of Chemical Engineering and Applied Chemistry at the University of Toronto invites applications for a teaching stream appointment in the area of Design, Safety and Fundamentals in Chemical Engineering at the rank of Assistant Professor, Teaching Stream. The expected start date is July 1, 2020.

All applicants must have a Ph.D. in chemical engineering or a related discipline at the time of appointment or soon after. Additionally, the appointee is expected to have significant experience (e.g. at least 5 years) in chemical engineering practice. Experience in industry as a practicing chemical engineer is a significant asset. The appointee must be registered as a Professional Engineer in Canada by the time they start the position or soon after.
Candidates are expected to demonstrate a commitment to teaching excellence, which will include developing and delivering core aspects of our curriculum including chemical engineering design, safety and fundamentals. The candidate will deliver these key components within undergraduate core courses and technical electives and also may have the opportunity to teach graduate courses. We seek candidates whose teaching interests complement and strengthen our existing department strengths. We also expect that the successful candidate will be actively engaged in pedagogy and lead positive change in our educational programs that facilitate the evolution of the chemical engineering discipline in Canada and around the world. As part of that, the successful candidate will be expected to actively participate in and strengthen the Canadian chemical engineering community in industry, postsecondary education and government.

The successful candidate will need to: demonstrate excellence in teaching and pedagogy; have a strong background in chemical engineering theory and practice; and have excellent organizational and communication skills. Evidence of excellence in teaching, strong background knowledge and practice and pedagogy will be demonstrated through teaching accomplishments, engineering accomplishments, awards & accolades, strong letters of reference from referees of high standing, and the teaching dossier submitted as part of the application to include a teaching statement, teaching evaluations, and course materials.

Salary will be commensurate with qualifications and experience.

The Department of Chemical Engineering and Applied Chemistry consistently ranks among the top in Canada and attracts outstanding undergraduate and graduate students, has excellent facilities, and is ideally located in the middle of a vibrant cosmopolitan and multicultural city, the City of Toronto. More information on the Department of Chemical Engineering & Applied Chemistrys academic plan is available at: https://chem-eng.utoronto.ca/wp-content/uploads/2018/04/2015ChemE_SS_pg9-10_insert-.pdf. For more information on the Department, please visit www.chem-eng.utoronto.ca.

All qualified candidates are invited to apply by clicking on the link below. For further information about the application process, please see the submission guidelines at http://uoft.me/how-to-apply.

Applicants must provide a curriculum vitae, a cover letter, and a teaching dossier (including a statement of teaching philosophy and interests, course materials, and teaching evaluations). Applicants must arrange to have three letters of reference (on letterhead, signed and scanned) sent directly to Professor D. Grant Allen via email at facultysearch.chemeng@utoronto.ca.

All application materials, including reference letters, should be received by March 2 , 2020.


The University of Toronto is strongly committed to diversity within its community and especially welcomes applications from racialized persons / persons of colour, women, Indigenous / Aboriginal People of North America, persons with disabilities, LGBTQ persons, and others who may contribute to the further diversification of ideas.

As part of your application, you will be asked to complete a brief Diversity Survey. This survey is voluntary. Any information directly related to you is confidential and cannot be accessed by search committees or human resources staff. Results will be aggregated for institutional planning purposes. For more information, please see http://uoft.me/UP.

All qualified candidates are encouraged to apply; however, Canadians and permanent residents will be given priority.",,https://ca.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=4573f8bc8110fe9e,4573f8bc8110fe9e,indeed,University of Toronto
new,Motion Graphics Designer (Creative Design - Motion - Animati...,University of Toronto,"Toronto, ON",2020-01-17,"The University of Toronto is hiring for a Motion Graphics Designer position at our Scarborough Campus! Please note this is a short-term temporary position.About usAn anchor institution in the eastern GTA, U of T Scarborough combines the intimacy of a close-knit campus, the breadth of the liberal arts and the depth and rigor of one of the worlds best research universities. Fostering a vibrant culture of community engagement, U of T Scarborough students cross academic as well as geographic boundaries in their pursuit of knowledge.The dynamic campus life features more than 150 student groups. Located next to popular natural landmarks in Torontos greenest area, U of T Scarborough is situated in one of Torontos most diverse and multicultural neighbourhoods. New buildings by award-winning architects characterize U of T Scarborough's transformational growth. The Toronto Pan Am Sports Centrea world-class fitness and training centrerepresents Canadas largest investment in amateur sport infrastructure, opened to U of T Scarborough students and the community in September 2014, and hosted events for the 2015 Pan Am Parapan American Games.The Position: Design 2D vector graphics in Adobe Illustrator and animate them in After Effects. Edit a mix of live-action footage ,2D animated graphics and stock footage in Premiere Pro. Create compelling motion graphics and videos that support the marketing communications strategy.Work with interactive Digital Producers to develop dynamic, complex motion graphics for a range of video content. Will also be expected to create print and digital graphics for brand related projects.Proficiency with the video production and editing processExperience with Premiere Pro, After Effects and AuditionExperience using professional video I photo equipmentExperience with Adobe CC (Photoshop and Illustrator)Experience in color correction and audio mixing is an assetExcellent sense of pacing and timingAmazing story-telling abilityCan initiate visual direction without a specific concept or designA high level of attention to detailAbility to work under pressure for short turnaround deadlines while maintaining a high-quality standardPlease provide a portfolio and/or demo reels.Hours:  Monday - Friday, 9:00 am to 5:00 pmStart Date:  January 20, 2020End Date: March 31, 2020Location:  1265 Military Trail, Scarborough, OntarioIf you would like to apply for this position, please apply on the UTemp site, http://utemp.hrandequity.utoronto.ca/apply/. This is a general application portal, and therefore, you will not see this position specifically listed when you apply.Job Types: Full-time, TemporaryJob Type: Temporary",,https://ca.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=c6ac947339962975,c6ac947339962975,indeed,University of Toronto
new,Pastry Chef de Partie,University of Toronto,"Toronto, ON",2020-01-11,"Pastry Chef De Partie 1 Full-Time Position (Continuing) Posting CN  19-11Employee GroupCUPE 3261  89 ChestnutFaculty / DivisionAncillary Services / Chestnut Residence and Conference CentreDescriptionThe Chestnut Residence and Conference Centre is a University of Toronto operated facility located in the heart of downtown Toronto, offering residence, summer residence, convention and banquet services.The Chef de Partie is responsible for the oversight of all food production in a specified area of the kitchen (i.e. saucier, dining hall, and all catered events etc.). This position supervises and directs kitchen staff; ensuring duties are carried out in accordance with established standards. This position prepares materials requisitions based on anticipated volumes and creates and executes recipes as directed by the Sous Chef and Executive Chef as per the established standards of operation.Essential Duties and Responsibilities Maintains knowledge of and adheres to objectives, policies, standards and procedures as set forth by the Executive Chef and management team.Directs others in the preparation and cooking of all items within the station according to established standards, based on comprehensive knowledge of food preparation requirements.Reads and interprets all menus and ensuring that mise en place for all menus is accurate and prepared in a timely fashion.Supervises and directs cooks assigned to stations and ensures that all duties are carried out as per the established standards of operation.Supervises and directs all cooks on a daily basis, and in the absence of the Sous Chef.Ensures the highest standards of quality in food presentation in a timely manner.Ensures that at all times sanitation and regulatory compliance requirements are being followed in all areas where food is handled or stored, and safe and proper re-use and disposal practices are followed.Ensures that station is properly stocked with equipment and food needed to successfully complete daily requirements.Creates and executes recipes for specific ingredients as directed by Sous Chef.Prepares food and materials requisitions based on anticipated volumes.Read and interprets catering events orders and dining hall menu and ensures food is prepared to specified quality standards and appropriate quantities.Assists Sous Chef with daily routines.Maintains and safe, clean and well-organized fridge, freezer, workstation, workspace and entire kitchen including equipment. Responsible for ensuring HACCP protocols (Hazard Analysis and Critical Control Points) are understood and followed, and completes all necessary logs.Reports any broken or unsafe equipment to Sous Chef.Read and abide by all University of Toronto policies and standards.Provides customer service to guests, by maintaining an awareness of guests presence and responding in a courteous and helpful manner.Performs all other duties as requested.Required Education, Experience and SkillsHigh School diploma or GEDCompleted Apprenticeship trainingRed Seal Certification or International Equivalent.Valid Food Safety Training CertificateHACCP trainingMinimum 5 to 6 years experience in a high volume culinary environment.Ability to communicate effectively in English, both orally and in writing.Ability to read, interpret, create, and execute food and materials requisitions, food orders, and recipes.Ability to supervise cooks and kitchen staff.Must be physically able to lift 10-20lbs numerous times each day and up to 50 lbs. several times a day. Must be able to push/pull up to 50 lbs. frequently. Requires long periods of time standing, and frequent bending, overhead reaching, and twisting motions.Hourly RateProbationary Rate: $20.11/hr -- $26.13/hr after 6 monthsShift DetailsMay be required to work early mornings, afternoons and/or weekend shifts. Staff is scheduled in accordance with business needs.Please apply to: Olivia BoutilierSous ChefChestnut Residence and Conference Centre89 Chestnut StreetToronto, ONEmail: Olivia BoutilierThe University of Toronto is strongly committed to diversity within its community and especially welcomes applications from racialized persons / persons of colour, women, Indigenous / Aboriginal People of North America, persons with disabilities, LGBTQ persons, and others who may contribute to the further diversification of ideas. University of Toronto thanks all applicants for their interest, however; only those applicants selected for an interview will be contactedJob Types: Full-time, PermanentSalary: $20.11 to $26.13 /hourExperience:Culinary: 1 year (Preferred)restaurant: 1 year (Preferred)Line Cook: 1 year (Preferred)Location:Toronto, ON (Preferred)",,https://ca.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=aa5d4d80a3e66085,aa5d4d80a3e66085,indeed,University of Toronto
new,Software Sales and Marketing Specialist (Part-time),University of Toronto,"Toronto, ON",2020-01-21,"The University of Toronto is hiring for a Software Sales and Marketing Specialist for a research project in the Department of Civil & Mineral Engineering! Please note this is a short-term part-time temporary position.About usThe Department of Civil & Mineral Engineering at the University of Toronto was founded in 1873 as the Ontario School of Practical Science. The initial institution was dedicated to the training of professional engineers in mining, civil engineering, mechanics and manufacturing. The Department has undergone several periods of growth and restructuring since those early years and currently offers a dynamic compendium of research and academic programs. Our mandate now spans a wide range of modern day applications in professional practice, encompassing the built environment and its infrastructure, transportation engineering and planning, structural engineering, environmental engineering, mining, and geomechanics. The present day Department of Civil Engineering has continued to serve this esteemed institution as a core member of the Faculty of Applied Science and Engineering, widely recognized as one of the top 10 engineering schools in the world.The Position: The research project is aimed at developing an analytics platform to help municipalities in decision making. Particular focus will be on the use of social media analytics and big data in the area transit systems. The project includes researchers from diversified backgrounds: civil engineering, data science, and programming. We are working with a major Canadian Transit agency and private sector partners in the project!The role of the new recruit will focus on three major tasks:Customer relationships: Establish a plan and work on effective communications with our current industrial partners. This includes developing presentations and professional reports, organizing frequent workshops and meetings to engage partners, learn and understand their business needs, and discuss project progress.Develop a plan for marketing the platform:  The platform being developed is unique to the domain and holds extensive potential for application and use by our current partners and other municipalities. The successful candidate will be tasked with development of a detailed marketing plan. This includes:Formal scan of the market: profiles of possible customers and their needs; analysis of comparative or similar products/platforms.Business case: detailed analysis of the costs and benefits of using the platform (from the perspective of a potential user agency).Business model: a full canvas model, with validated value propositions and cost and revenue analysis. Sales: * Reach out to potential customers to evaluate/validate the business model and business case; and negotiate possible opportunities to collaborate with additional partners.Requirements: The successful candidate MUST have a track record in software sales and business case development. They should also have a proven record, with adequate references, in the areas of marketing planning and customer relationship management.The successful candidate is expected to be self-motivated and assume a leading role in driving the overall business management side of the project.Hours:  7  14 hours per weekStart Date:  January 6, 2020End Date: May 29, 2020If you would like to apply for this position, please submit a general application on the UTemp site, http://utemp.hrandequity.utoronto.ca/apply/. Job Types: Part-time, Temporary",,https://ca.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=7f872ad3b3867830,7f872ad3b3867830,indeed,University of Toronto
new,"Administrative Assistant, Correspondence Unit",University of Toronto,"Toronto, ON",2020-01-31,"Reporting directly to the Manager, Correspondence Unit, the incumbent is a key member of a three-person correspondence team, which is tasked with monitoring, coordinating, and responding to a heavy volume of correspondence sent to the President for action and disposition. The incumbent will be the primary point of contact in receiving and acting upon email and mail, documents, and files for the Presidents attention. The incumbent will draft often elaborate and complex original correspondence for the Presidents signature.

Working closely with the Presidents Executive Assistant, the incumbent will provide a high level of executive secretarial and confidential administrative support to the President. The incumbent will also provide administrative support to the Assistant Vice-President, Office of the President & Chief of Protocol as required and will conduct background research on a variety of current issues, engagement opportunities and events to present to the Manager, Correspondence Unit and President to assist with the development of communications.

The incumbent works in a complex environment that requires a high degree of sensitivity, responsiveness and a need to maintain absolute confidentiality. The incumbent must present a professional image in the Office of the President by interacting knowledgeably and courteously with the many people who come into regular contact with the Office, including governors, senior administrators, faculty, staff, students and community members. The incumbent must be a highly motivated and energetic individual who enjoys the challenge of working in a dynamic and fast-paced environment.

Qualifications:

(MINIMUM)

Education:
University degree or an equivalent combination of education and experience.

Experience:
Six to eight (6-8) years of providing executive administrative experience required, preferably within a post-secondary or government environment. Demonstrated senior secretarial ability in a dynamic senior executive office.


Skills:
Proficiency with Microsoft Office 365 (Explorer, Word, Excel), MS SharePoint, Powerpoint, Access. Excellent keyboarding skills.


Other:
Superior oral and written communication, interpersonal, analytical, decision-making and organizational skills. Demonstrated ability to write clear and concise correspondence and reports. Ability to maintain strict confidentiality. Enthusiastic and friendly, with a demonstrated customer-service orientation. Demonstrated initiative, accuracy and meticulous attention to detail. Demonstrated judgment, tact, discretion and ability to handle complex matters of a sensitive and confidential nature. Ability to organize a heavy and fluctuating workload in a changing environment. Ability to communicate effectively and professionally with a wide range of individuals across all levels of the University. Ability to work under pressure and to meet deadlines. Ability to assimilate and interpret significant amounts of information. Ability to work effectively and professionally, both independently and within a team environment.

Travel: None",,https://ca.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=03e78129496c577d,03e78129496c577d,indeed,University of Toronto
new,Service Worker Caretaking (TERM),University of Toronto,"Toronto, ON",2020-02-08,"General Description of Class:


Under general supervision works according to detailed procedures in cleaning and custodial duties, may assist in other maintenance duties.


Typical Duties:


The following illustrative tasks indicate the level of skill required, and the extent of responsibility involved in this job. They in no way limit the incumbent to the tasks indicated.

a) cleans and dusts furniture, floors, hallways and stairways, using appropriate equipment including heavy duty electric buffers, automatic floor machines, large dust mops, vacuum cleaners and other cleaning equipment;
b) reconditions floors as required; including stripping, refinishing, scrubbing, spray buffing, buffing, sealing and other related floor care duties;
c) cleans and scrubs washrooms, including lavatories, toilets, mirrors, floors, metal fixtures and bright work;
d) collects waste from floors and receptacles empties into traveling receptacles, removes garbage from buildings;
e) removes spots from carpet surfaces as required;
f) washes windows and walls including partition glass;
g) moves furniture within the work area when necessary;
h) makes beds for residence guests in residence operations when necessary;
i) cleans blackboards, whiteboards and other writing surfaces as directed;
j) supplies paper towels and toilet paper and hand soap to receptacles, washrooms, work stations and other areas as required;
k) changes light bulbs when required;
l) clears exterior of entrance ways to buildings of debris and garbage;
m) cleans exterior entrance pads and podiums using power washing equipment;
n) assists in snow removal when necessary; and
o) other related duties as required.

Qualifications:

Minimum Requirements:


Education: Completion of tenth grade or equivalent.


Experience: One year of related work experience is desirable.


Other: Physical ability to perform duties described and to use indicated equipment, ability to communicate effectively in English (orally and written).
Travel: None

Notes:
This is a term contract ending April 2021 to cover a long-term disability.",,https://ca.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=5e44ed8ca02b2304,5e44ed8ca02b2304,indeed,University of Toronto
new,Executive Assistant,University of Toronto,"Toronto, ON",2020-01-30,"Under the direction of the Vice-Provost, Innovations in Undergraduate Education (VP-IUE), and Vice-Provost, Academic Programs (VP-AP), and working closely with the Executive Assistant to the Vice-President and Provost and the Executive Assistant to the Chief Administrative Officer, the Executive Assistant to the VP-IUE & VP-AP will provide a high level of executive secretarial and confidential administrative support to the VP-IUE, the VP-AP, the Office of the VP-IUE, and the Office of the VP-AP. The incumbent will also provide full back-up to the other Executive Assistant to the Chief Administrative Officer. The incumbent will operate as the first point of contact for the Offices of the VP-IUE and VP-AP, answering and directing inquiries in person and on the phone. In addition, the incumbent provides project, logistic and administrative support to the VP-IUE and VP-AP. The incumbent develops communication materials, generates routine reports and materials, and conducts research in support of various institutional initiatives.


The incumbent will also take the initiative to help ensure that deadlines and schedules are met; participate in the coordination of mass mailings; order courier services; monitor and order office supplies and catering services; and perform other duties as required pertaining to the maintenance and operation of the Offices.


The incumbent will have daily access to confidential and sensitive information related to all areas of the Universitys functioning including financial, budgetary, human resources and labour relations information. In the event of disruptions to undergraduate academic programs, the incumbent will play an important role in ensuring that communications flow to and from key senior academic administrative staff within the portfolio of the Vice-President & Provost, as well as communications from the Office of the Vice-President & Provost with the members of PDAD&C and the broader University community.


The incumbent works in a complex environment that requires a high degree of sensitivity, responsiveness and a need to maintain absolute confidentiality. The incumbent must present a professional image in the Vice-Provostial offices by interacting knowledgeably and courteously with the many people including governors, senior administrators, faculty, staff, students and community members who come into contact with the Office of the Vice-President & Provost and various Vice-Provosts. The incumbent must be a highly motivated and energetic individual who enjoys the challenge of working in a dynamic, fast-paced environment.


Qualifications:

(MINIMUM)

Education:
University degree or an equivalent combination of education and experience.

Experience:
Six to Eight (6-8) years of senior secretarial experience required, preferably within a post-secondary or government environment. Demonstrated senior secretarial ability in a dynamic senior executive office.

Skills:
Proficiency with MS Office (including Outlook) experience using databases; familiarity with Microsoft Sharepoint an asset.


Other:
Strong oral and written communication, interpersonal, analytical, decision-making and organizational skills. Demonstrated ability to draft clear and concise correspondence. Strong customer-service orientation. Demonstrated initiative, accuracy and meticulous attention to detail. Demonstrated judgment, tact, discretion and ability to handle complex matters of a sensitive and confidential nature. Ability to organize a heavy and fluctuating workload in a changing environment. Ability to work under pressure and to meet deadlines. Ability to assimilate and interpret significant amounts of information. Ability to work effectively and professionally, both independently and within a team environment.

Travel: None",,https://ca.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=4256a68a29bac3b0,4256a68a29bac3b0,indeed,University of Toronto
new,Financial Assistant,University of Toronto,"Toronto, ON",2020-02-06,"About us:

The Faculty of Arts & Science is the heart of Canadas leading university and one of the most comprehensive and diverse academic divisions in the world. The strength of Arts & Science derives from our combined teaching and research excellence in the humanities, sciences and social sciences across 29 departments, seven colleges and 46 interdisciplinary centres, institutes and programs.


We can only realize our mission with the dedication and excellence of engaged staff and faculty. The diversity of opportunities and perspectives within the Faculty reflect the local and global landscape and the need for curiosity, innovative thinking and collaboration. At Arts & Science, we take pride in our legacy of innovation and discovery that has changed the way we think about the world.

New College opened in 1962 and has since developed its own traditions and identity, focusing on personal attention to students, innovative interdisciplinary programs, links with professional faculties, career mentorship and community outreach initiatives. Within our friendly and informal environment, we place a high priority on student support services and we have built a rich and inclusive learning community that includes academic support, amenities for studying and social interaction, and opportunities for co-curricular and community engagement.

Your opportunity:

Under the general direction of the Financial Officer, the incumbent is responsible for processing financial and payroll related documentation for all employee groups and departments at New College. This critical role supports the Business Services Office in setting up, updating and maintaining FIS and HRIS information, and investigates and corrects any financial discrepancies.

Your responsibilities will include:

Acting as the first point of contact for payroll related enquiries
Preparing payroll records for processing
Troubleshooting and resolving payroll discrepancies
Verifying the accuracy and completeness of documents
Applying the generally accepted accounting principles to all financial tasks
Preparing accounts payable according to the University Guide to Financial Management
Verifying that supporting documentation is attached to financial records before processing in FIS
Maintaining filing system

Qualifications:

Essential Qualifications:

Advanced College Diploma (3 years) in business or accounting, or an acceptable equivalent combination of education and experience.
Minimum three (3) years of recent and related financial and payroll experience in a university or similar environment.
Demonstrated experience with U of T's Administrative Management System (e.g. FIS and HRIS), or equivalent systems.
Experience maintaining and organizing administrative, financial and HR records.
Experience interpreting and applying policies and procedures (e.g. financial policies/procedures, collective agreements).
Advanced skills in SAP (specifically FIS and HRIS), or similar systems is required.
Demonstrated advanced skills with Microsoft Office Suite (e.g. Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Outlook).
Excellent organizational and time-management skills.
Knowledge of the Universitys financial procedures and guidelines, or other similar procedures.

To be successful in this role you will be:

Accountable
Communicator
Diplomatic
Meticulous
Possess a positive attitude
Team player

Travel: None

Notes:",,https://ca.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=d4487c52aac18568,d4487c52aac18568,indeed,University of Toronto
new,Lead Hand Cafeteria Worker (Temp),University of Toronto,"Toronto, ON",2020-02-07,"Under general supervision, acts a leader of a group of Cafeteria workers, operates a cash register, receives and issues cash, orders and maintains inventory of specific food items.


Typical Duties


The following illustrative tasks indicate the level of skill required and the extent of the responsibility involved in this position. They in no way limit the incumbent to the tasks indicated.


Flexibility of the employee to perform a wide variety of functions is necessary in successfully fulfilling the requirements of this position. The degree to which each employee performs each of the following tasks listed below will vary according to where and when the employee is scheduled to work.

a) inspects the work of the group and directs corrections as needed;

b) reports attendance and performance of the group;

c) receives instructions and interprets them to the members of the group;

d) identifies and reports defective equipment and supplies;

e) orders and maintains inventory of specific food items daily;

f) may perform the duties of a Cafeteria Worker; and

g) other related duties as required.

Qualifications:


Education:
Completion of Grade 12 or equivalent.


Experience:
Three years related experience.


Other:
Ability to lead, ability to handle figures rapidly, ability to communicate effectively in written and spoken English, considerable public relations skills (courtesy and tact), and may be required to complete a University of Toronto server training program. Successful completion of food safety training.


Travel: None

Notes:
This position will be filled within the retail outlets of the Food Services department.

Please be advised that evenings and week-ends may be required. This is a temporary position for a duration of up to 120 days, starting from the date of hire.",,https://ca.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=4d31e45f0e952d46,4d31e45f0e952d46,indeed,University of Toronto
new,Senior Budget Analyst,University of Toronto,"Toronto, ON",2020-01-30,"The University of Toronto Scarborough is a place of energy, enthusiasm and passion. Our commitment to inclusive excellence attracts the brightest learners, scholars and employees from around the globe. Our success has been made possible by the opportunity given to us by our Indigenous hosts to operate on their territory, and we cherish our continuing partnerships with these communities. The University of Toronto Scarborough is an exciting campus with unlimited potential. Join us on our journey.

Financial Services is part of a vibrant and expanding campus where diversity fuels innovation. It consists of a team of professionals who provide accounting, budgeting and procurement services to UTSC. As a centralized department, it is responsible for safeguarding university assets, ensuring compliance, developing financial models and conducting analysis in support of the Universitys academic mission.

Under direction of the Assistant Director, Operating Budget, the Senior Budget Analyst serves the primary role in the development, analysis and execution of budgets which are used to allocate current resources and estimate future financial requirements for operating departments at UTSC. S/he manages monitors and forecasts budget and financial operations; monitors financial performance; ensures financial controls are maintained; reviews funding requests; and performs year end reporting. The incumbent will examine budget estimates or proposals for completeness, accuracy and conformance to established procedures and policies; will employ cost-benefit analysis to review financial requests, assess program tradeoffs and explore alternative funding methods; examine past and current budgets and research economic and financial developments that affect spending. The incumbent will consolidate individual department budgets requests and present the analysis and recommendation to senior management in order to aid them in decision making.


The incumbent is responsible for all aspects of preparing, implementing and providing oversight to the annual operating budget processes for departments which include: ensuring budget timelines are met; determining and updating key budget assumptions and preparing financial impact analysis of policy decisions and expense/revenue forecasts that will affect the development of the annual budget development process; providing input into approaches to be used for budget development that derive from current circumstances; updating the budget management system in preparation for the budget development cycle, with a focus on continuous improvement based on changing requirements; receiving proposed budgets and following up on problems arising from budgets that have been prepared contrary to guidelines; and preparing budget documentation for review and decision making by senior management.

In performing these responsibilities, the incumbent performs a broad range of extensive analyses and prepares a wide range of financial models and reports using complex spreadsheets and formulae. The incumbent prepares and presents proposals, business plans and budget models to central budgeting committees and senior management for review and decision making. The incumbent must have thorough understanding of University policy and practices and the diverse activities and underlying financial structure of UTSC.

The incumbent also serves as consultant to departmental Business Officers and Administrative Assistants in performing budgeting, accounting, and reporting functions. Cost plans, forecasts, and spending plans submitted by departments are reviewed and summarized by the incumbent for submission to Central Planning and Budget.

The incumbent plays a key role in the performance of operational audits of UTSC departments and works on a variety of business assessments and projects requiring the preparation of complex budgetary models, detailed reports and recommendations. This requires the incumbent to review existing UTSC services, perform complex cost/benefit analysis, prepare various business plans/recommendations and present such results to senior administrators for decision making.


Qualifications:

I. EDUCATION:
University degree, preferably in a commerce or business administration program, and successful completion of a recognized professional accounting program such as CPA and/or an equivalent combination of education and experience.

II. EXPERIENCE:
A minimum of five years experience in an intermediate/senior accounting and financial management position. Several years experience in budgeting and fund accounting, preferably in a University environment. Experience analyzing complex financial information and cost allocation models. Applicants are also expected to show evidence of a commitment to equity, diversity, inclusion, and the promotion of a respectful and collegial learning and working environment.

III. SKILLS:
Advanced knowledge of spreadsheet applications (Excel), good knowledge of word processing software, preferably Microsoft Word, and knowledge of Power Point. Experience with computerized financial information systems is required. Working knowledge of the University's Financial Information System (FIS), Human Resources Information System (HRIS)


IV. OTHER:
Incumbent must have: superior analytical ability, excellent communication and interpersonal skills, ability to exercise sound judgment and initiative, knowledge of the Universitys budgeting and financial policies and procedures. Attention to detail, excellent organizational skills and demonstrated commitment to service excellence. Ability to work independently and as part of a team


Travel: None

Notes: A copy of the full job description is available upon request from the UTSC HR Office.",,https://ca.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=5f248a9673ee52ce,5f248a9673ee52ce,indeed,University of Toronto
new,Communications Writer,University of Toronto,"Toronto, ON",2020-02-05,"About us:

The Edward S. Rogers Sr. Department of Electrical & Computer Engineering is Canadas top-ranked ECE department, and one of the country's largest. We are home to 100 active and Emeritus professors, more than 1,400 undergraduate and 600 graduate students. Many of our faculty members are world leaders in their field and have been recognized as the brightest and most promising scientists and engineers from across the country.


ECE is a hotbed of research commercialization, by far the most productive department for new inventions at the University of Toronto. With this department, you will work at the heart of the most rapidly developing technologies humankind has ever seen.

Your opportunity:

Reporting to the External Relations Manager the Communications Writer provides communications, logistical, as well as administrative support to the Communications and External Relations Office. This includes creating and posting content on social media channels, websites and print media; maintaining the internal and external websites, sourcing, ordering and maintaining signage and promotional materials for the department; collecting information used for news research, assembling newsletters; and responding to general inquiries for information about the department.


Your responsibilities will include:

Writing and editing copy and content to advance communications objectives
Liaising with departmental staff to support effective content/story development
Conducting interviews with leaders, faculty, staff and students for external publication
Generating original concepts and writing copy
Writing news and feature stories
Editing content for brochures, newsletters, websites and/or handbooks
Writing key messages and/or speeches for staff and faculty
Developing content for marketing and/or promotional materials

Qualifications:

Essential Qualifications:

Bachelors degree in communications, English, journalism or related field, or an equivalent and relevant combination of education and experience
Minimum four years relevant experience in communications, media or public relations
Experience with using social media in a work setting
Experience with print design, layout/production and desktop publishing
Experience with project management and managing the production of a publication
Experience and knowledge of Canadian Press style with the ability to copy-edit to a house style that offers some published exceptions
Excellent research, writing and editing and print design/layout skills
Advanced skills in MS Office products, knowledge of HTML, video editing software, WordPress, InDesign and Photoshop
Strong communication skills both written and verbal

Assets (Nonessential):

Experience writing about topics in engineering, science and technology and online writing experience
Knowledge of the University of Toronto and the Faculty of Applied Science & Engineering
Demonstrated experience with moderating an online community

To be successful in this role you will be:

Articulate
Communicator
Insightful
Organized
Proactive
Resourceful

Travel: None

Notes:",,https://ca.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=044664c3864ac3c7,044664c3864ac3c7,indeed,University of Toronto
new,ONRamp Program Coordinator,University of Toronto,"Toronto, ON",2020-01-29,"About us:

The Vice-President, Research & Innovation (VPRI) portfolio supports the University of Toronto as a
top public research university in the world. Our mission is to create the most supportive
environment possible so that our researchers, innovators and learners can do what they do best 
advance understanding and apply new knowledge. Our work supports, fosters and promotes the
research and innovation culture and activities of our faculty, staff and students, along with our
partner hospitals, funding sponsors, and partners in the public and private sector. VPRI provides a
full range of services including guidance to faculty, staff and students on funding opportunities,
research agreement negotiation, oversight and accountability services including research
accounting, environmental health and safety, innovation and entrepreneurship, partnerships,
policies and procedures, and institutional awards and honours.

Your opportunity:

ONRamp @ U of T Entrepreneurship connects startups and entrepreneurship programs (incubators/accelerators) across U of Ts tri-campus and our partner organizations with each other as well as helping them accelerate their businesses with access to facilities, events, and the business community in downtown Toronto. In this role you will provide a high level of professional service to support ONRamp and its activities.

To support operational needs the Hours of Work for this position are Monday to Friday from 11:45am to 8:00pm.

Your responsibilities will include:

Coordinating the production and distribution of communication materials
Editing promotional and/or outreach materials
Coordinating the schedule for program and event calendars
Determining logistical details and activities for events and/or programming
Conducting post-event evaluation and analysis
Maintaining information on digital platforms
Coordinating meeting schedules, agendas, materials, action and follow-up items
Collaborating on cost estimates

Qualifications:

Essential Qualifications:

Advanced College Diploma (3 years) or acceptable combination of equivalent education and experience.
Minimum three years relevant experience in the coordination and execution of events.
Demonstrated experience working on multiple events with a variety of stakeholders
Excellent ability to coordinate and execute event logistics for a variety of audiences for small to large-scale events
Strong time management skills and ability to prioritize tasks and responsibilities to meet strict deadlines
Demonstrated ability to trouble-shoot event activities and provide high level of customer service
Exceptional interpersonal skills, tact and diplomacy
Strong oral and written communication skills
Ability to prepare presentations, reports and correspondence with minimal review
Superior attention to detail and accuracy
Demonstrated ability to exercise tact, judgment and discretion in the execution of position responsibilities
Excellent software skills including MS Office (Word, Excel, PowerPoint)
Strong initiative and ability to work well in a team

Assets (Nonessential):

Previous marketing and communication experience

To be successful in this role you will be:

Adaptable
Communicator
Efficient
Organized
Possess a positive attitude
Resourceful
Team player

Travel: None

Notes:
This is a 6 month Term position.

To support operational needs the Hours of Work for this position are Monday to Friday from 11:45am to 8:00pm.",,https://ca.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=4855dbd64361e05d,4855dbd64361e05d,indeed,University of Toronto
new,PBSC Program Manager,University of Toronto,"Toronto, ON",2020-02-01,"1 Year Term

About us:

The Faculty of Law is one of the oldest professional faculties at the University of Toronto. Today, it is one of the world's great law schools. The Facultys rich academic programs are complimented by its many legal clinics and public interest Programs. The Faculty of Law is housed in the elegant, state-ofthe-art Jackman Law Building alongside two historical building, Flavelle House and Falconer Hall, on the St. George Campus in downtown Toronto.

Your opportunity:

Pro Bono Students Canada (PBSC) is an award-winning program that provides free legal services to non-profit organizations and low-income Canadians with chapters in 22 law schools coast-to-coast. For over two decades, PBSC has been designing high quality legal placements and training law student volunteers to help vulnerable Canadians with their essential legal needs.

The PBSC Program Manager, under the supervision of the National Director, develops, coordinates and oversees National Office legal projects in many areas of law, particularly family law. This may involve development and oversight of established undertakings or working with the National Director on the creation of projects then overseeing the implementation and ongoing maintenance of the program or initiative. The Program Manager also provides assistance and support with all other aspects of PBSCs programs, as required.

Your responsibilities will include:

Planning and implementing project phases
Liaising with management to determine goals and priorities
Building and strengthening relationships with stakeholders and partners of strategic importance
Drafting progress reports for project leader's review
Developing content for marketing and/or promotional materials
Serving as a resource on specific issues to a group of specialists

Qualifications:

Essential Qualifications:

Bachelor's Degree or an equivalent combination of education and experience.
Minimum five years related experience
Experience with access to justice programs, particularly those designed to provide legal assistance to low-income individuals
Experience researching, developing and maintaining multi-faceted legal projects
Experience drafting comprehensive, multi-year project plans and proposals
Experience developing and delivering training programs and materials
Knowledge and understanding of the legal profession and legal processes with a solid understanding of courts and tribunals
Demonstrated ability to work with and motivate staff, students and partners including members of the legal profession
Excellent computer skills including Microsoft Outlook, Word, Excel and PowerPoint
Highly organized, detail-oriented, self starter
Willingness and ability to travel within Canada
Demonstrated leadership skills
Excellent analytical skills

Assets (Nonessential):

Law degree (LLB or JD) would be considered an asset
Experience practicing family law an asset

To be successful in this role you will be:

Articulate
Diplomatic
Multi-tasker
Organized
Problem solver
Procedural

Travel: None

Notes: This is a one-year Term appointment.",,https://ca.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=59dbf4ec7a25d0c6,59dbf4ec7a25d0c6,indeed,University of Toronto
new,"Manager, Financial Information & Processing Support (FIPS)",University of Toronto,"Toronto, ON",2020-02-05,"Under the general direction of the Assistant Director, FIPS & Special Projects, the Manager is responsible for leading the Financial Information & Processing Support team that, on a continually changing basis, provides a wide range of services involving financial and finance related staff support available on a flexible, part time and/or temporary basis to support the operations of all departments (academic, administrative, ancillary, student service) on the UTM campus.


The incumbent oversees all aspects of internal audit for transaction processing ensuring adherence to University policy and GAAP (generally accepted accounting principles). The incumbent oversees the training of staff in a high turnover operation and continually assesses the needs of customers and how the unit can add value to the campus. The Manager, FIPS develops business solutions for customer departments and provides financial advice to departments on appropriate processes and procedures, and assists with financial issues regarding the administration of research grants and contracts. The incumbent must be able to work with all levels of staff in identifying situations that change to continually create and document new business processes.

The Manager, FIPS also leads a variety of projects with a focus on statistical reports, analysis, reconciliation, investigating discrepancies and assisting with budgets, forecasts, fielding queries, instructing on monthly account reconciliation, and providing on-going support while always ensuring that University policies and procedures are followed.
Qualifications:

Education:

University degree in Business Administration, Commerce or related field with a specialization in accounting and/or equivalent combination of education and experience. A professional accounting designation, CPA (CA, CMA, or CGA), is required.
Experience:

Five years related experience in progressively senior level accounting and financial positions, including supervision of accounting staff, guidance to staff not directly supervised and experience advising various managers.
Experience in team building, training and managing staff in a unionized environment required.
 Experience in budgeting, forecasting and research accounting, required. Significant experience with administrative management systems (e.g. FIS, HRIS, RIS) required.
Experience in a University setting and an understanding of a Universitys organizational structure including its governance, mission and intersection with the broader community is an asset.
Experience with University budgeting and research accounting and and knowledge of generally accepted accounting principles and practices in a University environment are an asset.
Skills:

Highly developed interpersonal, verbal and written communication and organizational skills.
Demonstrated record of success in researching, analyzing, making recommendations, providing risk assessments and options.
Knowledge of Universitys SAP based Administrative Management Systems (AMS) and related applications (FIS, HRIS) or equivalent.
Demonstrated experience liaising with senior administrators, responding to and handling matters of a complex and sensitive nature.
Ability to work independently and to perform effectively as a member of a team.
Ability to exercise tact and diplomacy and deal with people in a clam and effective manner in sometimes sensitive situation and to maintain confidentiality.
Other:

Ability to work independently with a high degree of initiative and the ability to respond rapidly to change
Ability to respect matters of a sensitive nature and exercise discretion, and tact; good judgment
Superior organizational skills in planning, project management and task coordination; attention to detail; flexibility and problem solver orientation.
 Ability to respond to and initiate change and to work well under pressure.

Travel: None",,https://ca.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=4ad99188447fe8ff,4ad99188447fe8ff,indeed,University of Toronto
new,Sous Chef,University of Toronto,"Toronto, ON",2020-02-08,"General Description of Class

Under general direction, performs the full range of traditional sous-chef functions, provides support in areas such as preparation, equipment and clean-up, acts as a key partner to the Executive Chef in all food selection, ordering, handling, preparation and production responsibilities; leads, directs, trains and works with all Food Service staff. Supervises kitchen staff.

Typical Duties

The following illustrative tasks indicate the level of skill required, and the extent of responsibility involved in this job. They in no way limit the incumbent to the tasks indicated.

a) carries out or assists in selection, handling, preparation, production and presentation of all goods and beverages and in keeping with the high standards of the establishment;

b) assists with the creation of exciting recipes and related menus which meet objectives in the area of market appeal, seasonality, contemporariness, nutrition, portioning and profitability;

c) assures the highest standards of quality in food presented , including assurance of sanitation and regulatory compliance in all areas where food is handled or stored, and safe and proper re-use and disposal practices;

d) performs ordering of supplies;

e) assists with periodic inventory review and reporting;

f) stands in, as directed, for the Executive Chef, particularly during evening or weekend hours; leads, directs, trains and works with all Food Service staff; supervises kitchen staff; and

g) other related duties as required.

Qualifications:

Minimum Requirements for Selection

Education: A graduate of a recognized culinary training program.

Experience: Broad knowledge of and minimum 5 years experience in fine dining; previous experience as a Sous Chef acquired through progressive positions in appropriate establishments.

Other: Ability to perform all manual; skills consistent with Sous Chef duties; good communication skills and ability to foster excellent staff and customer relations.


Travel: None",,https://ca.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=125d4f88f7a71286,125d4f88f7a71286,indeed,University of Toronto
new,Student Work Shop Machinist: 14-Month Term,University of Toronto,"Toronto, ON",2020-01-31,"About us:

The Department of Mechanical & Industrial Engineering is world-renowned for its applied, immersive approach to teaching, with research that focuses on emerging topics including human factors, optimization, risk assessment, thermodynamics, biomechanics, robotics, microfluidics and sustainable energy. Our faculty are world leaders in their fields and bring a passion for education
that fosters development of enriched courses and unique experiences across both undergraduate and graduate programs.

Your opportunity:

Our leadership team provides an open, professional environment that fosters a culture built on respect, goal orientation, self-motivation, accountability, and teamwork. We believe in recognizing and valuing our employee's contributions to the advancement of the department's goals while promoting a strong commitment to work-life balance among our employees.


Under general direction of the Machine Shop Manager, is responsible for all aspects of student workshop operations including safety training for students, development of safety rules and policies, enforcement of safe workshop practises, maintenance of equipment, tools and supplies, consulting for students, and providing day-to-day support for students. Assists students and research staff with mechanical design, materials selection and manufacturing methodologies related to the manufacture of scientific apparatus. Under direction of the Machine Shop Manager, provides general support on contract machining jobs as time permits.

Hours of Work:

September through April - Monday to Friday 1pm to 9pm
May through August  Monday to Friday 8am-4pm

Your responsibilities will include:

Determining technical requirements for fabrication projects
Designing, modifying and fabricating custom machine parts
Designing, modifying and fabricating custom lab apparatus
Creating and reviewing technical drawing sets for manufacturing
Creating and reviewing CAM programs and tool paths for manufacturing
Preparing, assembling and setting-up material, equipment and supplies according to the needs of the facility
Providing safety training and ensuring adherence to safety procedures and standards
Serving as a resource to a group or on a function

Qualifications:

Essential Qualifications:

2 Year Community College Diploma plus applicable formal apprenticeship training, including the use of CAD and a certificate of qualification (general machinist, mould maker, tool and die maker etc.) or acceptable equivalent combination of education and experience.
Minimum of 8 years related experience
Including at least two years of experience in computer aided design tools such as SolidWorks or AutoCAD, preferably in an educational or manufacturing setting with a strong customer service focus.
Demonstrated advanced skills with a variety of different machines such as milling machines, lathes, saws, drills, grinders, cutting equipment, waterjet machines and laser cutter/engravers etc., as well as analog or digital measuring systems.
High level of mechanical aptitude
Knowledge of the occupational hazards and safety precautions
Ability to design complex science/engineering apparatus from verbal instructions and rough sketches
Ability to work to close tolerances
Ability to design and innovate
Demonstrated excellent communication and interpersonal skills
Experience dealing with diverse groups

Assets (Nonessential):

A strong record of teaching machine shop skills to students
Prior Knowledge and use of MasterCAM, RadBend & Flow Waterjet Software

To be successful in this role you will be:

Accountable
Approachable
Cooperative
Proactive
Problem solver
Team player

Travel: None

Notes:",,https://ca.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=7536b5ee42ae631c,7536b5ee42ae631c,indeed,University of Toronto
new,Senior Communications & Media Relations Officer,University of Toronto,"Toronto, ON",2020-01-29,"About us:

The Daniels Faculty of Architecture, Landscape, and Design at the University of Toronto offers graduate programs in architecture, landscape architecture, urban design, forestry, and visual studies  as well as unique undergraduate programs that use architectural studies and visual studies as a lens through which students may pursue a broad, liberal arts-based education. Its mission is to educate students, prepare professionals, and cultivate scholars who will play a leading role in creating more culturally engaged, ecologically sustainable, socially just, and artfully conceived environments.

The greater Toronto region serves as a dynamic laboratory for both its students and faculty, while the University of Toronto, which year after year ranks among the top universities in the world, provides a wealth of knowledge and expertise that they can draw from. Like Toronto, Daniels students and faculty are incredibly cosmopolitan in sensibility, hailing from every part of the world, with their work crossing all sorts of geographic and cultural boundaries. The citys multicultural networks and international connections make the Daniels Faculty a powerful place to start a career.

Your opportunity:

Reporting directly to the Dean, the Senior Communications and Media Relations Officer develops and implements an integrated communications strategy aimed at building and enhancing the vision, profile, and visibility of the Daniels Faculty. This includes originating and implementing a comprehensive range of activities and materials to engage internal and external stakeholders, including local and international academic and research communities; Daniels Faculty alumni, donors and friends; architecture and design professionals; current and prospective students; and media and government contacts. The incumbent works closely with the Facultys Writer and Digital Content Coordinator and regularly collaborates with the colleagues in the Deans Office, Advancement, Public Programming and Outreach, Programs, Research, and the Office of the Registrar and Student Services. The incumbent is comfortable working in a fast-paced environment, juggling competing projects and priorities, and managing the expectations of collaborators. They apply their knowledge of design-focused disciplines and post-secondary institutions to the development of the communications tools and materials that they manage and produce.

Your responsibilities will include:

Planning and developing an integrated multi-channel communications strategy independently
Developing and implementing targeted outreach initiatives that support communication strategies
Cultivating ongoing, high-profile prospective partnerships that advance strategic agendas
Analyzing and recommending strategies to develop targeted marketing campaigns
Promoting programs and service offerings to internal and/or external contacts
Producing promotional and outreach materials
Advising on branding strategies and attributes to support initiatives
Acting as an authorized spokesperson on behalf of the Division, Faculty or unit to members of the media

Qualifications:

Essential Qualifications:

Bachelor's degree in the arts, or in art/architecture-related humanities, journalism, marketing or communications or acceptable combination of equivalent experience
Minimum five (5) years of recent, relevant experience:
Conceptualizing and executing complex communications projects with a high degree of initiative, including media and marketing activities
Planning and developing an integrated multi-channel communications strategy with some independence
Analyzing and recommending strategies to develop targeted marketing campaigns
Developing and implementing targeted outreach initiatives that support communication strategies
Determining key performance indicators to measure success
Producing promotional and outreach materials
Advising on branding strategies and attributes to support initiatives
Acting as an authorized spokesperson on behalf of a comparable organization/institution to members of the media
Writing key messages and/or speeches for staff and faculty
Excellent interpersonal and relationship management skills. Demonstrated tact, professionalism, sound judgment and sensitivity
Superior written and verbal communication skills
Excellent copywriting and editing skills for final content for web and print communications, including fluency in English grammar and spelling, and the ability to edit and proofread
Excellent research skills
Proven project management skills, including ability to set priorities, leverage limited resources, and meet deadlines, in the areas of print, web, and video production
Knowledge and facility with a broad range of communications vehicles including traditional print and new/emerging media: web design, web-based marketing, content management solutions, and social networking tools including wikis, blogs, podcasts, and RSS feeds
Well-developed design capabilities and experience with various web and graphic design software, including Adobe Design Suite (InDesign, Illustrator, Photoshop, Acrobat Professional 8.0, and Dreamweaver CS3), Microsoft Office, HTML and Content Management Systems
Willingness and aptitude to keep current and learn new systems

Assets (Nonessential):

Established contacts in the fields of communications, design, media, and government
Additional coding capabilities such as CSS

To be successful in this role you will be:

Articulate
Communicator
Diplomatic
Meticulous
Resourceful
Self-directed

Travel: None",,https://ca.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=d7ee2c646a4da0b7,d7ee2c646a4da0b7,indeed,University of Toronto
new,Shift Engineer (Engineer B) Temporary,University of Toronto,"Toronto, ON",2020-01-31,"General Description of Class
Under the direction of the Manager of Mechanical Operations, the incumbent is responsible for the safe and economical operation and maintenance of all mechanical equipment and associated services for all buildings on campus.
Typical Duties
The following illustrative tasks indicate the level of skill required and the extent of responsibility involved in this job; they in no way limit the incumbent to the tasks indicated:
a) Regular rounds of mechanical equipment and mechanical service such as: checking equipment temperatures and pressures, conducting water chemical treatment tests, changing filters, regenerating softeners and de-alkalized water equipment, etc.;
b) performance of running maintenance and minor repair, i.e. including packing of glands, changing of belts, strip down and minor repair to equipment including valves, steam traps, pressure reducing stations, control valves and other similar equipment. Providing emergency repairs to laboratory, classroom and environmental rooms;
c) providing accurate details of routine monthly surveys and meter readings of equipment and facilities;
d) carrying out assigned inspection and preventative maintenance of all equipment, as per preventative maintenance work orders;
e) keeping close check on the proper operation of all equipment in buildings under the Building Management System;
f) answering and responding promptly to all trouble calls or alarms during off hours and weekend shifts;
g) responding to calls from Campus Police to correct emergency situations and problems on off shifts, weekends, and after hours;
h) obtaining assistance from outside contractors and other engineers as the situation dictates during off hours and weekends; assisting outside contractors when work is performed during shift;
i) coordinating shut down work required for repairing or restoring service with outside contractors;
j) maintaining daily log sheets on operating equipment, recording important breakdowns, malfunctions and events that occur during the shift;
k) maintaining adequate inventory of chemicals and spare parts;
l) advising the Manager or Lead Hand about problems which are considered to be outside of his/her scope of operation;

Qualifications:

Education: High School graduate or equivalent combination of education and experience plus a Third (3rd) Class Operating Engineer Certification valid in the Province of Ontario. Building Environmental Systems Certificate an asset.


Experience: Minimum of three (3) years experience as an operating engineer. Must have a good working knowledge of the operation and maintenance of mechanical equipment, including refrigeration, heating (e.g. boilers) and air handling systems, and ability to comprehend and apply environmental control principles. Must have: basic electrical knowledge and trouble-shooting skills, basic proficiency in standard office computer applications (e.g. Microsoft Word, Excel, Windows OS) and familiarity with computerized Building Automation Systems or other computerized control systems.


Other: Must have: good diagnostic and record keeping skills, the ability to communicate effectively (both orally and written), strong customer service skills and the ability to work collaboratively with others.

Travel: None

Notes:
This position is for a temporary shift engineer to replace an employee on leave. The temporary assignment is up to a maximum period of 12 months or until the employee's return.

The successful candidate will rotate between day and nights shifts for a total of 40 hours per week, 8 hours per shift. Day shift hours are 7:30am to 3:30pm, and night shift hours are 11:30pm to 7:30am. Rotation includes weekdays and weekends.",,https://ca.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=46b37940d707b591,46b37940d707b591,indeed,University of Toronto
new,"Assistant Professor - Immunobioengineering, Regenerative Med...",University of Toronto,"Toronto, ON",2020-01-11,"The Institute of Biomaterials & Biomedical Engineering in the University of Toronto invites applications for a full-time tenure-stream appointment in the area of Immunobioengineering, Regenerative Medicine, or Computational Bioengineering. The appointment will be at the rank of Assistant Professor. The expected start date is July 1, 2019.


The successful candidate will have an emerging reputation with internationally recognized scholarship and demonstrated excellence in research in immunobioengineering and/or immunology, stem cell biology, regenerative medicine, and/or cell and organ transplantation. We seek candidates whose research and teaching interests complement and strengthen our existing strengths. Applicants must have a Ph.D. degree in biomedical engineering, immunology or another relevant field by the time of appointment or shortly thereafter. Candidates must have a record of excellence in teaching and research, and a clearly demonstrated trajectory towards world-class scholarship.


Excellence in research will be determined by the quality of articles submitted in the application; output and impact of research or a research pipeline that is at high international levels; publications in top ranked, internationally recognized, and field relevant academic journals; presentations at significant conferences; awards and accolades; and strong endorsements by referees of high international stature. The successful candidate will be expected to initiate and lead an innovative, independent, and externally funded research program of the highest international calibre. Novel approaches to engineer immune responses for regenerative medicine applications are of particular interest. Evidence for excellence in teaching will be provided through teaching accomplishments and accolades, strong letters of reference, a reflective teaching statement, and the teaching dossier including teaching evaluations and sample syllabi, submitted as part of the application. This evidence can include performance as a teaching assistant, experience leading successful workshops or seminars, student mentorship, or excellent conference presentations or posters. Eligibility to register as a Professional Engineer in Ontario is strongly desirable.


Candidates will be closely associated with the Canada First Research Excellence Fund (CFREF) Medicine by Design Program, and may be considered for cross-appointment in appropriate partner departments at UofT, which may include Immunology, Laboratory Medicine and Pathobiology, Cell and Systems Biology, and others within the Faculties of Applied Science and Engineering, Medicine, Arts and Science, and the Toronto Academic Health Sciences Network.


Salary will be commensurate with qualifications and experience.
The Institute of Biomaterials & Biomedical Engineering (IBBME) at the University of Toronto is a multidisciplinary research community where engineering, medicine and dentistry investigators collaborate to develop innovative solutions that address global challenges in human health. More information is available at http://www.ibbme.utoronto.ca.

Medicine by Design (http://www.mbd.utoronto.ca) harnesses the exceptional expertise at the University of Toronto and its affiliated hospitals at the convergence of physical and life sciences, engineering, mathematics and medicine to undertake transformative research in regenerative medicine and cell therapy. Medicine by Design is made possible thanks in part to a $114-million grant from the CFREF. Engineering the immune system to enable cell, tissue and organ transplantation, to enhance regeneration and repair, and/or novel ways of generating and manipulating stem cell derived immune cells, are amongst the priority areas of Medicine by Design.


Review of applications will begin on December 5, 2018, however applications will be considered until the position is filled.

All qualified candidates are invited to apply by clicking on the link below. Applications must be submitted online. For further information about the application process, please see the submission guidelines at http://uoft.me/how-to-apply. If you have questions about the position, please contact director.ibbbme@utoronto.ca.

Applications must include a C.V. with a list of publications, 3 sample articles, research statement, a teaching dossier (to include a teaching statement, sample syllabi, and teaching evaluations, or other evidence of teaching excellence as listed above), and cover letter. Candidates must also arrange to have three letters of reference (pdf, on letterhead, signed, and scanned) sent directly by referees to Professor Warren Chan via email at references.ibbme@utoronto.ca.


The University of Toronto is strongly committed to diversity within its community and especially welcomes applications from racialized persons / persons of colour, women, Indigenous / Aboriginal People of North America, persons with disabilities, LGBTQ persons, and others who may contribute to the further diversification of ideas.

As part of your application, you will be asked to complete a brief Diversity Survey. This survey is voluntary. Any information directly related to you is confidential and cannot be accessed by search committees or human resources staff. Results will be aggregated for institutional planning purposes. For more information, please see http://uoft.me/UP.

All qualified candidates are encouraged to apply; however, Canadians and permanent residents will be given priority.",,https://ca.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=ab54f1d2913ce744,ab54f1d2913ce744,indeed,University of Toronto
new,Associate Professor / Professor - Cardiovascular Engineering,University of Toronto,"Toronto, ON",2020-01-11,"THE INITIAL REVIEW DATE OF THIS POSTING HAS BEEN EXTENDED TO MARCH 5, 2020.

The Institute of Biomaterials & Biomedical Engineering (https://ibbme.utoronto.ca) at the University of Toronto invites applications for a full-time tenure stream appointment in the area of Cardiovascular Engineering. The appointment will be at the rank of Associate Professor/ Professor. The successful candidate may also be eligible to be named The Ted Rogers Chair in Cardiovascular Engineering (details below). The expected start date is September 1, 2020.

The successful candidate will have an established reputation with internationally recognized scholarship and demonstrated excellence in research in cardiovascular engineering and science. Topic areas of particular interest include biointegrated electronics, wearables, point-of-care devices, and other biosensor technologies for clinical diagnosis and health monitoring, but all other research areas with relevance to translational cardiovascular engineering and biology will be considered. Applicants must have a Ph.D. degree in biomedical engineering or another relevant field. Candidates must have an outstanding record of excellence in teaching and research, and an established internationally recognized program of world-class scholarship.

Excellence in research will be demonstrated by a record of sustained high impact contributions to the field; significant output of research with an internationally recognised impact; sustained contributions and publications in top ranked, internationally recognized, and field relevant academic journals; presentations at significant conferences; distinguished awards and accolades; other noteworthy activities and contributions to the visibility and prominence of the discipline; and strong endorsements by referees of high international stature. The successful candidate will be expected to sustain and lead an outstanding, innovative, independent, and externally funded research program of the highest international calibre. Evidence for excellence in teaching will be provided through strong letters of reference; teaching accomplishments; awards and accolades; and a teaching dossier submitted as part of the application to include a reflective teaching statement, sample syllabi, and strong teaching evaluations.

Outstanding candidates with demonstrated research excellence relevant to heart failure and cardiovascular science will be considered for the Ted Rogers Chair in Cardiovascular Engineering within the Ted Rogers Centre for Heart Research (TRCHR) Translational Biology and Engineering Program. An established track record of collaborative science, successful and impactful program building, outstanding research productivity and excellence, and exceptionally effective leadership, demonstrated through the application materials, is essential. Through research and scholarly activities, the Chair holder will position the TRCHR as a global leader in knowledge and technology generation and translation in the areas of biology and engineering related to heart failure.

Candidates may be considered for cross-appointment in appropriate partner departments at UofT, which may include Physiology and others within the Faculties of Applied Science and Engineering, Medicine, Arts and Science, and the Toronto Academic Health Sciences Network.

Salary and rank will be commensurate with qualifications and experience.

The Institute of Biomaterials & Biomedical Engineering (IBBME) at the University of Toronto is a multidisciplinary research community where engineering, medicine and dentistry investigators collaborate to develop innovative solutions that address global challenges in human health. More information is available at https://ibbme.utoronto.ca.

The Ted Rogers Centre for Heart Research (https://tedrogersresearch.ca) is a unique research institute focused on heart failure across the lifespan that was enabled by a magnificent gift of $129.5 million from The Rogers Foundation, and matching contributions from the three founding partners, Hospital for Sick Children, University Health Network, and UofT.

Review of applications will begin on March 05, 2020, however applications will be considered until the position is filled.

All qualified candidates are invited to apply by clicking on the link below. Applications must be submitted online. For further information about the application process, please see the submission guidelines at http://uoft.me/how-to-apply. If you have questions about the position, please contact director.ibbme@utoronto.ca.

Applications must include a cover letter, a C.V. with a list of publications, 3 sample articles, research statement, and a teaching dossier (to include a teaching statement, sample syllabi, and teaching evaluations). Candidates must also arrange to have three letters of reference (pdf, on letterhead, signed, and scanned) sent directly by referees to Professor Warren Chan via email at references.ibbme@utoronto.ca.

The University of Toronto is strongly committed to diversity within its community and especially welcomes applications from racialized persons / persons of colour, women, Indigenous / Aboriginal People of North America, persons with disabilities, LGBTQ persons, and others who may contribute to the further diversification of ideas.

As part of your application, you will be asked to complete a brief Diversity Survey. This survey is voluntary. Any information directly related to you is confidential and cannot be accessed by search committees or human resources staff. Results will be aggregated for institutional planning purposes. For more information, please see http://uoft.me/UP.

All qualified candidates are encouraged to apply; however, Canadians and permanent residents will be given priority.",,https://ca.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=5a126f4e90d7f66b,5a126f4e90d7f66b,indeed,University of Toronto
new,"Assistant Professor, Teaching Stream - Contractually Limited...",University of Toronto,"Toronto, ON",2020-01-24,"The Department of Mathematical and Computational Sciences at the University of Toronto Mississauga (UTM) invites applications for a two-year contractually limited term appointment (CLTA) at the rank of Assistant Professor, Teaching Stream, in the field of Mathematics, beginning July 1, 2020, or shortly thereafter, and ending on June 30, 2022.
Candidates must have a PhD in mathematics by the time of appointment or shortly thereafter.
We seek candidates who have a strong record of excellent teaching, who exhibit the intellectual curiosity to pursue novel and innovative methods of thinking and teaching, and who are interested in establishing a long-term teaching career in the Department. Candidates teaching interests should complement and enhance our existing departmental strengths (https://www.utm.utoronto.ca/math-cs-stats/home). Candidates must have teaching expertise in a degree-granting program at the undergraduate program level, including lecture preparation and delivery, curriculum development and development of online material/lectures. Additionally, candidates must possess a demonstrated commitment to excellent pedagogical practices and a demonstrated interest in teaching-related scholarly activities.
Successful candidates must have strong endorsements from referees of high standing, demonstrating both excellent teaching and evidence of commitment to pedagogical enquiry and teaching innovation. Evidence of excellence in teaching will also be demonstrated through teaching accomplishments, and the teaching dossier, including a teaching statement, sample syllabi, and teaching evaluations, submitted as part of the application.
Teaching duties in the undergraduate program may include core courses at the first and/or second year level, as well as upper-level courses, in one of the candidate's fields of expertise. Responsibilities may include undergraduate teaching, managing teaching assistants, developing course materials, and curriculum development. In addition, each faculty member may have some responsibility for student recruitment and departmental administration.
Salary will be commensurate with qualifications and experience.
All qualified candidates are invited to apply through MathJobs at https://www.mathjobs.org/jobs/jobs/15541. Applicants must submit a cover letter, curriculum vitae, a statement of career goals and teaching philosophy, and a teaching dossier (to include sample syllabi and teaching evaluations). Applicants must also arrange to have three to five letters of recommendation (on letterhead, dated and signed) addressing teaching, uploaded through MathJobs directly by the writers.
All application materials, including reference letters, must be received by March 25, 2020. For additional enquiries, please contact Julia Martyn, Chairs Assistant, at julia.martyn@utoronto.ca.
For more information about the Department of Mathematical and Computational Sciences please visit our home page: http://www.utm.utoronto.ca/math-cs-stats/.
The University of Toronto is strongly committed to diversity within its community and especially welcomes applications from racialized persons / persons of colour, women, Indigenous/Aboriginal People of North America, persons with disabilities, LGBTQ persons, and others who may contribute to the further diversification of ideas.
All qualified candidates are encouraged to apply; however, Canadians and permanent residents will be given priority.",,https://ca.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=e26e38d073e02b87,e26e38d073e02b87,indeed,University of Toronto
new,Associate Professor - Complex and Harmonic Analysis,University of Toronto,"Toronto, ON",2020-01-29,"The Department of Mathematics in the Faculty of Arts & Science at the University of Toronto invites applications for a full-time tenure stream position in the area of Complex and Harmonic Analysis. The appointment will be at the rank of Associate Professor and the anticipated start date is September 1, 2020.

Applicants must have earned a PhD degree in Mathematics with a demonstrated exceptional record of excellence in research and teaching. We seek candidates whose research and teaching interests would complement and broaden our existing departmental strengths (Department of Mathematics). We seek candidates with a research emphasis in Singular Integrals, Potential Theory, and Geometric Measure Theory.

Candidates will have an established international reputation and will be expected to sustain and lead innovative and independent research at the highest international level and to maintain an outstanding, competitive, and externally funded research program.

Candidates must provide evidence of research excellence as demonstrated by a record of sustained high-impact contributions and publications in top-ranked and field relevant journals, the submitted research statement, presentations at significant conferences, distinguished awards and accolades, grant support, fellowships and other noteworthy activities that contribute to the visibility and prominence of the discipline as well as strong endorsements by referees of top international stature.

Evidence of excellence in teaching will be provided through teaching accomplishments, the teaching dossier submitted as part of the application including a strong teaching statement, sample course syllabi, and the teaching evaluations, as well as strong letters of reference.

Salary will be commensurate with qualifications and experience.

The University of Toronto is an international leader in research and education in Mathematics. It offers the opportunity to teach, conduct research, and live in one of the most diverse metropolitan areas in the world.

All qualified candidates must apply online through MathJobs at; https://www.mathjobs.org/jobs/jobs/15594
Applicants must submit a cover letter; a current curriculum vitae; a research statement outlining current and future research interests; one recent publication (of no more than 30 pages); and a teaching dossier to include a teaching statement, sample course syllabi, and teaching evaluations. Applicants must also arrange to have three letters of reference (on letterhead, signed and scanned) uploaded to MathJobs directly by the writers by the closing date.

The deadline for applications, including reference letters, is March 19, 2020. For questions about the position, please contact mathjobs@math.utoronto.ca .

The University of Toronto is strongly committed to diversity within its community and especially welcomes applications from racialized persons / persons of colour, women, Indigenous / Aboriginal People of North America, persons with disabilities, LGBTQ persons, and others who may contribute to the further diversification of ideas.

All qualified candidates are encouraged to apply; however, Canadians and permanent residents will be given priority.",,https://ca.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=47aabb03c5fdaf31,47aabb03c5fdaf31,indeed,University of Toronto
new,Assistant Professor - History and Theory of Housing/Architec...,University of Toronto,"Toronto, ON",2020-01-11,"The John H. Daniels Faculty of Architecture, Landscape, and Design, at the University of Toronto, invites applications for a full-time tenure-stream appointment in the History and Theory of Architecture with a focus on Housing. This appointment will be at the rank of Assistant Professor and will be effective July 1, 2019.

Candidates should have training and experience in the history and theory of the manifold intersections between architecture and urban policy. Expertise in the histories and theories of housing or, more broadly, dwellings that reflects the interplay of diverse places and cultures is preferable. Candidates must be engaged in research of an international calibre with demonstrated excellence in teaching. A Ph.D in architectural history or a related field is required, by the time of appointment or shortly thereafter. A professional degree in architecture, or a related field, is highly desirable. Candidates should show a strong commitment to exploring relationships between metropolitan form and architecture, including the complementary relationships between housing type, dwelling units, urban pattern, infrastructural systems, and the institutional, economic and political frameworks that shape them. They should demonstrate an understanding of how social, political, ethical, technical, economical and ecological issues interact in the history and contemporary dimensions of housing.


We are looking for a candidate with a demonstrated capacity to advance architectural knowledge and that of allied disciplines in a way that contributes meaningfully to the diverse population and intellectual milieu at the Daniels Faculty. Please visit our home page: the John H. Daniels Faculty of Architecture, Landscape, and Design at http://www.daniels.utoronto.ca/.


Excellence in research should be demonstrated by publications in recognized field-relevant journals (or leading publications in the field), or by leadership in research projects and networks operating at high, international standards, presentations at significant conferences, accolades for innovative research, strong endorsements by referees of international stature, and honours and awards. The successful candidate will be expected to pursue innovative and independent research at the highest international level and to establish an outstanding, competitive, and externally funded research program.


Candidates must have a strong demonstrated commitment to teaching excellence, and be prepared to contribute to the enrichment of undergraduate, graduate, and doctoral programs at the Daniels Faculty. These would include the Bachelor of Arts, Architectural Studies, Professional Masters programs in Architecture, Landscape Architecture, and Urban Design and the delivery of a new PhD in Architecture, Landscape, and Design Studies. Excellence in teaching should be demonstrated through teaching accomplishments, a teaching statement, sample syllabi and course materials, teaching evaluations, and a teaching dossier submitted as part of the application, and strong endorsements from referees. This evidence can include performance as a teaching assistant, experience leading successful workshops or seminars, student mentorship, or conference presentations.

The position will include opportunities for the candidate to collaborate with UofT colleagues in Planning/Geography, Art History, History, Environment, Computer Science, Engineering, and Public Health, among others, as well as operational staff, and external academic and non-academic partners. University of Toronto faculty have access to the Canadian Research Councils, which offer grants and research funding opportunities that are unique within North America.

Salary will be commensurate with qualifications and experience.

Set within a preeminent research university and located at the center of one of North Americas most cosmopolitan cities, the Daniels Faculty uniquely combines the disciplines of architecture, landscape architecture, and urban design in undergraduate, graduate professional, post-professional and doctoral programs. The Daniels Faculty explores the intersections between nature, technology, architecture, and built geographies in a way that situates design to meet its contemporary challenges. An emphasis on the connections between all of the design disciplines at work in the remaking of the built environment is apparent in the scholarly research and built work of many of our faculty. Following a decade-long transformation of the schools faculty and professional programs, and a recent major increase in its endowment, the Faculty is expanding its undergraduate and graduate programs. To accommodate both growth in its curricular offerings, and an increase in its research and outreach programs, a new building complex for the Faculty has just been completed on Torontos historic One Spadina Crescent.


Applications must include a cover letter, curriculum vitae, teaching dossier (to include a teaching statement, sample syllabi and course materials, teaching evaluations, and other evidence of teaching excellence), a statement outlining current and future research objectives, and representative examples of publications and research. If you have questions about this position, please contact the Deans Office (Daniels-Dean@daniels.utoronto.ca or 416-978-6192).
Please combine attachments into one or two files in PDF/MS Word format. Submission guidelines can be found at: http://uoft.me/how-to-apply.


Applicants should also provide the names and contact details of three referees directly to the department via e-mail to Daniels-Dean@daniels.utoronto.ca by the closing date.

Review of applications will begin on Tuesday, December 11, 2018, however applications will be accepted until the position is filled.

The University of Toronto is strongly committed to diversity within its community and especially welcomes applications from racialized persons / persons of colour, women, Indigenous / Aboriginal People of North America, persons with disabilities, LGBTQ persons, and others who may contribute to the further diversification of ideas.


As part of your application, you will be asked to complete a brief Diversity Survey. This survey is voluntary. Any information directly related to you is confidential and cannot be accessed by search committees or human resources staff. Results will be aggregated for institutional planning purposes. For more information, please see http://uoft.me/UP.


All qualified candidates are encouraged to apply; however, Canadians and permanent residents will be given priority.",,https://ca.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=b92b3ea94ce4dad2,b92b3ea94ce4dad2,indeed,University of Toronto
new,Associate Professor - Forest Policy and Economics,University of Toronto,"Toronto, ON",2020-01-25,"The John H. Daniels Faculty of Architecture, Landscape, and Design at the University of Toronto, invites applications for a full-time tenure stream position in the area of Forest Policy and Economics. This appointment will be at the rank of Associate Professor and will be effective January 1, 2021 or shortly thereafter.

Applicants must have earned a PhD degree in forest policy, forest economics, or an affiliated field, with demonstrated exceptional excellence in teaching and research.


Candidates will have an established international reputation and will be expected to sustain and lead innovative and independent research at the highest international level and to maintain an outstanding, competitive, and externally funded research program. Candidates must have a research agenda in any area of Forest Policy and Economics, including but not limited to; forest policy and economics in the context of settled landscapes; natural resource economics and modeling; econometrics and international trade; economic and social aspects of forest sustainability; forest certification; forest economics in relation to life cycle analysis; forest economics in relation to novel forest products. We seek candidates whose research and teaching interests complement and strengthen our existing strengths. The Programs in Forestry are set within the Daniels Faculty, which includes programs in architecture, landscape architecture, and urbanism at undergraduate, professional graduate, and PhD levels. Candidates should have a broad view of their forest economics such that they will have the demonstrated capacity to contribute to all of the design disciplines represented at the Daniels Faculty of Architecture, Landscape, and Design. For more information please visit our home page at http://www.daniels.utoronto.ca and http://forestry.utoronto.ca.


Candidates must provide evidence of research excellence as demonstrated by a record of sustained high-impact contributions, exhibitions, and other forms of peer recognition for creative and/or technically-oriented work; sustained publications in top-ranked and field relevant journals; significant high-impact participation in innovative building or planning-based projects; leading and organization of, or representation in significant international exhibitions; presentations at significant conferences, distinguished awards and accolades; other noteworthy activities that contribute to the visibility and prominence of the discipline; the submitted research statement; and strong endorsements from referees of international stature.

Candidates must demonstrate excellence in teaching, and a strong commitment to contributing to the enrichment of undergraduate and graduate programs at the Daniels Faculty. These programs would include the Bachelor of Arts, Architectural Studies, Professional Masters programs in Architecture, Landscape Architecture, and Urban Design, and the delivery of a new Ph.D. in Architecture, Landscape, and Design Studies. Excellence in teaching will be demonstrated through teaching accomplishments, the teaching dossier submitted as part of the application including a strong teaching statement, sample course syllabi, and the teaching evaluations, as well as strong letters of reference.

Salary will be commensurate with qualifications and experience.

The position will include opportunities for the candidate to collaborate with UofT colleagues in Planning/Geography, Art, Environment, Computer Science, Engineering, and Public Health, among others, as well as operational staff, and external academic and industry partners. University of Toronto faculty have access to the Canadian Research Councils, which offer grants and research funding opportunities that are unique within North America.

Set within a preeminent research university and located at the center of one of North Americas most cosmopolitan cities, the Daniels Faculty uniquely combines the disciplines of architecture, landscape architecture, art/visual studies, forestry and urban design in undergraduate, professional, and advanced graduate programs. The Daniels Faculty explores the intersections between nature, technology, architecture, and various built and natural geographies in a way that situates design, art, and foresters to meet its contemporary challenges. An emphasis on the connections between all of the design disciplines at work in the remaking of the built environment is apparent in the scholarly research and built work of many of our faculty. Following a decade-long transformation of the schools faculty and professional programs, and a recent, major increase in its endowment, the Faculty is expanding its undergraduate and graduate programs. Most recently, Forestry has been welcomed as a new program which will broaden the research and teaching reach of the Daniels Faculty. To accommodate both growth in its curricular offerings and an increase in its research and outreach programs, an awarding winning new building complex for the Faculty was recently completed on Torontos historic One Spadina Crescent.

Applications must include a cover letter, curriculum vitae, brief research statement, three examples of publications or research and a teaching dossier to include a teaching statement, sample syllabi, and teaching evaluations.


Applicants must also provide the names and contact details of three referees directly to the department via email (Daniels-Dean@daniels.utoronto.ca) by the closing date.

All application materials must be received by March 2, 2020.


Please note that you may submit up to 15 attachments per candidate profile (not per application) no larger than 8.3MB each in PDF/MS Word format. Submission guidelines can be found at: http://uoft.me/how-to-apply.

If you have questions about this position, please contact the Deans Office (Daniels-Dean@daniels.utoronto.ca or 416-978-6192).

The University of Toronto is strongly committed to diversity within its community and especially welcomes applications from racialized persons / persons of colour, women, Indigenous / Aboriginal People of North America, persons with disabilities, LGBTQ persons, and others who may contribute to the further diversification of ideas.
As part of your application, you will be asked to complete a brief Diversity Survey. This survey is voluntary. Any information directly related to you is confidential and cannot be accessed by search committees or human resources staff. Results will be aggregated for institutional planning purposes. For more information, please see http://uoft.me/UP.

All qualified candidates are encouraged to apply; however, Canadians and permanent residents will be given priority.",,https://ca.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=0482f78e138ec54b,0482f78e138ec54b,indeed,University of Toronto
new,Associate Professor - Writing Studies in Higher Education,University of Toronto,"Toronto, ON",2020-02-07,"The University of Toronto Mississauga (UTM) invites applications for a full-time tenure stream position in the area of Writing Studies in Higher Education. The appointment will be made to the Deans Office in anticipation of the establishment of a proposed Institute focused on the study of university pedagogy at UTM. The appointment will be at the rank of Associate Professor, and will commence on September 1, 2020, or shortly thereafter.

Applicants must have earned a PhD degree in a field related to writing instruction in higher education (e.g., composition, rhetoric, writing studies). Applicants with a PhD in a different field but who have a demonstrated exceptional record of excellence in research and teaching related to academic writing instruction at the university level may also be considered. We seek candidates who are enthusiastic about contributing to the development of our new Institute and participating in UTMs advancement of writing skills, including our new foundational skills program in writing.


The successful candidate will have established research expertise in university-level pedagogy related to Writing Studies, Rhetoric and Composition, Writing Across the Curriculum (WAC), or Writing in the Disciplines (WID) broadly. Candidates will have an established international reputation and will be expected to sustain and lead innovative and independent research at the highest international level and to maintain an outstanding, competitive, and externally funded research program. Candidates must possess a demonstrated commitment to excellent pedagogical practices. The successful candidate may hold a graduate faculty appointment in the Department of Leadership, Higher and Adult Education at the Ontario Institute for Studies in Education (OISE), University of Toronto.

Candidates must provide evidence of research excellence as demonstrated by a record of sustained high-impact contributions and publications in top-ranked and relevant journals, the submitted research statement, presentations at significant conferences, distinguished awards and accolades, and other noteworthy activities that contribute to the visibility and prominence of university-level writing pedagogy, as well as strong endorsements from referees of high standing.

Candidates must provide evidence of excellence in teaching through teaching accomplishments, awards and accolades, strong endorsements of teaching in the letters of reference, and a teaching dossier submitted as part of the application including a strong teaching statement, sample syllabi, course materials and teaching evaluations.


Salary will be commensurate with qualifications and experience.


The University of Toronto Mississauga has a diverse, multicultural student body and a modern and spacious campus with high-quality teaching spaces. It is in the process of creating a new Institute focused on the study of pedagogy at the university level. This Institute will build on the success of the UTM Teaching and Learning Collaboration (TLC) and Robert Gillespie Academic Skills Centre (RGASC), both of which will be incorporated within the new unit. The Institute will also be the home of UTMs new Writing Studies faculty members, the Foundational Writing Skills Initiative which will be implemented over the next five years, and the existing writing programs currently administered by the RGASC.

All qualified candidates are invited to apply online by clicking the link below. Applicants must submit a cover letter; a current curriculum vitae; a research statement outlining current and future research interests; one recent publication (of no more than 30 pages); and a teaching dossier that includes a teaching statement, sample syllabi, course materials and teaching evaluations. Equity and diversity are among UTMs core values and are essential to academic excellence; for these reasons, we seek candidates who value diversity and whose research, teaching and service align with our commitment to equity. Candidates are therefore asked to include a diversity statement, consisting of a 1-2 page statement of contributions to equity and diversity, which might cover the candidates experience with or understanding of such topics as (but not limited to) research or teaching that incorporates a focus on underrepresented communities, the development of inclusive pedagogies, or the mentoring of students from underrepresented groups.

Applicants must also arrange to have three letters of reference sent directly by the referees via email (on letterhead, dated after July 1, 2019, and signed) to Lori Innes (lori.innes@utoronto.ca) by the closing date. The letters should be addressed to Heather Miller, Vice-Dean Teaching and Learning UTM, with the Subject line Writing Studies Associate Professor hire.

Submission guidelines can be found at http://uoft.me/how-to-apply. We ask that candidates combine requested documents into two or three files in PDF/MS Word files in the following format:

Letter, CV, research statement, diversity statement, and teaching dossier, titled: Job#2000090-YourSurnameFirstname-application.pdf (or .doc)
The teaching dossier can be a separate document if too large to bundle with the above; if a separate document, please title as: Job#2000090-YourSurnameFirstname-teachingdossier.pdf (or .doc).
Recent publication, titled Job#2000090-YourSurnameFirstname-publication.pdf (or .doc)
PLEASE NOTE: Documents too large to be submitted to the online system (8.3 MB maximum per attachment) will not be accepted.
If you have any questions about this position, please contact Heather Miller, Vice-Dean Teaching and Learning, UTM at vdteachlearn.utm@utoronto.ca.
All application materials, including reference letters, must be received by April 6, 2020.

The University of Toronto is strongly committed to diversity within its community and especially welcomes applications from racialized persons / persons of colour, women, Indigenous / Aboriginal People of North America, persons with disabilities, LGBTQ persons, and others who may contribute to the further diversification of ideas.


As part of your application, you will be asked to complete a brief Diversity Survey. This survey is voluntary. Any information directly related to you is confidential and cannot be accessed by search committees or human resources staff. Results will be aggregated for institutional planning purposes. For more information, please see http://uoft.me/UP.


All qualified candidates are encouraged to apply; however, Canadians and permanent residents will be given priority.",,https://ca.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=95c637130c718176,95c637130c718176,indeed,University of Toronto
new,Director of Salesforce,Apex Systems Inc,"Toronto, ON",2020-02-10,"Job DescriptionJob #:  1043063 Director (Salesforce) Apex Systems is a global IT services provider and our consulting practice has an opening for a Director of Salesforce with people leadership experience and enterprise Salesforce experience to place at our client, an Enterprise Insurance giant, and to be trusted with building out a Salesforce Centre of Excellence.  Client: Enterprise Insurance Terms: Permanent Role. Perks: Competitive base salary, 17% bonus, 4 week vacation, personal days, RRSP matching, pension plan, health, dental, vision. Location: Downtown Toronto, Yonge and Bloor. Close to Line 1 and Line 2. Alternatively, option to work from Waterloo. Application Process:It is best to apply via the medium on which you are seeing this posting. If you encounter technical difficulties submitting your resume, or are unable to include the skills matrix via the platform you are seeing this post on, please send your resume in Word format along with your skills matrix to Nechama Colman at  [ Link Removed ]  and reference, Director #1043063 Due to the large volume of resumes received for Director level posts, a completed skills matrix must be included with your application detailing your fit for the role. Without this matrix, your profile will not be reviewed.  Please reply with the following skills matrix completed: Skills Matrix  At which enterprise client did you gain people leadership experience? What year? How many direct reports did you have? How many indirect reports?  Have you delivered or improved a Salesforce solution enterprise wide? Where? What year? Describe your Salesforce experience.  Job Description  As Director, you will lead a team, responsible for running our platform roadmap to delivery, and accountable for platform profitability, and act as SME on platform for clients and teams within the organization, lead KPI development, and drive implementation of standard methodologies. You will own the customer issues from inception, to resolution including after hours or on call work as necessary. You will assist in investigation and resolution of all client, product/platform issues in a multi-vendor environment. Situation will involve a variety of technologies, protocols and equipment. You and your team will be responsible for consistent delivery of product services on a 247 basis within well-defined quality metrics including 99.99% up time.  Responsibilities  Lead the Salesforce Center of Excellence and Digital Collaboration team Responsible for a portfolio of clients, while reporting to Senior Managers and above Be involved in the financial management of clients Contribute to the development of your own and teams technical acumen Develop strategies to solve complex technical challenges Assist in the management and delivering of large projects Mentoring, and develop high performing staff Plan and lead upgrades activities Ensure Governance of Security Model and Risk Deploy Third party solutions and coordinate solutions transition to operations Collaborate and develop internal relationships with key partners, other IS groups, operational support teams and vendors to ensure Investment Division requirements are understood.  Knowledge and Competencies  University degree (Computer Science or related discipline preferred) or equivalent experience 5 or more years of management experience in a large, multinational organization, experience within financial services or insurance industry preferred 5 or more years specific hands on experience in the support and administration of the Salesforce platform; detailed experience with Salesforce architecture, CRM standard methodologies and the AppExchange eco-system, in-depth understanding of constraints of the Salesforce CRM applications (Sales Cloud, Service Cloud, Communities). Broad knowledge of other related technical disciplines: middleware, database, capacity, performance management, etc. Knowledge of emerging technologies and vendor landscape; ability to quickly comprehend the functions, capabilities, and impact of new technologies. Enjoy working in a team with the ability to effectively communicate, cooperate, and collaborate; Ability to lead and influence technical peers and decision makers, experience presenting to various audiences Knowledge of financial models and budgeting; ability to estimate the financial impact of technology alternatives and to balance costs against benefits. Experience working with Agile methodologies Advanced Salesforce certification(s) are highly preferred  Interview Times: Following screening via Apex Systems, there will be a brief telephonic interview with the client and then 1-2 in person rounds with our clients senior leadership. EEO Employer- Apex is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Apex will consider qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable law. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at  [ Phone number blocked ] .         EEO EmployerApex Systems is an equal opportunity employer. We do not discriminate or allow discrimination on the basis of race, color, religion, creed, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, breastfeeding, or related medical conditions), age, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, ancestry, citizenship, genetic information, registered domestic partner status, marital status, disability, status as a crime victim, protected veteran status, political affiliation, union membership, or any other characteristic protected by law. Apex will consider qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable law. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at   [ Phone number blocked ] .* University degree (Computer Science or related discipline preferred) or equivalent experience * 5 or more years of management experience in a large, multinational organization, experience within financial services or insurance industry preferred * 5 or more years specific hands on experience in the support and administration of the Salesforce platform; detailed experience with Salesforce architecture, CRM standard methodologies and the AppExchange eco-system, in-depth understanding of constraints of the Salesforce CRM applications (Sales Cloud, Service Cloud, Communities). * Broad knowledge of other related technical disciplines: middleware, database, capacity, performance management, etc. * Knowledge of emerging technologies and vendor landscape; ability to quickly comprehend the functions, capabilities, and impact of new technologies. * Enjoy working in a team with the ability to effectively communicate, cooperate, and collaborate; * Ability to lead and influence technical peers and decision makers, experience presenting to various audiences * Knowledge of financial models and budgeting; ability to estimate the financial impact of technology alternatives and to balance costs against benefits. * Experience working with Agile methodologies * Advanced Salesforce certification(s) are highly preferred",,https://job-openings.monster.ca/director-of-salesforce-toronto-on-ca-apex-systems-inc/215740253,215740253,monster,University of Toronto
new,Bilingual Inside Sales Representative,BlueSky Personnel Solutions,"Toronto, ON",2020-02-10,"Our client located downtown is currently looking for a Bilingual Inside Sales Representative to add to their growing team.What's in it for you:Work for a leader in its industryCompetitive compensation packageFun and rewarding environmentTTC accessibleWorking hours: Monday to Friday 8:30am-5:30pmIn this role, you will be responsible for:Contacting prospective customers through leadsAnswer questions and promote products through various online toolsPresent and sell company products through presentationsOngoing research on new business opportunitiesAny other duties as requiredThe ideal candidate will possess:Fluently bilingual on both French/English3-5 years of inside sales experience/ business developmentPrevious experience selling POS and/or CRM preferredStrong technical, hospitality and/or retail experienceCollege or university degreeStrong desire to work in salesStrong closing skillsPlease note, a criminal background check is required for the successful candidate.Send your resume today to be considered for this position.APPLY DIRECTLY TO THIS POSITION AT:  http://www.blueskypersonnel.com/current-jobs/?referenceId=003579 To get the latest job opportunities > Sign-up to receive our latest job opportunities, Like us on Facebook, Follow us on Twitter and Connect with us on LinkedinBlueSky Personnel Solutions is an equal opportunity employer who welcomes resumes from all interested. We welcome and encourage applications from people with disabilities. Accommodations are available on request for candidates taking part in all aspects of the selection process. To request an accommodation, please contact BlueSky Personnel Solutions.We thank you in advance for your interest, however, only those selected for a pre-screen and/or an interview will be contacted.",,https://job-openings.monster.ca/bilingual-inside-sales-representative-toronto-on-ca-bluesky-personnel-solutions/215747039,215747039,monster,University of Toronto
new,Data Engineer,TAL Group Inc,"Toronto, ON",2020-02-10,"Our client is hiring a full-time Data Engineer in Toronto, ON! This is the opportunity to join a team that feels like a family, where valuing each other is one of our most important core values.Perks You'll Love- Join a well-established company with a stellar reputation- Competitive compensation package including base, bonus and company health benefits- Ongoing professional training & coaching and plenty of room for growth and learningIn this role, you will be responsible for attaining the following goals:- Attaining a minimum of 1 new accreditation/certification per year- Spending 80% or more of their time on billable work- Completing 90% or more of their agile delivery tasks on time- Demonstrating competency in 1 new relevant technology every yearWhat You'll Be Doing- Conduct relevant customer interviews to determine key business requirements and objectives- Build appropriate analytical data models based on outcomes of user interviews- Analyze and profile data systems to build source to target data mappings- Build required ETL to populate target designed data warehouse and/or data lake- Review ETL performance and conducts performance tuning as required on mappings/workflows or SQL- Administration and support of data integration infrastructure- 2nd level on-call support of ETL services as requiredSkills You're Bringing- University/College degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Data Science and/or Relevant Degree- 5+ years hands-on development, configuration, scripting and administration experience with Data Integration platforms. (i.e. Informatica, Talend, DataStage, SSIS)- BI Experience (MicroStrategy, Looker, Tableau, PowerBI) considered a nice to have- Extensive theoretical and practical knowledge of data warehousing principles/concepts and practical development experience in all areas of the data warehousing life cycle- Experience with Data Management, ETL, Cloud Data (AWS), Data Integration- Knowledge of OLAP-related principles and concepts- Strong grasp of data modeling techniques and concepts (Normalized/Denormalized, Conceptual/Logical/Physical, Star, Snowflake, Data Vault)- Strong knowledge and experience with relational databases such as Snowflake, SQL Server, Oracle (Advanced knowledge of reading and writing SQL, Performance analysis and tuning)- Knowledge and experience with key Big Data technologies (Hive, Presto, Spark, Kafka, NoSQL databases, Semi-structured data access patterns (Json, Parquet, XML, etc.))- Strong Python scripting skills- Excellent communication skills- Great problem-solving skills- Leadership and good client management skillsWe Are An Equal Opportunity EmployerAll qualified applicants will receive equal consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.Canadian Work AuthorizationAll applicants MUST be authorized to work in Canada. Any applicants not meeting this criteria will not be notified and will not be considered eligible for the position.",,https://job-openings.monster.ca/data-engineer-toronto-on-ca-tal-group-inc/215744820,215744820,monster,University of Toronto
new,"Project Manager, IT Security",VTRAC Consulting Corporation,"TORONTO, ON",2020-02-05,"VTRAC Consulting CorporationIntelligent ResourcesThank you for applying to VTRAC opportunities. Please e-mail your resume as a MS-WORD document in confidence Subject: Project Manager, IT Security, position number: 9567, Attention: sergiik@vtrac.com  or call: 416-366-2600 Ext. 236Position No.:           9567Title:                Project Manager, IT Security Type:                Contract (must be bale to start on March 1, 2020)No. of Positions:        1Location:  GTAPosition Description:This is an opportunity for a Security Project Manager working on IT Security outsourcing, making sure that all aspects executed successfully and complaint. The role including but not limited to infrastructure, network and application security. This is a critical position working with internal teams, vendors and senior executives.Requirements:Lead the delivery of the projectMinimum 12 years of experience in the IT environmentMinimum 5 years of experience managing IT Security projectsExperience of outsourcing IT Security to external vendorsExtensive experience in IT security outsourcing process, procedures, incident prevention, BCP, DRP, readiness and documentation evolution.Minimum one of year experience working and fully familiar with Agile Program/Project ManagementExtensive experience in leading multiple project environmentExperience in financial industry is an assetWork well in a collaborative environmentExcellent communication and presentation skillsExperience getting into the details and maintain project controlExtensive previous experience in the IT industry as a hands-on infrastructure engineer or developer preferredUniversity degree in Computer Science/Engineering or working experience in related fieldWe thank all candidates in advance. Only selected candidates for interviews will be contacted. For other exciting opportunities, please visit us at www.vtrac.com. VTRAC is an equal opportunity employer.",,https://job-openings.monster.ca/project-manager-it-security-toronto-on-ca-vtrac-consulting-corporation/215630004,215630004,monster,University of Toronto
new,3PL Sales Representative (Logistics/Freight) -Toronto,INACRE CONSEIL INC,"Toronto, ON",2020-02-05,"https://inacre.ca/en/jobs/3pl-sales-representative-toronto/ Offer Summary3PL Sales Representative (Logistics/Freight) - Downtown TorontoRole and ResponsibilitiesDo you have at least 2 year of hands on Sales experience for a 3PL company?Are you a motivated and competitive individual with a strong passion for sales?Do you enjoy picking up the phone, generating leads, and building relationships?Our client, a well-established logistics firm in Toronto with a fun company culture, plenty of growth opportunities, and a competitive commission structure, is looking to add motivated and competitive individuals to their growing sales team!The duties of the Logistics/Freight Sales Representative will include but are not limited to:Generating and actively developing new business through cold/warm callingClosing deals to reach monthly, quarterly, and yearly quotasCoordinate all freight orders made by your clients and ensure on time deliveryProvide efficient customer service to resolve any issues with clients and carriersNegotiate and research rates to ensure competitive pricesPLEASE NOTE: This role requires candidates to COLD CALLRequirements and experiencesAt least 2 years of hands on Sales experience for a 3PL company is a MUSTAbility to COLD CALL is a MUSTStrong verbal and written communication skillsCollege or University educationImpeccable phone manner abilitiesSales orientedEnjoy reaching targets and thrive in high pressure deadline driven environmentsStrong customer service and client care abilitiesA go-getter and proactive personalityA strong interest for the industryBenefits and Other Information8am to 5pm Monday to FridayAlternating Saturdays 9am to 1pmBase Salary Negotiable depending on experienceCompetitive commission/bonus structureFun and open working environmentMonthly company events/lunchesIf you are interested, please send your application (Resume and Cover Letter) through our web site in the employment section https://inacre.ca/en/jobs/3pl-sales-representative-toronto/or directly via email to alex.pike@inacre.ca For further information, you can visit our web site  https://inacre.ca/en/jobs/  or contact us via phone at 416 550 5135 ext 231We thank everyone who submits their application. However, only those selected will be contacted for an interview.We offer a reference bonus of a minimum of $200 if you present someone who is hired. Visit  https://inacre.ca/en/about-us/referal-program/  or contact us for details.",,https://job-openings.monster.ca/3pl-sales-representative-logistics-freight-toronto-toronto-on-ca-inacre-conseil-inc/214896213,3,monster,University of Toronto
new,Wholesale Trading Manager,Northernchem Inc.,"NIAGARA FALLS, ON",2020-02-03,"Northernchem Inc., headquartered in Niagara Falls, Ontario, is a Canadian high-tech chemical and pharmaceutical company providing quality products and research & development. Our business includes (1) New drug R&D (2) Generic drugs (3) Pharmaceutical intermediates (4) Natural & health products (5) 3D printing of medical models and parts.We employ top scientists, the majority of whom hold a Ph.D. and have Postdoctoral experience from well recognized universities such as: Harvard University, University of California, U.S. National Institutes of Health, Queens University, University of Toronto, etc. In addition to their world-class education, our scientists have many academic papers published in peer-reviewed journals, such as Nature, Cell, Cancer Research, etc. By employing exceptional individuals of various backgrounds, we gain well-rounded insight to stay competitive within our field.Our company is currently looking for a Wholesale Trading Manager.The Ideal candidate will perform the following Job duties: Study market research and trends to determine consumer demand, potential sales volumes and effect of competitors' operations on sales; Determine merchandise and services to be sold; Analyze market research and trends to ensure the Trade Team is provided with up to date knowledge of the market; Manage staff and assign duties; Create and present the wholesale strategies; Plan budgets and monitor revenues and expenses; Establish organizational policies and procedures in relation to sales; Lead sales team in building relationships with business clients and manage negotiations of sales contracts;Skill Requirement:  Minimum 2 years of management experience; Demonstrated and exceptional leadership skills; Effective interpersonal skills; Flexibility and Excellent oral communication; Self-motivated, continuously seeking to succeed and progress in career within the company.",,https://job-openings.monster.ca/wholesale-trading-manager-niagara-falls-on-ca-northernchem-inc/215567822,215567822,monster,University of Toronto
new,"Senior Vice President, Production",Guru Studio,"TORONTO, ON",2020-01-23,"At Guru Studio, we put creativity first! Were more than an animation production facility, were an entertainment company specializing in development and content creation through to marketing, licensing and content sales. We combine a proven production pipeline and facility support with a nimble attitude of always being open to change in a collaborative environment. Our teams are best in class and are world leaders in the creation of 2D Harmony and 3D animated kids and family content.Our partners include Netflix, Nickelodeon, Disney, and Spin Master to just name a few. Best known for hits such as True and the Rainbow Kingdom, Justin Time and PAW Patrol, and the Nora Twomey Directed Feature Film The Breadwinner, our exceptional work is produced by artists at the top of their game.Our corporate team is the backbone of our productions and we are looking to grow with the addition of a dynamic and enthusiastic Senior Vice President, Production.Company Operating Name: Guru StudioBusiness Address: 110 Spadina Ave #1000, Toronto, ON M5V 2K4Title of the Position: Senior Vice President, ProductionJob Duties: Work closely with Series Producers, Directors and the production teams to ensure all productions are produced at the highest creative level.Maintain and develop business relationships with production partners.Support the Senior Management team to proactively build and strengthen current and future client partnerships.Further develop production pipelines, track the current business climate and make necessary recommendations to ensure Guru remains an industry leader in the creation of childrens television.Participate in formulating and administering company policies, directing and coordinating divisional department activities to develop and implement long range goals to meet business growth objectives.Supervise and manage cost reports.Work with Recruitment on management of internal and external talent.Support and promote our company culture by creating a work environment that fosters creativity, innovation and high staff morale.Develop and maintain relationships with existing stakeholders to support growth objectives.Skills Requirements: 10+ years in a middle and/or senior producer role in television series production.5+ years of production experience in the animation field.Extensive knowledge of all aspects of animation project bidding, budgeting, production and physical media delivery and distribution.Experience with production tracking/workflow softwareUniversity degree/college diploma in communication, broadcasting, production or another similar arts discipline.Strong team management track record.Exceptional leadership and motivational abilities.Approachable demeanor and ability to problem solve interpersonal and systemic issues.Terms of Employment: Full time, permanentAnticipated Start Date: As soon as possibleLanguage of Work: EnglishWage: CAD $200,000-$300,000.00 / year commiserate with experienceHours: 40-44 hours/week with variation according to tasks requiring completionBenefits Package: Disability benefits, life insurance benefits, vision care benefits, dental benefits, group insurance benefits, medical benefitsFour (4) weeks vacation per annumEligibility for a discretionary bonus of up to 10%Eligibility for a relocation allowance of up to CAD $10,000.00 on account of applicable and reasonable moving costs inclusive of hotel expenses, mileage, food, moving company costs and similar expendituresEligibility for temporary accommodation (a furnished one-bedroom apartment) for one monthEligibility for two (2) Premium Economy plane tickets for one-way travel from employees place of residence to Toronto, OntarioReimbursement for up to CAD $125.00 per month for mobile phone chargesLocation of Work: Toronto, Ontario; Occasional domestic and/or international travel will be requiredContact information: Alexandra GooderhamTalent & Recruitment Manager(416) 599-4878 (between 9:00 am and 5:00 pm EST)careers@gurustudio.com",,https://job-openings.monster.ca/senior-vice-president-production-toronto-on-ca-guru-studio/214652363,214652363,monster,University of Toronto
new,Rooms Operations Manager (OSR Toronto Market) - Canada Regional Office - (20001690),Canada Regional Office,"Mississauga, ON",2020-01-20,"Here's To Your Journey with Corporate OfficeMarriott International is the worlds largest hotel company, with more brands, more hotels and more opportunities for associates to grow and succeed. We believe a great career is a journey of discovery and exploration. So, we ask, where will your journey take you?The Canada Regional Office, located at 2425 Mathewson Blvd. E, Suite 100, Mississauga, Ontario, L4W5K4 is currently hiring a Rooms Operations Manager (OSR Toronto Market).Responsibilities include:Assists in managing the execution of all operations in the rooms area departments (e.g.,Front Office, Engineering/Maintenance, Housekeeping) and managing staff. Strives to continually improve guest and employee satisfaction and maximize the financial performance of the department. Monitors compliance with standards and procedures. Leads specific team while assisting with meeting or exceeding property goals.CANDIDATE PROFILEEducation and ExperienceHigh school diploma or GED; 4 years experience in the guest services, front desk, housekeeping, or related professional area.OR2-year degree from an accredited university in Hotel and Restaurant Management, Hospitality, Business Administration, or related major; 2 years experience in the guest services, front desk, housekeeping, or related professional area.CORE WORK ACTIVITIESLeading Room Operations TeamVerifies that goals are being translated to the team as they relate to guest tracking and productivity.Creates and nurtures a property environment that emphasizes motivation, empowerment, teamwork, continuous improvement and a passion for providing service.Understands employee and guest satisfaction results and developing game plans to attack need areas and expand on the strengths.Verifies that the team has the capabilities to meet expectations.Leads by example demonstrating self-confidence, energy and enthusiasm.Assists employees in understanding guests ever-changing needs and expectations, and exceeding them.Managing Property Rooms Operations Function(s)Assists in managing the execution of all operations in the rooms area departments (e.g., Front Office, Engineering/Maintenance, Housekeeping).Follows property specific second effort and recovery plan.Publishes all guest satisfaction results in a timely fashion including all guest satisfaction forms, comment cards and guest letters.Takes proactive approaches when dealing with employee concerns.Extends professionalism and courtesy to employees at all times.Communicates/updates all goals and results with employees.Meets semiannually with staff on a one-to-one basis.Assists/teaches the team scheduling against guest and hours/occupied room goals.Performs hourly job functions as needed.Performs other duties, as assigned, to meet business needs.Managing and Monitoring Activities that Affect the Guest ExperienceUnderstands the brand''s service culture.Provides excellent customer service by being readily available/approachable for all guests.Strives to continually improve guest and employee satisfaction.Takes proactive approaches when dealing with guest concerns.Extends professionalism and courtesy to guests at all times.Responds timely to customer service department request.Verifies that all team members meet or exceed all hospitality requirements.Managing ProfitabilityAssists in performing required annual Quality audit with General Manager (GM) & Regional Director (RD).Verifies that a viable key control program is in place.Reviews financial statements, sales and activity reports, and other performance data to measure productivity and goal achievement and to determine areas needing cost reduction and program improvement.Strives to maximize the financial performance of the department.Conducting Human Resources ActivitiesInterviews and assists in making hiring decisions.Receives hiring recommendations from team supervisors.Verifies that orientations for new team members are thorough and completed in a timely fashion.Solicits employee feedback, utilizes an open door policy, and reviews employee satisfaction results to identify and address employee problems or concerns.Verifies property policies are administered fairly and consistently, disciplinary procedures and documentation are completed according to Standard and Local Operating Procedures (SOPs and LSOPs) and support the Peer Review Process, where applicable.Celebrates successes and publicly recognizes the contributions of team members.To apply now, go to: https://jobs.marriott.com/marriott/jobs/20001690?%3Flang=en-us/&src=JB-11  Marriott International is consistently recognized as an employer of choice globally by FORTUNE magazine, DiversityInc and Great Places to Work Institute, among others. Visit www.marriott.com/careers  to learn more about our workplace culture and career opportunities.Chat, engage and follow us on social media.www.facebook.com/marriottjobsandcareers  http://www.instagram.com/marriottcareers @lifeatmarriott on SnapchatSo, we ask, where will your journey take you?-Marriott International is an equal opportunity employer committed to hiring a diverse workforce and sustaining an inclusive culture. Marriott International does not discriminate on the basis of disability, veteran status or any other basis protected under federal, state or local laws.Notification to Applicants: Canada Regional Office takes seriously its obligations under provincial human rights and accessibility legislation (such as the Accessibility for Ontarians with Disabilities Act, 2005, the Accessibility for Manitobans Act, and Nova Scotia Accessibility Act). We are happy to provide accommodations to job applicants needing assistance. If you require an accommodation in relation to this job posting, our online application or an interview, please call 905-366-5227 or emailCanadaApplicationAccommodation@marriott.comand a member of our Human Resources team will respond to your request. Please note that this phone number and email are only for those individuals who would like to request an accessibility accommodation as part of the recruiting process.",,https://job-openings.monster.ca/rooms-operations-manager-osr-toronto-market-canada-regional-office-20001690-mississauga-on-ca-canada-regional-office/215228199,215228199,monster,University of Toronto
new,"Sous Chef - The Westin Harbour Castle, Toronto - (20006397)","The Westin Harbour Castle, Toronto","Toronto, ON",2020-01-20,"Here's To Your Journey with WestinAt Westin, we are committed to empowering the well-being of our guests by providing a refreshing environment, thoughtful amenities, and revitalizing programming to help ensure that they leave feeling better than when they arrived. We recognize that travel can be disruptive to our guests well-being, and were energized to assist as partners in helping them maintain control and soaring above it all while on the road. Everything we do is designed to help guests be at their best, and they appreciate our supportive attitude, anticipatory service and extensive knowledge on how to best assist them throughout their stay. We are looking for dynamic people who are excited to join the team and ready to jump into any situation to give a helping hand. If youre someone who has is positive, adaptable and intuitive, and has a genuine interest in the well-being of others around you, we invite you to discover how at Westin, together we can rise.The Westin Harbour Castle, Toronto, located at 1 Harbour Square, Toronto, Ontario, M5J1A6 is currently hiring a Sous Chef.Responsibilities include:Accountable for overall success of the daily kitchen operations. Exhibits culinary talents by personally performing tasks while leading the staff and managing all food related functions. Works to continually improve guest and employee satisfaction while maintaining the operating budget. Supervises all kitchen areas to ensure a consistent, high quality product is produced. Responsible for guiding and developing staff including direct reports. Must ensure sanitation and food standards are achieved.CANDIDATE PROFILEEducation and Experience High school diploma or GED; 4 years experience in the culinary, food and beverage, or related professional area.OR 2-year degree from an accredited university in Culinary Arts, Hotel and Restaurant Management, or related major; 2 years experience in the culinary, food and beverage, or related professional area.CORE WORK ACTIVITIESEnsuring Culinary Standards and Responsibilities are Met Manages kitchen shift operations and ensures compliance with all Food & Beverage policies, standards and procedures. Estimates daily production needs on a weekly basis and communicates production needs to kitchen personnel daily. Assists Executive Chef with all kitchen operations and preparation. Prepares and cooks foods of all types, either on a regular basis or for special guests or functions. Develops, designs, or creates new applications, ideas, relationships, systems, or products, including artistic contributions. Assists in determining how food should be presented and creates decorative food displays. Maintains purchasing, receiving and food storage standards. Ensures compliance with food handling and sanitation standards. Performs all duties of kitchen managers and employees as necessary. Recognizes superior quality products, presentations and flavor. Ensures compliance with all applicable laws and regulations. Follows proper handling and right temperature of all food products. Operates and maintains all department equipment and reports malfunctions. Checks the quality of raw and cooked food products to ensure that standards are met.Leading Kitchen Operations Supervises and coordinates activities of cooks and workers engaged in food preparation. Leads shifts while personally preparing food items and executing requests based on required specifications. Utilizes interpersonal and communication skills to lead, influence, and encourage others; advocates sound financial/business decision making; demonstrates honesty/integrity; leads by example. Encourages and builds mutual trust, respect, and cooperation among team members. Serves as a role model to demonstrate appropriate behaviors. Maintains the productivity level of employees. Ensures employees understand expectations and parameters. Establishes and maintains open, collaborative relationships with employees and ensures employees do the same within the team. Ensures property policies are administered fairly and consistently. Communicates performance expectations in accordance with job descriptions for each position. Recognizes success performance and produces desired results.Ensuring Exceptional Customer Service Provides services that are above and beyond for customer satisfaction and retention. Manages day-to-day operations, ensuring the quality, standards and meeting the expectations of the customers on a daily basis. Sets a positive example for guest relations. Empowers employees to provide excellent customer service. Interacts with guests to obtain feedback on product quality and service levels. Handles guest problems and complaints.Maintaining Culinary Goals Achieves and exceeds goals including performance goals, budget goals, team goals, etc. Develops specific goals and plans to prioritize, organize, and accomplish your work. Utilizes the Labor Management System to effectively schedule to business demands and for tracking of employee time and attendance. Trains employees in safety procedures.Managing and Conducting Human Resource Activities Identifies the developmental needs of others and coaching, mentoring, or otherwise helping others to improve their knowledge or skills. Improves service by communicating and assisting individuals to understand guest needs, providing guidance, feedback, and individual coaching when needed. Participates in the employee performance appraisal process, providing feedback as needed. Brings issues to the attention of the department manager and Human Resources as necessary.Additional Responsibilities Provides information to supervisors, co-workers, and subordinates by telephone, in written form, e-mail, or in person. Analyzes information and evaluating results to choose the best solution and solve problems. Attends and participates in all pertinent meetings.To apply now, go to: https://jobs.marriott.com/marriott/jobs/20006397?%3Flang=en-us&src=JB-11 Marriott International is consistently recognized as an employer of choice globally by FORTUNE magazine, DiversityInc and Great Places to Work Institute, among others. Visit www.marriott.com/careers  to learn more about our workplace culture and career opportunities.Chat, engage and follow us on social media.www.facebook.com/marriottjobsandcareers  http://www.instagram.com/marriottcareers @lifeatmarriott on SnapchatSo, we ask, where will your journey take you?-Marriott International is an equal opportunity employer committed to hiring a diverse workforce and sustaining an inclusive culture. Marriott International does not discriminate on the basis of disability, veteran status or any other basis protected under federal, state or local laws.Notification to Applicants: The Westin Harbour Castle, Torontotakes seriously its obligations under provincial human rights and accessibility legislation (such as the Accessibility for Ontarians with Disabilities Act, 2005, the Accessibility for Manitobans Act, and Nova Scotia Accessibility Act). We are happy to provide accommodations to job applicants needing assistance. If you require an accommodation in relation to this job posting, our online application or an interview, please call 905-366-5227 or emailCanadaApplicationAccommodation@marriott.comand a member of our Human Resources team will respond to your request. Please note that this phone number and email are only for those individuals who would like to request an accessibility accommodation as part of the recruiting process.",,https://job-openings.monster.ca/sous-chef-the-westin-harbour-castle-toronto-20006397-toronto-on-ca-the-westin-harbour-castle-toronto/215230823,215230823,monster,University of Toronto
new,Director of Venues - Sheraton Centre Toronto Hotel - (20002397),Sheraton Centre Toronto Hotel,"Toronto, ON",2020-01-20,"Here's To Your Journey with SheratonAt Sheraton, we go above and beyond in everything we do. We are inspired by our guests and one another  and are driven to make things better. We love what we do, and we give it all weve got  on property and off. When guests stay with us, its not just a room with a bed that theyre buying. Its an experience. Were looking for someone who is ready to go beyond in everything they do. If you are someone with a genuine drive to improve your life and the lives of those around you, we encourage you to explore careers with Sheraton.The Sheraton Centre Toronto Hotel, located at 123 Queen St W, Toronto, Ontario, M5H2M9 is currently hiring a Director of Venues.Responsibilities include:Manages all restaurant operations and staff on a daily basis. Areas of responsibility include Restaurants/Bars and Room Service. As a department head, directs and works with the food and beverage/culinary management team and employees to successfully execute all restaurant operations. Strives to continually improve guest and employee satisfaction and maximize the financial performance in areas of responsibility.CANDIDATE PROFILEEducation and Experience High school diploma or GED; 6 years experience in the food and beverage, culinary, event management, or related professional area.OR 2-year degree from an accredited university in Food Service Management, Hotel and Restaurant Management, Hospitality, Business Administration, or related major; 4 years experience in the food and beverage, culinary, event management, or related professional area.Skills and KnowledgeCustomer and Personal Service- Knowledge of principles and processes for providing customer and personal services. This includes customer needs assessment, meeting quality standards for services, and evaluation of customer satisfaction.Economics and Accounting- Knowledge of economic and accounting principles and practices, P&L statements, operating budgets, forecasting and scheduling, and the reporting of financial data.Analytical/Critical Thinking- The ability to gather and organize information using a logical and systematic process; recognize patterns and relationships in complex data; examine data to identify implications, problems and draw appropriate conclusions; generate alternative solutions to problems; evaluate strengths, weaknesses and consequences of alternative solutions and approaches to solving problems.Management of Financial Resources- Determining how money will be spent to get the work done, and accounting for these expenditures.Administration and Management -Knowledge of business and management principles involved in strategic planning, resource allocation, human resources modeling, leadership technique, production methods, and coordination of people and resources.Applied Business Knowledge- Understanding market dynamics, enterprise level objectives and important aspects of the companys business to accurately diagnose strengths and weaknesses, anticipate opportunities and risks, identify issues, and develop strategies and plans. Aligning individual and team actions with strategies and plans to drive business results.Food Production and Presentation- Knowledge of techniques and equipment for preparing and presenting food products (both plant and animal) for consumption, including storage/handling techniques and sanitation standards.Management of Material Resources- Obtaining and seeing to the appropriate use of equipment, facilities, and materials needed to do certain work.CORE WORK ACTIVITIESManaging Day-to-Day Operations Estimate food, liquor, wine, and other beverage consumption in order to anticipate amounts to be purchased or requisitioned. Facilitates pre-meal briefings with the Chef and Restaurant Managers to educate restaurant staff on menu items including ingredients, preparation methods and unique tastes. Maintains service and sanitation standards in restaurant, bar/lounge and room service areas. Order and purchase equipment and supplies. Oversees the booking and manages service of restaurant parties, special events and room service hospitality suites.Developing and Maintaining Budgets Manages department''s controllable expenses to achieve or exceed budgeted goals. Understands the impact of department''s operation on the overall property financial goals.Leading Food and Beverage Team Establishes challenging, realistic and obtainable goals to guide operation and performance. Utilizes interpersonal and communication skills to lead, influence, and encourage others; advocates sound financial/business decision making; demonstrates honesty/integrity; leads by example. Encourages and builds mutual trust, respect, and cooperation among team members. Achieves and exceeds goals including performance goals, budget goals, team goals, etc. Serves as a role model to demonstrate appropriate behaviors. Develops means to improve profit, including estimating cost and benefit, exploring new business opportunities, etc. Identifies the developmental needs of others and coaches, mentors, or otherwise helps others to improve their knowledge or skills. Acts as the guest service role model for the restaurants, sets a good example of excellent customer service, and creates a positive atmosphere for guest relations. Displays leadership in guest hospitality, exemplifies excellent customer service and creates a positive atmosphere for guest relations. Ensures cash control and liquor control procedures are followed by all Restaurant, Bar/Lounge and Room Service employees. Ensures compliance with all food & beverage policies, standards and procedures by training, supervising, follow-up and hands on management. Ensures compliance with food handling and sanitation standards. Ensures staff understands all applicable liquor laws. Establishes guidelines for customer service so employees understand expectations and parameters. Strives to improve service performance.Ensuring Exceptional Customer Service Provides services that are above and beyond for customer satisfaction and retention. Improves service by communicating and assisting individuals to understand guest needs, providing guidance, feedback, and individual coaching when needed. Estimates cost and benefit ratio, maintaining balance between profit and service satisfaction. Empowers employees to provide excellent customer service. Incorporates guest satisfaction as a component of departmental meetings with a focus on continuous improvement. Interacts with guests to obtain feedback on product quality and service levels. Meets with guests on an informal basis during meals or upon departure to obtain feedback on quality of food and beverage, service levels and overall satisfaction. Responds effectively to guest problems and handles complaints. Reviews guest satisfaction feedback with employees to develop appropriate corrective action.Managing and ConductingHuman Resource Activities Provides guidance and direction to subordinates, including setting performance standards and monitoring performance. Ensures that expectations and objectives are clearly communicated to subordinates; subordinates are also open to raise questions and/or concerns. Administers the performance appraisal process for direct report managers. Communicates performance expectations in accordance with job descriptions for each position and monitors progress. Ensures employees are treated fairly and equitably. Ensures property policies are administered fairly and consistently. Interviews and hires management and hourly employees with the appropriate skills to meet the business needs of the operation. Observes service behaviors of employees and provides feedback to individuals and or managers.Additional Responsibilities Informs and/or update the executives, the peers and the subordinates on relevant information in a timely manner. Provides information to supervisors, co-workers, and subordinates by telephone, in written form, e-mail, or in person. Analyzes information and evaluating results to choose the best solution and solve problems.To apply now, go to: https://jobs.marriott.com/marriott/jobs/20002397?%3Flang=en-us&src=JB-11 Marriott International is consistently recognized as an employer of choice globally by FORTUNE magazine, DiversityInc and Great Places to Work Institute, among others. Visit www.marriott.com/careers  to learn more about our workplace culture and career opportunities.Chat, engage and follow us on social media.www.facebook.com/marriottjobsandcareers  http://www.instagram.com/marriottcareers @lifeatmarriott on SnapchatSo, we ask, where will your journey take you?-Marriott International is an equal opportunity employer committed to hiring a diverse workforce and sustaining an inclusive culture. Marriott International does not discriminate on the basis of disability, veteran status or any other basis protected under federal, state or local laws.Notification to Applicants: Sheraton Centre Toronto Hotel takes seriously its obligations under provincial human rights and accessibility legislation (such as the Accessibility for Ontarians with Disabilities Act, 2005, the Accessibility for Manitobans Act, and Nova Scotia Accessibility Act). We are happy to provide accommodations to job applicants needing assistance. If you require an accommodation in relation to this job posting, our online application or an interview, please call 905-366-5227 or emailCanadaApplicationAccommodation@marriott.comand a member of our Human Resources team will respond to your request. Please note that this phone number and email are only for those individuals who would like to request an accessibility accommodation as part of the recruiting process.",,https://job-openings.monster.ca/director-of-venues-sheraton-centre-toronto-hotel-20002397-toronto-on-ca-sheraton-centre-toronto-hotel/215229583,215229583,monster,University of Toronto
new,Director of Front Office - The St. Regis Toronto - (20004664),The St. Regis Toronto,"Toronto, ON",2020-01-20,"Here's To Your Journey with St. RegisThe St. Regis brand first established luxury hospitality more than 110 years ago, with the opening of the St. Regis New York. From the moment John Jacob Astor IV opened the doors of his Beaux-Arts masterpiece on New Yorks Fifth Avenue, St. Regis has stood as a symbol of uncompromising elegance and bespoke service. Today, with more than 40 of the best addresses around the world, St. Regis is a place where trends are born, boundaries are broken and guests can simply live exquisite. We invite you to explore careers at St. Regis.The St. Regis Toronto, located at 325 Bay Street, Toronto, Ontario, M5H 4G3 is currently hiring a Director of Front Office.Responsibilities include:Responsible for all front office functions and staff as well as security staff functions. Areas of responsibility include Bell Staff, Switchboard Operations, Guest Services/Front Desk, Retail/Gift Shop, Concierge, Valets, and Security, as applicable. As a department head, directs and works with managers and employees to successfully execute all front office operations, including guest arrival and departure procedures. Works to establish a safe and secure environment for all guests and associates. Strives to continually improve guest and employee satisfaction and maximize the financial performance of the department.CANDIDATE PROFILEEducation and Experience High school diploma or GED; 6 years experience in the guest services, front desk, or related professional area.OR 2-year degree from an accredited university in Hotel and Restaurant Management, Hospitality, Business Administration or related major; 4 years experience in the guest services, front desk, or related professional area.CORE WORK ACTIVITIESLeading Front Desk, Guest Services, and Security Teams Utilizes interpersonal and communication skills to lead, influence, and encourage others; advocates sound financial/business decision making; demonstrates honesty/integrity; leads by example. Encourages and builds mutual trust, respect, and cooperation among team members. Serves as a role model to demonstrate appropriate behaviors. Supervises and manages employees. Manages all day-to-day operations. Understands employee positions well enough to perform duties in employees'' absence. Establishes and maintains open, collaborative relationships with employees and ensures employees do the same within the team. Ensures recognition of employees is taking place across areas of responsibility. Communicates performance expectations in accordance with job descriptions for each position and monitors progress. Celebrates successes and publicly recognizes the contributions of team members.Managing Guest Services and Front Desk Teams Achieves and exceeds goals including performance goals, budget goals, team goals, etc. Manages day-to-day operations, ensuring the quality, standards and meeting the expectations of the customers on a daily basis. Develops specific goals and plans to prioritize, organize, and accomplish work. Keeps Front Office team focused on the critical components of operations to drive guest satisfaction and the desired financial results. Conducts department meetings and continually communicates a clear and consistent message regarding department goals to produce desired results. Supervises and coordinates all activities for luggage attendants, garage valets, door attendants, and concierge. Reviews staffing levels to ensure that guest service, operational needs and financial objectives are met. Understands the impact of Front Office operations on the Rooms area and overall property financial goals. Manages department controllable expenses to achieve or exceed budgeted goals. Provide recommendations and reports for capital expenditures, repairs and maintenance programs for all front office areas. Handle guest complaints and verify that all guest issues are resolved.Managing Security Team Protects property and provides a safe environment for guests and staff. Oversees all on-duty security personnel, including dispatcher. Supervises and coordinates job assignments and verifies that each officer is briefed on the days activities. Complies information and files written security reports.Managing Projects and Policies Verifies compliance with all Front Office policies, standards and procedures. Verifies property policies are administered fairly and consistently, disciplinary procedures and documentation are completed according to Standard and Local Operating Procedures (SOPs and LSOPs) and support the Peer Review Process.Providing Exceptional Customer Service Provides services that are above and beyond for customer satisfaction and retention. Coordinates activities with other hotel departments in order to facilitate incrased levels of communication and guest satisfaction. Improves service by communicating and assisting individuals to understand guest needs, providing guidance, feedback, and individual coaching when needed. Supervises and managing employees. Managing all day-to-day operations. Understanding employee positions well enough to perform duties in employees'' absence. Acts as the Service Champion for the Front Office and creates a positive atmosphere for guest relations. Displays leadership in guest hospitality, exemplifies excellent customer service, and creates a positive atmosphere for guest relations. Strives to improve service performance. Empowers employees to provide excellent customer service. Verifies that all Front Office areas have an atmosphere that is conducive to the overall guest experience. Reviews comment cards, guest satisfaction results and other data to identify areas of improvement. Responds to and handles guest problems and complaints. Observes service behaviors of employees and provides feedback to individuals and/or managers.Managing and Conducting Human Resource Activities Identifies the developmental needs of others and coaching, mentoring, or otherwise helping others to improve their knowledge or skills. Provides guidance and direction to subordinates, including setting performance standards and monitoring performance. Establishes challenging, realistic and obtainable goals to guide operation and performance. Solicits employee feedback, utilizes an open door policy, and reviews employee satisfaction results to identify and address employee problems or concerns. Verifies employees are treated fairly and equitably. Manages employee progressive discipline procedures for Front Office Staff. Administers the performance appraisal process for direct report managers. Interviews and hires managers and hourly employee team members with the appropriate skills and in a timely manner to meet the business needs of the operation.Additional Responsibilities Provides information to supervisors, co-workers, and subordinates by telephone, in written form, e-mail, or in person. Analyzes information and evaluating results to choose the best solution and solve problems. Informs and/or updates the executives, the peers and the subordinates on relevant information in a timely manner. Identifies and analyzes departmental operational challenges and facilitates the development of solutions to prevent reoccurrence.To apply now, go to: https://jobs.marriott.com/marriott/jobs/20004664?%3Flang=en-us/&src=JB-11 Marriott International is consistently recognized as an employer of choice globally by FORTUNE magazine, DiversityInc and Great Places to Work Institute, among others. Visit www.marriott.com/careers  to learn more about our workplace culture and career opportunities.Chat, engage and follow us on social media.www.facebook.com/marriottjobsandcareers  http://www.instagram.com/marriottcareers @lifeatmarriott on SnapchatSo, we ask, where will your journey take you?-Marriott International is an equal opportunity employer committed to hiring a diverse workforce and sustaining an inclusive culture. Marriott International does not discriminate on the basis of disability, veteran status or any other basis protected under federal, state or local laws.Notification to Applicants: The St. Regis Torontotakes seriously its obligations under provincial human rights and accessibility legislation (such as the Accessibility for Ontarians with Disabilities Act, 2005, the Accessibility for Manitobans Act, and Nova Scotia Accessibility Act). We are happy to provide accommodations to job applicants needing assistance. If you require an accommodation in relation to this job posting, our online application or an interview, please call 905-366-5227 or emailCanadaApplicationAccommodation@marriott.comand a member of our Human Resources team will respond to your request. Please note that this phone number and email are only for those individuals who would like to request an accessibility accommodation as part of the recruiting process.",,https://job-openings.monster.ca/director-of-front-office-the-st-regis-toronto-20004664-toronto-on-ca-the-st-regis-toronto/215229623,215229623,monster,University of Toronto
new,Refrigeration/Air Conditioning Systems Mechanic (2 vacancies),Ryerson University,"TORONTO, ON",2020-01-16,"About RyersonAt the intersection of mind and action, Ryerson is on a transformative path to become Canadas leading comprehensive innovation university. Integral to this path is the placement of equity, diversity and inclusion as fundamental to our institutional culture. Our current academic plan outlines each as core values and we work to embed them in all that we do. As an employer, were working towards a people first culture and we're proud to have been selected as one of Canada's Best Diversity Employers and one of Greater Toronto's Top Employer for 2015, 2016, and 2017. To learn more about our work environment and innovative educational environment, visit  http://www.ryerson.ca, check out @RyersonU, @RyersonHR & @RyersonECI on Twitter & visit our LinkedIn page.About Facilities Management and DevelopmentRyersons Facilities Management and Development (FMD) department involves the care of the physical environment of the campus and strategic planning for existing and future spaces, including the impacts of those spaces.The Maintenance and Operations division within FMD supports the heating, plumbing, electrical and carpentry needs of Ryerson University across over four million square feet of campus. Maintenance and Operations staff provide a mix of on-demand work requests and planned service, including managing service contracts for major equipment and oversight of ongoing infrastructure improvements.The OpportunityWe are looking for a licensed and experiencedRefrigeration/Air Conditioning Systems Mechanicto join our team! This is afull-time permanent position. In this position, you will be responsible for maintaining the mechanical equipment of Ryerson University in an efficient, safe and serviceable operating condition on a continuing basis. This includes coordinating preventive and corrective maintenance, inspecting, troubleshooting, repairing and modifying building mechanical systems, control systems and wide variety of machines and equipment. You will also be committed to providing excellent client service to staff, faculty, students and the Ryerson University community.Responsibilities may include, but are not limited to the following:Maintains and troubleshoots all heat pumps, packaged A/C units, and related auxiliary equipment.Maintenance of steam traps, strainers, valves, packings, controls, etc, which form part of the boiler plant, cooling plant and HVAC systems.Installs and relocates machines and equipment.Maintains and operates heating and cooling equipment, and all machine tools in the maintenance shop for fabricating and metalworking.Undertakes a comprehensive preventative maintenance program and ensures proper maintenance cycles are maintained and reported to the supervisor.Assists the Supervisor in training of Maintenance Mechanic B personnel.Follows safe work practices while undertaking duties.Informs supervisor of all abnormalities, defects, and malfunctioned equipment.Performs all duties of Maintenance Mechanic B if required.Keeps up-to-date with changing technology and techniques pertinent to the trade.Please refer to the job description for all responsibilities (Available upon request).QualificationsSuccessful completion of an Ontario license as a Journeyperson Refrigeration/Air Conditioning Systems Mechanic 313A, ODP license and Gas Fitter 2 license.Minimum of five (5) years of related work experience carrying out general maintenance in a complex industrial, commercial or education facility.Required experience includes:Gas and arc welding; metal machining; light gauge metal fabrication;Fitting and setting machine components as well as complete units;Fitting and adjusting mechanical seals and packing glands;Adjusting, repairing and modifying heating and ventilating systems and their auxiliary equipment. (Auxiliary equipment includes: electrostatic and media filters, fans, pneumatic and electronic controls and motors, ducts, dampers, diffusers, radiators, convectors, reheat coils, gas or oil burners, and combustion controls, centrifugal chiller units, cooling towers, heat pumps, air compressors, vacuum pumps, emergency generators etc.).Reading and interpreting drawings and specifications applying to mechanical trades.Using standard workshop tools (both hand and electric).Strong written and verbal English communication skills are required.Knowledge of WHMIS and Occupational Health & Safety Act.Ability to use handheld communication devices.Demonstrated ability to work independently and within a team environment.Additional Requirements:Ability to work in undesirable and disagreeable conditions such as dust, dirt, fumes, extreme temperatures (excessive cold or heat) and potential hazards, etc.Must be capable of heavy lifting and other strenuous physical activity such as: continuous walking; standing; kneeling; climbing ladders; working on the back, sides and above shoulder for extended periods of time; working in confined spaces; working on scaffolds, air lifts or elevated equipment.Must be willing and able to wear and use personal protective equipment (PPE) and clothing.Must demonstrate a record of attendance, reliability and dependability.Notes:Candidates may be asked to demonstrate qualifications through occupational testing and an interview conducted by a panel of at least three (3) management representatives.Candidates must have a demonstrated record of dependability/reliability & a commitment to maintain confidentiality.A review of the employee's official personnel file, job performance and reference checks may be conducted.Applications are accepted only through Ryerson careers siteVacancy Type:FTCEStart:ASAPDepartment:Maintenance and OperationsPosition #:20001193, 10000102Grade:CUPE 233 - Refrigeration/Air Conditioning Systems MechanicHourly Rate:Entry rate $34.12 per hour / Job rate $36.51 per hourHours of Work:40 hours per weekReports to:Supervisor, Maintenance & OperationsShiftMonday to Thursday 3pm to 11:30pm AND Friday 1pm to 9:30pmMonday to Friday7:00am to 3:30pmNotesMust be flexible to work shifts, overtime as neededWhat Ryerson University has to offer employees:There is something for everyone! Employees are eligible for many benefits, services and discounts including:Convenient location downtown, accessible by transit and car.Consistent and guaranteed shifts (40 hours per week).CompetitiveBenefitsPackage:Group benefits including comprehensive health and dental, emergency travel care, employee and family assistance program (EFAP), life and business travel accident insurance.RyersonRetirementPensionPlan(*RRPP*):Participation in a defined benefit pension plan.TuitionWaiver/*Rebate*:Eligible employees and their spouses and dependents have access to various programs and courses offered by Ryerson University.Health&Fitness:Reduced membership rate to two (2) Athletic Centres which includes group fitness classes, massage therapy, personal training and aquatics.MedicalCentre:Access to the Ryerson medical centre which provides a range of medical services on campus.OnsiteDaycare:Full-time and part-time daycare, and before and after school program.For more information on the benefit details please follow the following link /copy and past on your browser: https://www.ryerson.ca/hr/employee-resources/cupe-233/full-time/benefits/&nbsp ;We encourage all First Nations, Metis and Inuit peoples or Indigenous peoples of North America, to self-identify in their applications and also reach out to Tracey King, Aboriginal HR Consultant for support during the selection process.As part of the selection process, candidates may be required to complete an occupational assessment.Applications will only be accepted online through Ryerson's careersite.Please watch a message from Ryerson's Vice President, Equity and Community Inclusion for more information on our commitment to equity.",,https://job-openings.monster.ca/refrigeration-air-conditioning-systems-mechanic-2-vacancies-toronto-on-ca-ryerson-university/215149036,215149036,monster,University of Toronto
new,Human Resources Manager - W Toronto (19168351),W Toronto,"Toronto, ON",2020-01-15,"Heres To Your Journey with W TorontoBoldly coloring outside the lines of luxury, W turns the traditional notion of the extravagant hotel on its head. Our irreverent attitude and taste for excess redefine revelry for the modern jet set. Our guests have a lust for a life less ordinary that drives them to demand more, experience it all, and hit repeat.We share our guests passions, providing insider access to whats new and whats next. Moderation is not in our vocabulary and we know that lust for life demands more, not less. W guests soak it in and live each day with a mantra: Detox.Retox.Repeat. If youre ready to create the energetic W scene that is magnetic to everyday disruptors around the world, then we invite you to explore a career with W Hotels. The W Toronto located at 90 Bloor St., Toronto, ON M4W 1A7 is currently hiring a Human Resources Manager. Responsibilities include: As a member of the property Human Resources support staff, he/she will carry out the daily activities of the Human Resource Office including oversight of recruitment, onboarding, daily HR administration, maintenance of the HRIS, Health and Safety, and WSIB Management. Additionally, he/she focuses on delivering HR services that meet or exceed the needs of employees and enable business success; as well as ensures compliance with all applicable laws, regulations and operating procedures.CANDIDATE PROFILEEducation and Experience High school diploma or GED; 3+ years experience in human resources as a generalist or HR supervisor capacity.OR 2-year degree from an accredited university in Human Resources, Business Administration, or related major; 2-3 year experience in human resources as a generalist or HR supervisor capacity. CORE WORK ACTIVITIESManaging Recruitment and Hiring Process Establishes and maintains contact with external recruitment sources. Attends job fairs and ensures documentation of outreach efforts in accordance with Human Resource Standard Operating Procedures. Networks with local organizations (e.g., Hotel Association and peers) to source candidates for current or future openings. Oversees/monitors candidate identification and selection process. Provides subject matter expertise to property managers regarding selection procedures. Partners with vendor partners to ensure effective advertisement efforts are being utilized for open positions in appropriate venues to attract a diverse candidate pool. Performs quality control on candidate identification/selection.Administering and Educating Employee Benefits Works with the unemployment services provider to respond to unemployment claims; reviews provider reports for accuracy and corrects errors. Prepares, audits and distributes unemployment claim activity reports to property management. Ensures that department has the available resources on hand to administer employee.Managing Employee Development Supports a departmental orientation program for employees to receive the appropriate new hire training to successfully perform their job. Ensures employees are cross-trained to support successful daily operations. Uses all available on the job training tools for employees; supervise on-going training initiatives and conducts training, when appropriate. Ensures coordination and facilitation of new hire orientation program to generate a positive first impression for employees and emphasize the importance of guest service in company culture. Ensures attendance by all new hires and participation of the leadership team in training programs Collaborates with management team to ensure departmental orientation processes are in place and employees receive the appropriate new hire training to successfully perform their job.Maintaining Employee Relations Assists in maintaining effective employee communication channels in the property (e.g., develops daily communications and assists with regularly scheduled property-wide meetings). Reviews progressive discipline documentation for accuracy and consistency, and checks for supportive documentation and is accountable for determining appropriate action. Utilizes an open door policy to acknowledge employee problems or concerns in a timely manner Ensures employee issues are referred to the Department Manager for resolution or escalated to the Director of Human Resources. Partners with Loss Prevention to conduct employee accident investigations, as necessary. Communicates performance expectations in accordance with job descriptions for each position.Managing Legal and Compliance Practices Ensures employee files contain required employment paperwork, proper performance management and compensation documentation, are properly maintained and secured for the required length of time. Ensures compliance with procedure for accessing, reviewing, and auditing employee files and ensure compliance with the Privacy Act. Communicates property rules and regulations via the employee handbook. Ensures all safety and security policies (e.g., property removal, lost and found items, blood borne pathogens, accident reporting, and hygiene) are communicated to employees on a regular basis through orientation, property meetings, bulletin boards, etc. Conducts periodic claims reviews with Regional Claims office to ensure claims are closed in a timely manner and reserve levels are appropriate for open claims. Represents Human Resources at the property Safety Committee; helps to identify ways to create awareness of the importance of safety in the workplace and decrease accident frequency and severity. Manages Workers Compensation claims to ensure appropriate employee care and manage costs. Oversees the selection/non-selection and offers processes to ensure proper procedures are followed (e.g., valid reasons for selection/non-selection and applicants receive status notifications).To apply now, go to: https://jobs.marriott.com/marriott/jobs/19168351?%3Flang=en-us&src=JB-11 Marriott International is consistently recognized as an employer of choice globally by FORTUNE magazine, DiversityInc and Great Places to Work Institute, among others. Visit www.marriott.com/careers  to learn more about our workplace culture and career opportunities. Chat, engage and follow us on social media.  https://www.facebook.com/marriottjobsandcareers  http://www.twitter.com/marriottcareers  http://www.linkedin.com/company/marriott-international  http://www.instagram.com/marriottcareers @lifeatmarriott on Snapchat So, we ask, where will your journey take you? Marriott International is an equal opportunity employer committed to hiring a diverse workforce and sustaining an inclusive culture. Marriott International does not discriminate on the basis of disability, veteran status or any other basis protected under federal, state or local laws.Notification to Applicants: W Toronto takes seriously its obligations under provincial human rights and accessibility legislation (such as the Accessibility for Ontarians with Disabilities Act, 2005, the Accessibility for Manitobans Act, and Nova Scotia Accessibility Act). We are happy to provide accommodations to job applicants needing assistance. If you require an accommodation in relation to this job posting, our online application or an interview, please call 905-366-5227 or email CanadaApplicationAccommodation@marriott.com   and a member of our Human Resources team will respond to your request. Please note that this phone number and email are only for those individuals who would like to request an accessibility accommodation as part of the recruiting process.",,https://job-openings.monster.ca/human-resources-manager-w-toronto-19168351-toronto-on-ca-w-toronto/215110281,215110281,monster,University of Toronto
new,Guest Services Manager - Sheraton Gateway Hotel in Toronto International Airport - (19176110),Sheraton Gateway Hotel in Toronto International Airport,"Mississauga, ON",2020-01-14,"Here's To Your Journey with SheratonAt Sheraton, we go above and beyond in everything we do. We are inspired by our guests and one another  and are driven to make things better. We love what we do, and we give it all weve got  on property and off. When guests stay with us, its not just a room with a bed that theyre buying. Its an experience. Were looking for someone who is ready to go beyond in everything they do. If you are someone with a genuine drive to improve your life and the lives of those around you, we encourage you to explore careers with Sheraton.The Sheraton Gateway Hotel in Toronto International Airport, located at 3111 Convair Drive, Mississauga, Ontario, L5P1C4 is currently hiring a Guest Services Manager.Responsibilities include:Serves as the property Manager on Duty and oversees all property operations, ensuring that the highest levels of hospitality and service are provided. Represents property management in resolving any guest related situation. Manages the flow of questions and directs guests within the lobby. Serves as Guest Relations Manager and handles the tracking of service issues.CANDIDATE PROFILEEducation and Experience High school diploma or GED; 2 years experience in the guest services, front desk, or related professional area.OR 2-year degree from an accredited university in Hotel and Restaurant Management, Hospitality, Business Administration, or related major; no work experience required.CORE WORK ACTIVITIESLeading Guest Services Teams Utilizes interpersonal and communication skills to lead, influence, and encourage others; advocates sound financial/business decision making; demonstrates honesty/integrity; leads by example. Encourages and builds mutual trust, respect, and cooperation among team members. Serves as a role model to demonstrate appropriate behaviors. Supervises and manages employees. Manages all day-to-day operations. Understands employee positions well enough to perform duties in employees'' absence. Celebrates successes and publicly recognizes the contributions of team members. Establishes and maintains open, collaborative relationships with employees and ensures employees do the same within the team.Maintaining Guest Services and Front Desk Goals Develops specific goals and plans to prioritize, organize, and accomplish your work. Handles complaints, settling disputes, and resolving grievances and conflicts, or otherwise negotiating with others. Maintains a strong working relationship with all departments to support property operations and goals and to expedite the resolution of any problems that may arise through the general operation of the property. Intervenes in any guest/employee situation as needed to insure the integrity of the property is maintained, guest satisfaction is achieved, and employee well being is preserved. Ensures that regular on-going communication is happening with employees to create awareness of business objectives and communicate expectations, recognizes performance, and produces desired results. Comprehends budgets, operating statements and payroll progress reports as needed to assist in the financial management areas of department.Ensuring Exceptional Customer Service Provides services that are above and beyond for customer satisfaction and retention. Improves service by communicating and assisting individuals to understand guest needs, providing guidance, feedback, and individual coaching when needed. Manages day-to-day operations, ensuring the quality, standards and meeting the expectations of the customers on a daily basis. Serves as a leader in displaying outstanding hospitality skills. Sets a positive example for guest relations. Responds to and handles guest problems and complaints. Empowers employees to provide excellent customer service. Observes service behaviors of employees and provides feedback to individuals. Strives to improve service performance. Provides immediate assistance to guests as requested. Ensures employees understand customer service expectations and parameters. Participates in the development and implementation of corrective action plans to improve guest satisfaction.Implementing Projects and Policies Implements the customer recognition/service program, communicating and ensuring the process. Ensures property policies are administered fairly and consistently, disciplinary procedures and documentation are completed according to Standard and Local Operating Procedures (SOPs and LSOPS) and support the Peer Review Process. Manages payroll administration.Conducting Human Resource Activities Identifies the developmental needs of others and coaching, mentoring, or otherwise helping others to improve their knowledge or skills. Provides guidance and direction to subordinates, including setting performance standards and monitoring performance. Participates in employee progressive discipline procedures. Uses all available on the job training tools for employees. Solicits employee feedback, utilizes an open door policy and reviews employee satisfaction results to identify and address employee problems or concerns. Supervises on-going training initiatives and conducts training when appropriate. Participates in the employee performance appraisal process, providing feedback as needed.Additional Responsibilities Provides information to supervisors, co-workers, and subordinates by telephone, in written form, e-mail, or in person. Analyzes information and evaluating results to choose the best solution and solve problems. Informs and/or updates the executives, the peers and the subordinates on relevant information in a timely manner. Maintains high visibility in public areas during peak times. Understands and can implement all emergency plans including accident, death, elevator, thefts, vicious crimes, bombs, fire, etc. Performs Front Desk duties in high demand times.To apply now, go to: https://jobs.marriott.com/marriott/jobs/19176110?%3Flang=en-us/&src=JB-11 Marriott International is consistently recognized as an employer of choice globally by FORTUNE magazine, DiversityInc and Great Places to Work Institute, among others. Visit www.marriott.com/careers  to learn more about our workplace culture and career opportunities.Chat, engage and follow us on social media.www.facebook.com/marriottjobsandcareers  http://www.instagram.com/marriottcareers @lifeatmarriott on SnapchatSo, we ask, where will your journey take you?-Marriott International is an equal opportunity employer committed to hiring a diverse workforce and sustaining an inclusive culture. Marriott International does not discriminate on the basis of disability, veteran status or any other basis protected under federal, state or local laws.Notification to Applicants:Sheraton Gateway Hotel in Toronto International Airport takes seriously its obligations under provincial human rights and accessibility legislation (such as the Accessibility for Ontarians with Disabilities Act, 2005, the Accessibility for Manitobans Act, and Nova Scotia Accessibility Act). We are happy to provide accommodations to job applicants needing assistance. If you require an accommodation in relation to this job posting, our online application or an interview, please call 905-366-5227 or emailCanadaApplicationAccommodation@marriott.comand a member of our Human Resources team will respond to your request. Please note that this phone number and email are only for those individuals who would like to request an accessibility accommodation as part of the recruiting process.",,https://job-openings.monster.ca/guest-services-manager-sheraton-gateway-hotel-in-toronto-international-airport-19176110-mississauga-on-ca-sheraton-gateway-hotel-in-toronto-international-airport/215091976,215091976,monster,University of Toronto
new,Director of Sales & Marketing - Delta Hotels by Marriott Toronto - (19179328),Delta Hotels by Marriott Toronto,"Toronto, ON",2020-01-14,"Here's To Your Journey with DeltaWith our diverse portfolio of locations, youll find Delta Hotels in world-renowned cities and prestigious resorts across Canada. Delta Hotels is a Marriott International brand and offers you the opportunity to find the hospitality job and career journey that''s right for you. With more than 1100 managed properties and 19 brands you''ll find Marriott International in your neighborhood and in more than 74 countries across the globe. Find Your World at Delta Hotels.The Delta Hotels by Marriott Toronto, located at 75 Lower Simcoe St, Toronto, Ontario, M5V 3L9 is currently hiring a Director of Sales & Marketing.Responsibilities include:Functions as the leader of the propertys sales department for properties with bookings over 300 peak rooms and significant local catering revenue. Manages the property''s reactive and proactive sales efforts. Provides day to day leadership to sales associates to achieve property sales objectives with overall responsibility for achieving booking goals and property revenues. Implements the brands service strategy and applicable brand initiatives in all aspects of the sales process and focuses on building long-term, value-based customer relationships that enable achievement of the hotels sales objectives. Evaluates the propertys participation in the various sales channels (e.g., Area Sales, Group Sales within the Sales Office, electronic lead channels, etc.) and develops strong working relationships to proactively position and market the property. Manages the marketing budget to enable development of property specific campaigns, promotions and collateral to drive revenue and meet property objectives. Interfaces with regional marketing communications for regional and national promotions pull through. Develops and implements propertywide strategies that deliver products and services to meet or exceed the needs and expectations of the brands target customer profile and property associates and provides a return on investment to the owner and Marriott International.CANDIDATE PROFILEEducation and ExperienceRequired:2-year degree from an accredited university in Business Administration, Marketing, Hotel and Restaurant Management, or related major; 4 years experience in the sales and marketing or related professional area.OR4-year bachelor''s degree in Business Administration, Marketing, Hotel and Restaurant Management, or related major; 2 years experience in the sales and marketing or related professional area.Preferred:4 year college degree.Demonstrated skills in supervising a team.Lodging sales experience.Hotel industry work experience, demonstrating progressive career growth and a pattern of exceptional performance.CORE WORK ACTIVITIESManaging Sales ActivitiesManages the development of a strategic account plan for the demand generators in the market.Manages the property''s reactive and proactive sales efforts.Determines and develops marketing communication activities, in conjunction with Regional Marketing Communications.Provides customer intelligence in evaluating the market and economic trends that may lead to changes in sales strategy to meet or exceed customer expectations.Reviews the Strategic Alignment Review (STAR) report, competitive shopping reports and uses other resources to maintain an awareness of the hotels market position.Researches competitors sales team strategies to identify ways to grow occupancy and RevPAR and increase market share.Attends sales strategy meetings to provide input on weekly and overall sales strategy.Suggests innovative marketing ideas and develops deployment strategies to continue to grow market share.Evaluates and supports participation and account deployment with Area Sales and Group Sales within the Sales Office.Serves as the sales contact for the General Manager, property leadership team, Group Sales and Area Sales leaders.Serves as the sales contact for customers; serves as the customer advocate.Serves as hotel authority on sales processes and sales contracts.Serves as the property sales liaison with Area Sales, Group Sales, Revenue Management, Event Management, Regional Marketing Communications and other hotel departments as appropriate.Participates in sales calls with members of the Sales and Marketing team to acquire new business and/or close on business.Identifies public relations opportunities and coordinates activities to augment the overall marketing communication strategy.Supports the General Manager by coordinating crisis communications.Executes and supports Marriotts Customer Service Standards and hotels Brand Standards.Executes and supports the operational aspects of business booked (e.g., generating proposal, writing contract, customer correspondence).Participates in and practices daily service basics of the brand (e.g.,, Marriott Hotels and Resorts (MHR) Spirit to Serve Daily Basics, Renaissance Hotels and Resorts (RHR) Savvy Service Basics, Courtyard, SpringHill Suites, Fairfield Inn Basics of the Day, Residence Inn Daily Huddle, or TownePlace Suites Morning Meeting).Implements a seamless turnover from sales to operations and back to sales while consistently delivering high level of service.Monitors the effective resolution of guest issues that arise as a result of the sales process by creating mechanisms to channel issues to property leadership and/or other appropriate stakeholders.Maintains successful performance by increasing revenues, controlling expenses and providing a return on investment for the owner and Marriott International.Implements the brands service strategy and applicable brand initiatives in all aspects of the sales process and focuses on building long-term, value-based customer relationships that enable achievement of the hotels sales objectives.Interfaces with regional marketing communications for regional and national promotions pull through.Performs other duties, as assigned, to meet business needs.Building Successful RelationshipsDevelops strong partnerships with local organizations to further increase brand/product awareness.Develops and manages internal key stakeholder relationships.Develops strong community and public relations by maintaining property participation in local, regional and national tradeshows and client events.Executes exemplary customer service to drive customer satisfaction and loyalty by assisting the customer and monitoring their satisfaction before and during their program/event.Serves the customer by understanding their needs and recommending the appropriate features and services that best meet their needs and exceed their expectations, while building a relationship and loyalty to Marriott.Gains understanding of the hotels primary target customer and service expectations; serves the customer by understanding their business, business issues and concerns, to offer better business solution both prior to, and during the program/event.LeadershipFunctions as the leader of the propertys sales department for properties with bookings over 300 peak rooms and significant local catering revenue.Develops sales goals and strategies and verifies alignment with the brand business strategy.Executes the sales strategy in order to meet individual booking goals for both self and staff.Coaches leaders of revenue generating departments in developing effective revenue strategies and setting aggressive goals that will drive the property''s financial performance.Verifies Sales team understands and is leveraging Marriott International (MI) demand engines to full potential.Works with Human Resources, Engineering and Loss Prevention to monitor compliance with local, state and federal regulations and/or union requirements.Partners with Human Resources to attract, develop and retain the right people in order to support the strategic priorities of the market.Creates effective structures, processes, jobs and performance management systems are in place.Sets goals and expectations for direct reports using the Leadership Performance Process (LPP), aligns performance and rewards, addresses performance issues and holds staff accountable for successful results.Forecasts talent needs and manages talent acquisition strategy with Human Resources (HR) to minimize lost time due to turnover.Maintains an active list of the competitions best sales people and executes a recruitment and acquisition plan with HR.Supports tools and training resources to educate sales associates on winning catering solutions.Champions leadership development and workforce planning priorities by assessing, selecting, retaining and developing diverse, high-caliber talent that can lead the organization today and strengthen the leadership bench for the future; continues to upgrade the sales & marketing talent; works with HR to anticipate future talent needs based on business growth plans.Identifies, trains and mentors group sales associates; utilizes all available on the job training tools for associates.Transfers functional knowledge and develops group sales skills of other discipline managers.Provides day to day leadership to sales associates to achieve property sales objectives with overall responsibility for achieving booking goals and property revenues.Evaluates the propertys participation in the various sales channels (e.g., Area Sales, Group Sales within the Sales Office, electronic lead channels, etc.) and develops strong working relationships to proactively position and market the property.Manages the marketing budget to enable development of property specific campaigns, promotions and collateral to drive revenue and meet property objectives.To apply now, go to: https://jobs.marriott.com/marriott/jobs/19179328?%3Flang=en-us/&src=JB-11 Marriott International is consistently recognized as an employer of choice globally by FORTUNE magazine, DiversityInc and Great Places to Work Institute, among others. Visit www.marriott.com/careers  to learn more about our workplace culture and career opportunities.Chat, engage and follow us on social media.www.facebook.com/marriottjobsandcareers  http://www.instagram.com/marriottcareers @lifeatmarriott on SnapchatSo, we ask, where will your journey take you?-Marriott International is an equal opportunity employer committed to hiring a diverse workforce and sustaining an inclusive culture. Marriott International does not discriminate on the basis of disability, veteran status or any other basis protected under federal, state or local laws.Notification to Applicants: Delta Hotels Toronto takes seriously its obligations under provincial human rights and accessibility legislation (such as the Accessibility for Ontarians with Disabilities Act, 2005, the Accessibility for Manitobans Act, and Nova Scotia Accessibility Act). We are happy to provide accommodations to job applicants needing assistance. If you require an accommodation in relation to this job posting, our online application or an interview, please call 905-366-5227 or emailCanadaApplicationAccommodation@marriott.comand a member of our Human Resources team will respond to your request. Please note that this phone number and email are only for those individuals who would like to request an accessibility accommodation as part of the recruiting process.",,https://job-openings.monster.ca/director-of-sales-marketing-delta-hotels-by-marriott-toronto-19179328-toronto-on-ca-delta-hotels-by-marriott-toronto/215092345,215092345,monster,University of Toronto
new,"Jr Sous Chef - The Ritz-Carlton, Toronto - (19117910)","The Ritz-Carlton, Toronto","Toronto, ON",2020-01-14,"Jr Sous ChefAt more than 80 award-winning properties worldwide, The Ritz-Carlton Ladies and Gentlemen create experiences so exceptional that long after a guest stays with us, the experience stays with them. As the premier worldwide provider of luxury experiences, we set the standard for rare and special luxury service the world over. We invite you to explore The Ritz-Carlton.The Ritz-Carlton, Toronto, located at 181 Wellington St W, Toronto, Ontario, M5V 3G7 currently has the following opportunity:Jr Sous Chef(19117910) :Accountable for overall success of the daily kitchen operations. Exhibits culinary talents by personally performing tasks while leading the staff and managing all food related functions. Works to continually improve guest and employee satisfaction while maintaining the operating budget. Supervises all kitchen areas to ensure a consistent, high quality product is produced. Responsible for guiding and developing staff including direct reports. Must ensure sanitation and food standards are achieved.CANDIDATE PROFILEEducation and ExperienceHigh school diploma or GED; 4 years experience in the culinary, food and beverage, or related professional area.OR2-year degree from an accredited university in Culinary Arts, Hotel and Restaurant Management, or related major; 2 years experience in the culinary, food and beverage, or related professional area.CORE WORK ACTIVITIESEnsuring Culinary Standards and Responsibilities are MetManages kitchen shift operations and ensures compliance with all Food & Beverage policies, standards and procedures.Estimates daily production needs on a weekly basis and communicates production needs to kitchen personnel daily.Assists Executive Chef with all kitchen operations and preparation.Prepares and cooks foods of all types, either on a regular basis or for special guests or functions.Develops, designs, or creates new applications, ideas, relationships, systems, or products, including artistic contributions.Assists in determining how food should be presented and creates decorative food displays.Maintains purchasing, receiving and food storage standards.Ensures compliance with food handling and sanitation standards.Performs all duties of kitchen managers and employees as necessary.Recognizes superior quality products, presentations and flavor.Ensures compliance with all applicable laws and regulations.Follows proper handling and right temperature of all food products.Operates and maintains all department equipment and reports malfunctions.Checks the quality of raw and cooked food products to ensure that standards are met.Leading Kitchen OperationsSupervises and coordinates activities of cooks and workers engaged in food preparation.Leads shifts while personally preparing food items and executing requests based on required specifications.Utilizes interpersonal and communication skills to lead, influence, and encourage others; advocates sound financial/business decision making; demonstrates honesty/integrity; leads by example.Encourages and builds mutual trust, respect, and cooperation among team members.Serves as a role model to demonstrate appropriate behaviors.Maintains the productivity level of employees.Ensures employees understand expectations and parameters.Establishes and maintains open, collaborative relationships with employees and ensures employees do the same within the team.Ensures property policies are administered fairly and consistently.Communicates performance expectations in accordance with job descriptions for each position.Recognizes success performance and produces desired results.Ensuring Exceptional Customer ServiceProvides services that are above and beyond for customer satisfaction and retention.Manages day-to-day operations, ensuring the quality, standards and meeting the expectations of the customers on a daily basis.Sets a positive example for guest relations.Empowers employees to provide excellent customer service.Interacts with guests to obtain feedback on product quality and service levels.Handles guest problems and complaints.Maintaining Culinary GoalsAchieves and exceeds goals including performance goals, budget goals, team goals, etc.Develops specific goals and plans to prioritize, organize, and accomplish your work.Utilizes the Labor Management System to effectively schedule to business demands and for tracking of employee time and attendance.Trains employees in safety procedures.Managing and Conducting Human Resource ActivitiesIdentifies the developmental needs of others and coaching, mentoring, or otherwise helping others to improve their knowledge or skills.Improves service by communicating and assisting individuals to understand guest needs, providing guidance, feedback, and individual coaching when needed.Participates in the employee performance appraisal process, providing feedback as needed.Brings issues to the attention of the department manager and Human Resources as necessary.Additional ResponsibilitiesProvides information to supervisors, co-workers, and subordinates by telephone, in written form, e-mail, or in person.Analyzes information and evaluating results to choose the best solution and solve problems.Attends and participates in all pertinent meetings.We invite you to learn more about this position and apply at: https://jobs.marriott.com/marriott/jobs/19117910?%3Flang=en-us/&src=JB-11  Connect with us on social media to keep up to date on The Ritz-Carlton news, learn more about our culture, and engage with the Careers team on Facebook.www.facebook.com/marriottjobsandcareers http://www.linkedin.com/company/ritz-carlton Join The Ritz-Carlton Ladies and Gentlemen. The Art and Soul of Hospitality.-The Ritz-Carlton is an equal opportunity employer committed to hiring a diverse workforce and sustaining an inclusive culture. The Ritz-Carlton does not discriminate on the basis of disability, veteran status or any other basis protected under federal, state or local laws.Notification to Applicants:The Ritz-Carlton, Torontotakes seriously its obligations under the Human Rights Code and the Accessibility for Ontarians with Disabilities Act, 2005 and will provide accommodations to job applicants needing assistance. If you require an accommodation in relation to this job posting, our online application or an interview, please call 905-366-5227 or emailCanadaApplicationAccommodation@marriott.comand a member of our Human Resources team will respond to your request. Please note that this phone number and email are only for those individuals who would like to request an accessibility accommodation as part of the recruiting process.",,https://job-openings.monster.ca/jr-sous-chef-the-ritz-carlton-toronto-19117910-toronto-on-ca-the-ritz-carlton-toronto/215093004,215093004,monster,University of Toronto
new,Senior Wed/eCommerce PrestaShop Developer,Soroc Technology,"Woodbridge, ON",2020-01-28,"We are currently seeking a talented and motivated Senior Developer who is passionate about web development and eCommerce to join our team located in Toronto, ON.As a Developer at Soroc, you will have the opportunity to work with a collaborative team of highly skilled developers.Duties and responsibilities include;Production of clean, structured, documented, efficient, error-free, and concise code.Responsible for the full understanding of task requests and providing the best solutions based on both client and company needs, as well as overall development goals.Effectively communicate and prioritize needs, resolve conflicts, and develop the best possible solutions within the budget and timeline constraints provided.Participate in peer code review and providing constructive feedback and support to peer developers.Responsible for seeking feedback from subject matter experts during planning, development, and code review, including peer developers and development directors.Responsible for using and understanding modern development tools including, but not limited to : PhpStorm, git, Gitlab CI, Sass, NodeJS, npm, Yarn, Gulp, etc.Accurately track time spent on tasks through the use of detailed time log descriptions.Responsible for communicating risks, issues, or potential problems and escalating to the appropriate stakeholder, regardless of the size or scope of the issue at hand.Key Competencies :Accountability - Ability to take ownership and responsibility for project tasks / outcomes. This includes the quality, quantity, resource management, and timeliness of all work. Ability to follow policies and procedures to complete tasks correctly and within budget, as well as self-manage project tasks and proactively question any issues, concerns, methods, etc.Communication - Ability to communicate in a clear, concise and effective manner both verbally and in writing. Ability to convey ideas, thoughts, issues and information to other team members effectively.Flexibility - Acceptance and openness to change. Ability to accept, communicate, and provide constructive feedback to others.Integrity - Ability to maintain honesty and integrity in the workplace; including representing the company through off site meetings, conferences, activities, etc.Organization - Ability to be organized, detail oriented, and effectively manage many concurrent activities at a given time.Problem Solving - Ability to anticipate, identify, and systematically analyze problems and opportunities in a timely and efficient manner. Strong initiative to design, document, and implement complex solutions.Quality Management - Ability to follow industry best practices and the highest programming standards. Ability to implement efficient, well-documented, and structured technical solutions.Self-motivation - Ability to self-improve on an ongoing basis; facilitate self-learning and teaching other team members. Interest in emerging technologies and their impact on our business strategies, practices, and methods.Team Participation - Ability to recognize and encourage the contribution of others, while working together to achieve project timelines and accomplish project goals. Ability to support the team vision, make decisions, and resolve team conflicts if necessary.Time Management - Ability to use time appropriately; including meeting deadlines, establishing priorities, analyzing alternatives, and taking action. Strategically allocate and self-manage resources effectively. Ability to begin the work day on time, including but not limited to meetings, phone conversations, appointments, etc.Working Relationships - Ability to take a cooperative team approach when completing work; employ flexibility and maintain a positive and constructive attitude towards all team and project members, shareholders, clients, etc. Ability to demonstrate good relations with all employees, peers, and supervisors.At Soroc we recognize that experience comes in many different forms. If your experience is similar to what we're looking for, please consider applying.We know that the best problem-solving and creative thinkers are those with thought diversity; that's why we're dedicated to adding new perspectives to our team.EducationA College diploma, University degree, or relevant job-related experience. We welcome highly experienced, self-taught, and self-motivated learners who express a strong passion for web development.JOB REQUIREMENTS:Experience working with several of the following technologies is preferred;Advanced HTML5 and CSS3 knowledgeExperience with LAMP and LNMP Development Stack (Linux(Ubuntu), Apache / Nginx, MySQL, PHP)Experience with Git Source Control and best practicesExperience with PHP 5 / 7, OOP, MVC, XML / XSLT, RESTObject-oriented JavaScript Experience (Ajax, jQuery, NodeJS, JSON etc.)Experience with MySQL databases, data modeling / design technique and database tuningExperience with eCommerce or similar web applicationsZend FrameworkSymfony / Codeigniter FrameworkWordPress ApplicationDrupal ApplicationAmazon Web ServicesAzure Web ServicesDC/OSMesosphere Container ManagementDocker Container ManagementSpringbootFacebook, Twitter, Google (Maps), Geocoding APIsFront-end build tools such as yarn, sass, gulp, etc.Front-end frameworks such as Bootstrap and FoundationUnit tests, test driven development, and PHP UnitPrestaShop 1.6.x and 1.7.x Development & AdministrationPrestaShop 1.6.x and 1.7.x Application Performance OptimizationPrestaShop 1.6.x and 1.7.x Caching using Redis, Memcache, VarnishExperience with common Shopify Apps (ie. product reviews)Knowledge of Shopify's Liquid template languageSystem Integrators API knowledge (ie. Admin API & Storefront API)Custom Theme Development of PrestaShop Theme KitKafka Middleware processingiTop Tasking template languageiTop API knowledgeKnowledge of any additional languages, such as Java, Python, C++, Ruby, etc.Soroc welcomes and encourages applications from people with disabilities. Accommodations are available on request for candidates taking part in all aspects of the selection process. We thank all applicants, however only those selected for an interview will be contacted.",,https://job-openings.monster.ca/senior-wed-ecommerce-prestashop-developer-woodbridge-on-ca-soroc-technology/215426994,215426994,monster,University of Toronto
new,Human Resources Systems Specialist,Toronto Hydro,"Toronto, ON",2020-01-27,"Toronto Hydro-Electric System Limited owns and operates the electricity distribution system for Canada's largest city. A leader in conservation and demand management, it has 761,000 customers located in the city of Toronto and distributes approximately 19% of the electricity consumed in Ontario.Job description:WORK ILLUSTRATION:Reporting to the Supervisor, HR Systems, the Human Resources Systems Specialist will be responsible for the research, implementation and maintenance of new and enhanced Human Resources & Safety (HR&S) systems solutions and end user tools. In performing this function, the HR Systems Specialist will work closely with stakeholders to support existing systems and assist in the development and delivery of technology solutions to complex business problems.The incumbent is expected to behave ethically and follow the established code of business conduct, policies and internal control procedures, laws and regulations governing Toronto Hydro.KEY RESPONSIBILTIES:Support HR&S department to develop a strategic technological direction for new/enhanced initiatives, programs and processesParticipate and provide expertise in all Human Resources system developments and enhancementsBuild and maintain relationships with appropriate HR&S & IT staff to determine enhanced offerings for current and future system functionalityParticipate in the development of HR systems strategy and information technology roadmapTest and implement HR&S applications, modules and program utilities in conjunction with functional expertise and IT resourcesIdentify required communications and training needs for end usersReview and provide input to technical documents and business processesDesign business processes to support best practicesAnalyzefunctional problems and determine/recommendbest alternatives for resolving these issuesKeep current with developments in software and hardware technologiesResearch and implement creative technology initiatives and programsREQUIREMENTS:University degree in Human Resources,Information Managementor Computer ScienceFive (5) - Seven (7) years Human Resources Management Systems application software experienceExperience with the maintenance of the full HR&S application suite in SuccessFactorsExcellent computer skills with a thorough knowledge of relational databases and spreadsheets (i.e. Excel)Demonstrated project management understanding through hands-on project management experienceCHRP/CHRL is an assetStrong understanding of Human Resources data, processes and procedures with a broad working knowledge of all aspects of human resources management systems and information technologiesExperience with report building toolsStrong multi-tasking skills; demonstrates the ability to meet short-term needs while at the same time building a plan and systems for future needsDemonstrates customer focusDrives results and accountabilityDemonstrates the ability to build strong relationshipsChampions change, productivity and innovationDemonstrates a commitment to health and safety",,https://job-openings.monster.ca/human-resources-systems-specialist-toronto-on-ca-toronto-hydro/215369902,215369902,monster,University of Toronto
new,"Director Business Solutions, Entegra",Sodexo Canada,"Burlington, ON",2020-01-17,"Entegra is a wholly-owned subsidiary of Sodexo, and part of a global purchasing organization. We are looking for aDirector Business Solutionsreporting to the Vice President  Entegra, to champion the growth of Sodexos value-added group purchasing servicesacross all segments in the Greater Toronto Area and South-West Ontario region. Your selling, business development, relationship building, and closing skills will demonstrate and promote Sodexo culture, values and management philosophy. You will develop a pipeline of clients, research the industry and potential, source and develop relationships with potential clients and cooperate with our Vendor and Distributor Partners to develop proposals for new business. You will take an active part in developing new service packages and focus on building lasting relationships with our current and prospective partners.  Your leadership and contribution to the Entegra team will ensure the growth in volume and profitability in your geographic area.Working towards targets, you are naturally motivated to achieve and exceed your targets. You are a hunter by nature. You are used to being held accountable for your results. You are a team-player, who knows when and who to bring in to close the deal. The successful candidate will demonstrate our core values of Service Spirit, Team Spirit and Spirit of Progress and help lead Sodexo to be the premier outsourcing expert in Quality of Life services.   Deliver on defined sales targets to ensure that Sodexo and Entegra enjoy targeted aggressive and profitable growth  Develop and implement a strategic plan to identify key areas of growth potential including identification, prospect qualification, organization survey, proposal development, proposal delivery and contract negotiation.  Develop and manage a structured pipeline of new business potential in cooperation with Key Vendor and Distributor Partners Establish and maintain a solid and mutually beneficial business relationship resulting in highest levels of client and customer satisfaction and account retention, and future business growth plans  Interface with all levels of management for purposes of consultation, intervention and facilitation of strategic sales experiences.  Maintain awareness of industry, competition and market conditions and leverage current client relationships to develop new business opportunities  Provide direction on implementation and delivery of sales needs and create a competitive advantage through the design, development and recommendation of sales and marketing programs  The preferred candidate will have/be: Experience in group purchasing and/orexperience sellingto food service industry,on behalf of afood product distributor or vendor Proven success in selling value based solutions to business clients, multi-unit account sales preferred  University degree or equivalent experience  Fast-paced, results-oriented  Strong communicator -both verbally and in writing  Confident,focused and possessesexcellent presentation skills  Ability and experience responding to RFPs  Proficient with numbers, particularly as it relates to sales  Bilingual in French and English is an asset   Sodexo is committed to Employment Equity and Diversity.We do not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of national origin, race, religion, ethnic group, age, disability, gender, sexual preference, sexual or gender identity, status as a veteran or any other federal, provincial or local protected class. We welcome and encourage applications from people with disabilities.Accommodation is available on request from candidates taking part in all aspects of the selection process. Click Here To Applyhttps://sodexocanada.mua.hrdepartment.com/pm_module/cgi-bin/click.cgi?job_id=5941&site_id=35",,https://job-openings.monster.ca/director-business-solutions-entegra-burlington-on-ca-sodexo-canada/215180166,215180166,monster,University of Toronto
new,Social Media Relations Officer,Kanset Services Inc.,"Toronto, ON",2020-01-17,"Social Media Relations OfficerVALERIA IncToronto, ONJob DescriptionVALERIA INC. is looking for an experienced Social Media Relations Officer. This person will report directly to the principals of the company. The ideal candidate will have experience and passion for project management, digital media, graphic design, video editing, videography, influencer marketing, YouTube, Instagram, and business video content similar to Gary Vaynerchuck. As a Social Media Relations Officer you will develop and organize content to help tell an entrepreneur's story on a daily basis.About VALERIA INC.VALERIA INC. is the organization behind YouTube sensation Valeria Lipovetsky who has gained more than 1,200,000 subscribers across YouTube, Instagram and Facebook in only two years.Valeria is looking for a Social Media Relations Officer who shares her creative vision and who will grow with the company by giving her audience engaging content on a daily basis. Please visit Valerias YouTube channel at Valeria Lipovetsky and her Instagram @valerialipovetsky before applying.Responsibilities Include (but not limited to):YouTube - Video Production & ManagementMonitor channel and video performance using data obtained from YouTube Creator Studio, present data to principals in concise reports, and advise on possible promotion strategiesExtract video assets from rough cuts to develop and implement Youtube campaign strategiesOversee preparation of video edits for Youtube using best creative practicesGather, research and prepare content ideas and communication material as well as create bulleted speaking points for clientManage and schedule Videographer to create long form YouTube video contentManage the creation of YouTube thumbnails with focus on optimizing CTRWrite engaging YouTube headlines and descriptions to increase awareness of clients brandAssist in the preparation and posting of YouTube videos using best practices for SEOInterface with VALERIA Inc. Videographer and clients Personal Assistant to schedule daily video shootsSkills & Requirements:University or college degreeExperience working with all aspects of YouTubeExperience with video editingExcellent copywriting skills and a strong ability to communicate with young audiencesA thorough understanding of social media with demonstrable experience in managing engagement on social channels (beyond personal account)Experience working to tight deadlines in a fast-paced environmentGraphic design experience an asset (Adobe Creative Suite)Experience working with influencer marketing an asset1 to 2 years relevant work experienceCompensation and Conditions:Job Type:Full-TimeSalary: $59,000 per yearLocation:Toronto, ON (Yorkville Area)How to apply:If you meet the requirements and are interested in this vacancy, please apply by email to hiring.valeriainc@gmail.com   with your resume and cover letter.We thank all the candidates for their interest, however, only those who qualify will be contacted for further consideration",,https://job-openings.monster.ca/social-media-relations-officer-toronto-on-ca-kanset-services-inc/215181503,215181503,monster,University of Toronto
new,Territory Sales Manager-Greater Toronto Area,Divine Sleep Products Inc. O/A Divine Sleep Mattress and Sofa,"Mississauga, ON",2020-01-17,"Employer:Divine Sleep Products Inc. O/A Divine Sleep Mattress and SofaPosition:Territory Sales Manager-Greater Toronto AreaDuration:Full TimeReporting office:6720 Columbus Rd, Mississauga, ON L5T 2G1Salary:$75,000.00 per annumThe gross salary paid is subject to all applicable Federal and Provincial income taxes and other statutory deductions.Vacation:4% of the gross salaryHours of Work:35 Hours a week.Essential Functions / Major Responsibilities This position is responsible for managing the greater Toronto area for the sale of mattress product lines. The objective is to maintain exceptional customer service and strategizing with wholesale customers such as retail furniture stores to increase sales and growing market share in the region.Develop sales strategies and techniques necessary for achieving the sales targets and growing market share in the region.Implements sales programs as per the standard operating procedures, established business practices, and various company initiatives.Coach, appraise, and train wholesale customers in selling the product lines.Setting sales targets and achieving it through motivation, counselling, skills development and product knowledge developmentManage negotiations and lead sales team in building relationships with wholesale clientsManaging the performance of the sales teams by establishing a system of reports and communications involving sales reports, periodical sales meetings, and innovative new techniquesSkills and Qualifications:A university degree or college diploma in business or in a related field with a specialization in sales is requiredBetween 1-2 years of sales experience; wholesale or retail; in the furniture industry is requiredAdvanced knowledge of Excel, Word, and PowerPointExcellent communication and interpersonal skillsAbility to analyze data and convey findings to the ownershipExcellent time management and organizational skillsStrong problem solving and decision makingLeadership and Team management skillsResults and detail orientedStrong analytical skillsStrong business acumenWorking Conditions:Fast-paced environment - multitasking, working under pressure, and meeting tight deadlinesA valid driver's license is a mustHas to travel extensivelyHow to Apply:By email to: jobs.divnesleep@gmail.com",,https://job-openings.monster.ca/territory-sales-manager-greater-toronto-area-mississauga-on-ca-divine-sleep-products-inc-o-a-divine-sleep-mattress-sofa/215185080,215185080,monster,University of Toronto
new,Application Developer- Asp.net/ SQL/Oracle,Nexus Systems Group,"Toronto, ON",2020-02-05,"Job Title: Application Developer- Asp.net/SQL/Oracle- Job Id: 32627-1Duration: 9 monthsLocation: TorontoApplication Software Developer is accountable for creating project solutions through the analysis, design, development, implementation and support of applications to ensure and/or maintain alignment with business strategies.Top Skills: Asp.netSQL/OracleDevOps ToolsCapital Market ExperienceThe resource will be engaged, but not limited to the following: Writes code according to accepted standards to meet business requirements Aligns with Team Lead for deliverables and delivers consistently as promised and meets deadlines. Engages appropriate stakeholders early on when clarification/requirements needed. Responsible for planning, estimating, development, testing and implementation of initiatives of any size and any level of complexity to meet the functional and non-functional requirements of the application. The resulting artifacts will be used to better understand, communicate, and provide specifications during the coding and Quality Assurance activities Participate in application improvement opportunities to improve the reliability and extensibility of the application and to improve the overall Service Level Agreement (SLA) Liaises with third party vendors, when appropriate, to ensure that the integration of third-party products and existing applications and systems is practical and feasible given the underlining technologies Participates in software development Process Action Teams and contributes to the continuous improvement of the Software Development Life Cycle (SDLC) processes for the overall effectiveness of the developmentUnderstanding of coding methods, Software Development Lifecycle, Secure Coding Practices, including agile & iterative build/delivery approach. C# programming (Windows Service,ASP.NET, MVC, JavaScript/JSON) Experience in Oracle/SQL Experience with DevOps tools. Exposure to / or use of Agile / iterative development tools and methodologies is a plus University degree in mathematics or computer science Capital Markets and Trading practices. Using schedulers and operational monitoring / control tools MS SQL/Oracle Experience Excellent trouble shooting, problem solving, analytical skills. Strong Communication Skills (Oral and Written) Implementation of continuous integration and deployment for the platform",,https://job-openings.monster.ca/application-developer-asp-net-sql-oracle-toronto-on-ca-nexus-systems-group/215285839,215285839,monster,University of Toronto
new,Director of Sales and Marketing,TablaZoom,"TORONTO, ON",2020-02-03,"Director of Sales and MarketingA Restaurant Systems Management company is looking for an experienced director of sales and marketing to help launch its product and carve a niche in the Ontario and Qubec markets. The right candidate is fully bilingual (French English) and possesses excellent oratory and written skills in both languages. The candidate is also a fine coach and can teach people how to use the software. This person will work alone in close contact with the CEO until the Beta and commercial markets have been sufficiently developed to start hiring.Some of the tasks expected to be performed are:Develop and implement advertising campaigns to promote the sale of the productPlan, organize, direct, control and evaluate the design, development and maintenance of the organizations cyber presenceInfluence product development through feedback received from clientsEstablish distribution and support networks.Follow competition closely and assess strength and weaknesses. Initiate market research studies and analyze their findingsPlan, organize, direct, control and evaluate daily operations.Minimum education: Master Degree in Business Administration or in Marketing from a respected University. 10 years of professional experience in similar industries or activities showing goals attained.Yearly salary: $85,000. Must reside in Toronto or be willing to relocate.Please send letter of introduction in French and in English along with resume to info@tablazoom.com",,https://job-openings.monster.ca/director-of-sales-marketing-toronto-on-ca-tablazoom/215560983,215560983,monster,University of Toronto
new,Technical Salesforce Architect,Company Confidential,"Toronto, ON",2020-02-03,"As aTechnical Salesforce Architectat our client, you will play an integral role insolution scoping and designing the optimal solution to meet the needs of the clients with a focus on usability, security, scalability and cost.In order to qualify you must have the following essential skills and experiences:University Degree (Computer Science), Post-Grad an assetSalesforce.com Certifications8-10 years of experience in a similar rolePrevious experience in a Consulting environmentProduct development and Project management experienceExperience with CRM solutionsIn this role you will focus on:Overseeing the development cycle and QA of the code:Conduct ongoing meetings to review the design and progress toward design identifiedOversee the developers to ensure they are following best practices in the development processProviding ongoing feedback and mentorship about their workConduct code review and provide feedback to the DevelopersSupport the Developers on complex code issues and design gapsManage UAT sessionsDeveloping solution scoping and design of a Project (Statement of Work/Requirement Gathering Document):Meet with the client team and client to discuss client needsGather key requirements for the projectIdentify an initial design for the projectSupport in the development of the Statement of Work and Estimate for the clientDevelop the Requirements Gathering Document and/or Technical Specification DocumentProvide the Requirements Gathering Document and/or Technical Specification Document to the Developer for review and discussionProviding support to client issues or requests:Interact with client to understand the issueWork with Developer to identify the problem and why it is occurringBased on problem analysis, determine what is required to resolve the problemSupport in code development if requiredIf issues is out of scope of the project an estimate will be provided to the Sales Team to discuss with the clientProject Lead on Complex Projects in the collaboration with the Technical Manager:Support in the development and management of the project plansCoordinate resourcing, budget, key deliverable and ensure quality standards are metManage key milestone delivery and scope of the projectCommunicate with clients on project status, deliverables, client information and other project requirementsManage project resources to meet the needs and deadlines of the projectEscalation point for customer issuesApprove hours logged against a project on a weekly basisMaintain and enrich relationships with existing client portfolio including actively identifying and nurturing new opportunities.Collaborating with the Sales Organization to Create Estimates for Projects:Meet with the Sales Team to discuss the key requirements, estimate assumptions, document exclusionsPopulate or review estimates to ensure accuracy and assumptions/exclusions are captured from a development perspectiveReview and add key information into clients proposals to ensure accuracy and desired deliverable from a development perspectiveCoaching and Mentoring the Development Team Members in collaboration with the Technical Manager:Coach and mentor team members on projects, requirements, solutions, best practices technical and soft skills, client issues and challenges in their role in collaborationConduct meeting to support team members in their rolesSupport team members to set job priorities and track progress throughout the yearOversee the individual career and job development for team membersIdentify and improve continuous improvement opportunities within the team and team membersSupport in the development of a high performance teamOverseeing HR Needs of the Development Team in collaboration with the Technical Manager:Support in the hiring of developers and monitor new hire orientation proceduresSupport in the evaluation of the performance and productivity of team membersSupport in the Performance Development process of team membersSupport in the facilitation of conflict management situationsOverseeing the implementation of best practices in the Development Team, in collaboration with the Technical Manager:Identify best practices in areas of coding, naming conversion and other key areasImplement best practices within the teamProviding support in Product Development:Support in the establishment of practices and business processes between Product Development and the Development TeamInvolved in the development of architecture for Product Development",,https://job-openings.monster.ca/technical-salesforce-architect-toronto-on-ca/212975685,212975685,monster,University of Toronto
new,Special Events Coordinator,University of Toronto,Mississauga,2020-02-06,"About us:

The universitys second largest division, U of T Mississauga has 17 academic departments and offers 156 programs in 92 areas of study. Home to approximately 15,000 students and over 1,000 faculty and staff, the campus houses the Mississauga Academy of Medicine, Centre for Medicinal Chemistry and Institute for Management and Innovation. With its distinctive interdisciplinary programs such as forensic sciences and biomedical communications, U of T Mississauga offers a broad array of continuing education programs and professional masters programs. Established in 1967, the campus features award-winning architecture, robust community partnerships and a dynamic student environment set amongst 225 acres along the Credit River in Mississauga.

Your opportunity:

The Hospitality and Retail Services Department is committed to providing value to the University of Toronto Mississauga community through the provision of dining, event planning, retail and postal services. We strive for excellence in the delivery of these services. Our goal is to contribute to the success of each University of Toronto Mississauga community member.

Under the general supervision of the Manager, Conference and Events Services, the Special Events Coordinator develops and executes all aspects of event plans and conferences from initial planning, contracts, set ups, bedroom, meeting room, classroom bookings, food service, and closing. The Coordinator plans event details for a variety of key internal and external events and responsible for handling post-event follow-up, preparing service contracts and invoices using templates.

Your responsibilities will include:

Coordinating the schedule for program and event calendarsAnalyzing client needs and making recommendations on event logistics and optionsDetermining logistical details and activities for events and/or programmingLiaising with clients and vendors to resolve minor complaints and address issuesConducting post-event evaluation, analysis and recommendations for changesMonitoring activities on-location of film-shoots to ensure contracts are fulfilledDisseminating customer surveysCollaborating on cost estimates

Essential Qualifications:

Bachelor's Degree or acceptable combination of equivalent experience.Minimum three years related experience in event planning and execution, including hands on planning, organizing, executing and follow up.Experience providing expertise and recommendations to departments/clients, as well as experience working with internal and external service providers.Demonstrated experience planning and executing events for other departments, or comparable clients.Must have strong computer skills; experience in Word, Excel, PowerPoint and other related software.Excellent communication and interpersonal skills.Demonstrated superior customer service skills.Ability to multi-task; strong organizational skills.Must have food knowledge and experience creating menus for events.Knowledge, experience and ability to market and promote events and conferences.

To be successful in this role you will be:

CooperativeMeticulousProblem solverResourcefulResponsibleTeam player",,https://www.glassdoor.com/partner/jobListing.htm?pos=101&ao=102921&s=58&guid=000001702fec1280bb2212d1a785c202&src=GD_JOB_AD&t=SR&extid=1&exst=EL&ist=&ast=EL&vt=w&slr=true&cs=1_6b097e5c&cb=1581351965766&jobListingId=3483508974,3483508974,glassdoor,University of Toronto
new,Grants Assistant,University of Toronto,Toronto,2020-02-04,"About us:

The Faculty of Arts & Science is the heart of Canadas leading university and one of the most comprehensive and diverse academic divisions in the world. The strength of Arts & Science derives from our combined teaching and research excellence in the humanities, sciences and social sciences across 29 departments, seven colleges and 46 interdisciplinary centres, institutes and programs.

We can only realize our mission with the dedication and excellence of engaged staff and faculty. The diversity of opportunities and perspectives within the Faculty reflect the local and global landscape and the need for curiosity, innovative thinking and collaboration. At Arts & Science, we take pride in our legacy of innovation and discovery that has changed the way we think about the world.

Your opportunity:

The Munk School of Global Affairs & Public Policy proudly offers 14 teaching programs in a variety of areas of global expertise. As part of the University of Toronto, we are home to exceptional faculty, experts, and researchers from around the globe, and over 40 academic centres, labs, and programs. Our goal is to build a unique, world-renowned research, teaching, and public engagement centre that shapes the new field of global affairs from Canada. Our School unifies those who are passionate about global affairs to discuss the problems of a fast-changing world.

Under the general direction of the Manager, Administration & Finance, the Grants Assistant provides support to the Grants Administrator and faculty in relation to research and non-research grants/contracts within the Munk School.

Your responsibilities will include:

Applying the generally accepted accounting principles to all financial tasks, keeping well-informed on key University and sponsor policies and trendsChecking that proper approvals are obtained prior to processing transactionsMonitoring grant budget to ensure expenditures remain within budgeted allocationsLiaising with agencies, collaborators, industry sponsors, faculty and other stakeholders regarding funding applicationsVerifying research funding proposals are complete, accurate and adhere to University guidelines and procedures, and Verifying that research accounts are processed according to sponsor and/or granting agency guidelinesInforming Principal Investigator of concerns or setbacksProcessing accounts payable according to the University Guide to Financial Management, processing expense reimbursements, and preparing and/or processing journal entriesReconciling accounts, monitoring accounts and ensuring funds are available for purchases, and generating standard financial reports

Essential Qualifications:

Advanced College Diploma (3 years) or acceptable combination of equivalent experience.Minimum three years financial experience related to research grants, and contracts.Experience in aspects of accounting including payroll, account reconciliation, and preparation of financial statementsDemonstrated experience using and applying general accounting principles and proceduresSolid work experience interpreting and applying financial policies.Experience interpreting and adhering with granting agencies funding guidelines and policies.Experience completing financial forecasting analysis.Experience with Universitys Administrative Management System (e.g. FIS, ARBOR, RIS and HRIS), or other similar systems.Excellent communication skills, both oral and written.Advanced skills in Microsoft Office (word excel outlook).Excellent organizational skills. Strong interpersonal and teamwork skills.Strong ability to work under pressure, meet multiple deadlines, and cope with a variety of tasks.Detailed orientated with demonstrated flexibility and accuracy in performing work.Ability to handle matters of a sensitive and confidential nature.Ability to also work independently with minimal supervision.

Assets (Nonessential):

A Bachelor's degree and/or Designation in Finance would be an asset.

To be successful in this role you will be:

AccountableApproachableResourcefulResponsibleTactful",,https://www.glassdoor.com/partner/jobListing.htm?pos=103&ao=102921&s=58&guid=000001702fec1280bb2212d1a785c202&src=GD_JOB_AD&t=SR&extid=1&exst=EL&ist=&ast=EL&vt=w&slr=true&cs=1_491e189d&cb=1581351965769&jobListingId=3481023455,3481023455,glassdoor,University of Toronto
new,Contracts Coordinator,University of Toronto,Toronto,2020-02-08,"About us

Home to over 40 departments and institutes, the University of Toronto's Faculty of Medicine lies at the heart of the Toronto Academic Health Science Network and is a global leader in ground-breaking research and education, spanning clinical medicine, basic science and the rehabilitation sciences sectors.

The Office of the Vice-Provost, Relations with Health Care Institutions (VP-RHCI), which sits as an administrative unit within the Faculty of Medicine, is responsible for the Universitys relationships with affiliated health care organizations and many educational and research organizations.



Your opportunity

The Vice-Provost, Relations with Health Care Institutions (VP-RHCI) is responsible for the Universitys contractual relationships with affiliated health care organizations and many educational and research organizations. We also provide policy and legal services to staff in the Universitys seven health science faculties as they negotiate contracts for unpaid student placements. We provide a full range of contract services (review, drafting, negotiation, execution, implementation) of any such contracts that are complex, cover more than one health science unit, or do not use the standard University template.

As the Contracts Coordinator, you will serve as a resource for the Health Science Faculties on matters pertaining to student placements off-campus, as well as related affiliations and educational collaboration agreements. Your strong communication and organizational skills will help you proactively track contract expiry dates that are the sole responsibility of VP-RHCI and coordinate student placement agreements with new placement sites. Relying on your strong analytical and evaluations skills, you will review existing policies and processes to find efficiencies. You will provide timely and thorough support to legal counsel throughout the contract negotiation process, and you will also offer overflow support to the legal unit on contract matters as needed.

Your responsibilities will include:



Acting as the first point of contact, responding to inquiries and advising on interpretation of applicable policies and guidelines to placement coordinators across the Health Sciences FacultiesReviewing off-campus student placement agreements to ensure adherence to relevant policies and templatesEnsures placement coordinators and instructors are made aware of any changes to policies or procedures and recommends changes to placement agreements Reviews existing applicable policies and procedures related to placements and contracts, and proactively identifies opportunities for streamliningDevelops student placement FAQ and resources for use by placement coordinators Identifies risks associated with various placements, and works with staff in Risk Management to assist in mitigating potential risksResearches best practices around student placements at comparator institutions and suggests changes to policy and/or practice to senior staff in the OfficeAssists with reviewing other types of contracts, as appropriate

Essential Qualifications:



College Diploma in legal assistant or law clerk program, or acceptable equivalent education and experience. Law clerk or paralegal designationThree years of related experience in a post-secondary institution or legal environmentExperience in contract review, policy review, policy interpretation, and tracking and monitoring systems for large volumes of documentationExperience identifying risk and mitigation strategies, and opportunities for process improvementAdvanced computer proficiency in MS Office suite, Adobe Acrobat suite and working within a Sharepoint environmentSuperior oral and written communication and interpersonal skillsStrong customer service orientation and the ability to proactively interact with diverse groups of peopleSuperior analytical and organizational skills and relentless attention to detailMust have initiative and the ability to effectively deal with a variety of tasks and strict deadlines; ability to frequently adjust prioritiesExperience working collaboratively with colleagues and team members to achieve common goals and complete projectsDemonstrated judgment, tact, discretion and ability to handle complex matters of a sensitive and confidential nature

Assets (Nonessential):





Experience working with iManage document management system



To be successful in this role you will be:

CommunicatorOrganizedMeticulousProblem SolverInsightful",,https://www.glassdoor.com/partner/jobListing.htm?pos=105&ao=102921&s=58&guid=000001702fec1280bb2212d1a785c202&src=GD_JOB_AD&t=SR&extid=1&exst=EL&ist=&ast=EL&vt=w&slr=true&cs=1_a0647430&cb=1581351965770&jobListingId=3486458022,3486458022,glassdoor,University of Toronto
new,Communications Writer,University of Toronto,Mississauga,2020-02-06,"About us:

The universitys second largest division, U of T Mississauga has 17 academic departments and offers 156 programs in 92 areas of study. Home to approximately 15,000 students and over 1,000 faculty and staff, the campus houses the Mississauga Academy of Medicine, Centre for Medicinal Chemistry and Institute for Management and Innovation. With its distinctive interdisciplinary programs such as forensic sciences and biomedical communications, U of T Mississauga offers a broad array of continuing education programs and professional masters programs. Established in 1967, the campus features award-winning architecture, robust community partnerships and a dynamic student environment set amongst 225 acres along the Credit River in Mississauga.

Your opportunity:

The Office of the Chief Administrative Officer oversees the effective and efficient operation of the University of Toronto Mississauga, uniting the academic and administrative operations of the campus. As the senior non-academic executive at UTM, the CAO advises UTM leadership and is responsible for the overall business administration at UTM, with oversight extending to key operational functions, including business services, capital construction, sustainability, health and safety, conference services, parking and emergency planning.

This position will provide writing services to units reporting to the Chief Administrative Officer, with a dotted-line report to the Director, Content in the UTM Office of Communications, which handles all broad-based communications and marketing initiatives on campus. Along with planning and implementing strategic communication plans, this individual will develop project schedules including milestones, critical path, timelines, deliverables and metrics reporting. The successful candidate will write and edit content to advance CAO communications objectives, produce promotional and outreach materials, and build strong relationships with internal and external colleagues.

Your responsibilities will include:

Developing and implementing communication plans that support strategic objectivesAdvising on approaches to content generation for writing assignmentsDeveloping project schedules including milestones, critical path, timelines, deliverables and reportingWriting and editing copy and content to advance communications objectivesProducing promotional and outreach materialsObtaining approval from clients on final copy/concepts

Essential Qualifications:

Bachelor's Degree or acceptable combination of equivalent experience.Minimum five years related experience in the area of communicationsExperience writing correspondence for senior management Excellent writing/editing capabilitiesAbility to manage multiple editorial projects simultaneous and meet deadlinesDetail-oriented, metrics-based approach to content generationAbility to build and maintain collaborative relationships with colleagues and clientsExcellent proofreading and fact-checking skills

Assets (Nonessential):

Experience in a post-secondary or non-profit organizationExperience developing communication themes  slide decks, infographics, campaign palettes

To be successful in this role you will be:

AdaptableCommunicatorMeticulousMulti-taskerResourcefulTeam player",,https://www.glassdoor.com/partner/jobListing.htm?pos=106&ao=102921&s=58&guid=000001702fec1280bb2212d1a785c202&src=GD_JOB_AD&t=SR&extid=1&exst=EL&ist=&ast=EL&vt=w&slr=true&cs=1_6f37fcfd&cb=1581351965771&jobListingId=3483508905,3483508905,glassdoor,University of Toronto
new,Special Projects Administrator,University of Toronto,Toronto,2020-01-28,"Under the supervision of the Director, Office of the Vice-President Operations & Real Estate Partnerships (VPOREP), the Special Projects Administrator coordinates the operational planning and roll out of the UniForum global benchmarking project. The incumbent is the day-to-day point of contact for all queries relating to the data collection for the benchmarking project and supports the role of Director, Office of the Vice-President Operations & Real Estate Partnerships to ensure project success. The incumbent makes recommendations for the initiation, research, prioritization and determination of appropriate courses of action, referral or response on matters identified by the UniForum@UofT Project Team. The incumbent provides recommendations to the UniForum@UofT Project Team on operational matters through research and analysis of evolving business processes, technology and systems.

The Special Projects Administrator will use external global benchmarking templates to assist shared service divisions to prepare for data collection as part of the annual global benchmarking initiative, and will provide training for divisional and shared service staff on this particular initiative, as well as any other special projects as assigned.

Qualifications:

EDUCATION:

Undergraduate degree in a relevant discipline, PMP certification would be considered an asset, equivalent in education and experience.

EXPERIENCE:

A minimum of 5 years of recent related experience. Proven administrative experience in a large and complex organization. Experience analyzing institutional research working with large and varied datasets, preparing and presenting results of complex analyses. Knowledge of University policies, procedures, governance and administrative systems preferred. Experience in managing projects that involve a variety of stakeholders. Strategic and system thinking skills, with strong attention to detail.

SKILLS:

Knowledge of AMS systems: FIS and HRIS or equivalents

Expert knowledge of MS Office suite of products: Word, Excel, PowerPoint

Excellent and diplomatic writing, oral and written communication and presentation skills.

OTHER:

Demonstrate ability to read and interpret data, research and statistical methods. Must be able to work in high-pressure situations. In-depth understanding of all aspects of University organization, inter-relationships, policies and procedures, particularly financial and enrolment matters. Must be detail-oriented, strong analytical and conceptual thinking. Familiarity with business intelligence structures (relational or dimensional modeling). Commitment to diversity and equity. Ability to anticipate problems and issues and plan ahead. Analyze problems, identify key information and issue to identify effective resolutions. Plan and complete multiple projects, tasks and priorities simultaneously. Review, analyze and synthesize complex information into summaries and reports. Set priorities, organize workload and work within deadlines in a busy and complex environment. Must establish effective relationships with a variety of stakeholders. Ability to prepare and present proposals to small and large diverse audiences. Ability to conduct needs analyses, plan, organize, manage, monitor, complete and evaluate projects within allocated time and resources. Must be able to identify, obtain and effectively manage organizational resources (e.g., people, materials, assets, budgets). Demonstrate ability to effectively facilitate groups to achieve appropriate outcomes. Proficiency in composing correspondence and other written materials using clear and concise business English. Ability to work cooperatively both within the University community and with external stakeholders. Maintain accuracy and attention to detail. Demonstrate ability to exercise judgment, tact, discretion and diplomacy. Pro-active and cognizant of conflicting priorities with the ability to advise and direct resolutions. Demonstrate ability to objectively review and analyze changes in workflow processes that impact multiple departments. Aptitude for working with information systems. Competent to work both independently and within a team environment.

Travel: None",,https://www.glassdoor.com/partner/jobListing.htm?pos=108&ao=437149&s=58&guid=000001702fec1280bb2212d1a785c202&src=GD_JOB_AD&t=SR&extid=1&exst=EL&ist=&ast=EL&vt=w&slr=true&cs=1_a540f5e7&cb=1581351965773&jobListingId=3474515330,3474515330,glassdoor,University of Toronto
new,Security Analyst,University of Toronto,Toronto,2020-02-06,"Under the general direction of the Chief Information Security Officer, the Security Analyst is the primary threat analyst for Canadian Shared Security Operations Centre (CanSSOC). The Security Analyst will leverage threat and vulnerability data in cross functional and organizational teams supporting the teaching and research missions of Canadian Higher Education institutions across the country. By using the latest threat information, the Security Analyst will assist member sites to find current vulnerabilities, actionable threat information, and communicate impacts.

The goal of the CanSSOC project is to investigate the creation of a specialized cyber security incident and threat detection centre focused on the higher education sector. The members, partners and other stakeholders involved in CanSSOC are energized and eager to learn how the power of the collective can be harnessed to provide a stronger and more efficient defense against cyber security threats.

The Security Analyst assumes responsibility for the strategic and tactical planning and provision of systems security and risk management in the areas of systems administration, server and service design, implementation, operation and support. The position is responsible for developing, updating, implementing and promoting CanSSOC. The Security Analyst is instrumental in ensuring reliable and robust access controls, service availability, and activity/ incident reporting. This position applies known security standards as well as establishes new security standards and best practices related to the use and operation of information and communication technology solutions, systems, servers, services, Cloud services. The position also proposes strategies by which those standards and best practices are implemented, tested and confirmed on a regular basis.

The Security Analyst is a main contact for operations that fall within his/her area of responsibility with other Universities to ensure that all interactions containing confidential and restrictive information follow the information security standards and best practices for Identity and Access Management, Information Disclosure, Information Integrity, Business Continuity and Protection of Privacy.

Qualifications:

Minimum Qualifications:

I. EDUCATION:

University degree in a relevant field with a preference for Computer Science, Information Security or Computer Engineering, or equivalent combination of education and experience.

II. EXPERIENCE:

Six (6) years of relevant work experience in a Higher Education environment including the management of data throughout its lifecycle.

Five (5) years significant exposure to Information Risk Assessments / Information Security practices.

Five (5) years of experience in Information Security, SOC, or threat hunting.

Technical experience with at least one vulnerability management tool (e.g., Tenable, Qualys, OpenVAS).

Proficiency in at least one scripting language (Python, shell, etc.).

Exposure to network architecture, TCP/IP networking, VPN, VLAN, NAT and security concepts

Knowledge of threat intelligence platforms (e.g., MISP, STIX, TAXII) preferred

Knowledge of benchmarking and monitoring services (e.g., Bitsight, Security Scorecard, etc.) preferred

Familiar with using data visualization tools (e.g., Maltego, Power BI) preferred

III. SKILLS:

Very strong interpersonal skills and excellent oral and written communication skills.

Excellent instruction and presentation skills.

Able to describe a variety of complex technical concepts or policies to users and senior leadership at all technical experience levels, in general communication formats and in workshops.

Ability to master new technology quickly.

Excellent project management and problem-solving skills.

Strong analytical skills.

IV. OTHER:

Ability to work effectively with external vendors and all levels of academic, administrative and IT staff.

Ability to work independently in rapidly developing and evolving situations

Excellent team player with a proven track record of working across a large, distributed enterprise.

Strong understanding of information security concepts and security methodologies.

Strong understanding of information risk.

Understanding of how to objectively evaluate the use of security controls, mechanisms and goals in comparison to best practices.

Highly organized and the ability to lead through influence and coordination, as well as facilitate communication with SMEs, distributed teams, and other stakeholders as necessary.

Travel: None

Notes:

This is a one (1) year term with the possibility of renewal.",,https://www.glassdoor.com/partner/jobListing.htm?pos=110&ao=437149&s=58&guid=000001702fec1280bb2212d1a785c202&src=GD_JOB_AD&t=SR&extid=1&exst=EL&ist=&ast=EL&vt=w&slr=true&cs=1_772784af&cb=1581351965775&jobListingId=3483348968,3483348968,glassdoor,University of Toronto
new,Financial Assistant,University of Toronto,Scarborough,2020-02-04,"About us:

The University of Toronto Scarborough is a place of energy, enthusiasm and passion. Our commitment to inclusive excellence attracts the brightest learners, scholars and employees from around the globe. Our success has been made possible by the opportunity given to us by our Indigenous hosts to operate on their territory, and we cherish our continuing partnerships with these communities. The University of Toronto Scarborough is an exciting campus with unlimited potential. Join us on our journey.

The Department of Historical and Cultural Studies at the University of Toronto Scarborough is a vibrant department organized into distinct disciplinary and interdisciplinary areas of study. In addition to providing students with deep grounding in one or more disciplinary traditions, the Department also fosters multidisciplinary research at all levels. Its commitment to socially engaged, leading edge research and direct engagement with its community is reflected not only through its curriculum but also in the creative and innovative projects undertaken by faculty and often providing research opportunities for graduate and undergraduate students. Working alongside faculty, a team of dedicated staff members provide administrative services and support the daily operation of a department that is committed to promoting equity, diversity and inclusion to help create a truly rich and engaging student experience.

The Department of Philosophy is a growing research and teaching intensive department. We teach a wide constituency of students at UTSC from specialists in philosophy, double majors in philosophy and another area such as psychology or political science, to large numbers of students who combine their primary field of study with a minor in philosophy. We provide a full spectrum of courses in the major areas of philosophy such as ethics, metaphysics, theory of knowledge and of mind, and aesthetics. We also teach a range of applied courses with a focus on biomedical ethics.

Your opportunity:

Under the general direction of the Business Officer, the Financial Assistant is responsible for a variety of finance and accounting assignments for the Department of Historical and Cultural Studies (90>) and the Department of Philosophy (10>). Responsibilities include completion and/or audit of all expense reimbursements and invoices, and reconciliation of FIS accounts, monthly Statement of Accounts, P-Card payments, ensuring compliance with Universitys and financial guidelines and procedures. Additionally the incumbent is responsible for the analysis and creation of various financial reports which provide data used in long term and short term strategic planning, budgeting, modelling and forecasting for the Departments. The incumbent works closely with the Business Officer to ensure business transactions are aligned with the general accepted accounting principles, the Universitys financial and purchasing guidelines as well as funding rules. The incumbent is also responsible for asset management for the department including purchasing, inventory, records and maintenance and space coordination.

Your responsibilities will include:

Preparing expense reimbursementsPreparing and/or processing journal entriesChecking that proper approvals are obtained prior to processing transactionsMonitoring department budget to ensure expenditures remain within budgeted allocationsReconciling accountsIdentifying and reporting equipment repair and replacement needsMaintaining an inventory of furniture and equipmentChecking space requirement and availability.

Essential Qualifications:

Advanced College Diploma (3 years) in a related field (e.g. accounting, finance) or acceptable combination of equivalent experience.Minimum three years related experience in accounting/finance/analysis.Experience in related administrative support required. High level of knowledge with FIS, HRIS and RIS preferred, or equivalent information systems is essential.Must have an aptitude for numbers, be analytical and have strong problem solving abilities.Strong communication skills (both oral and written).Highly developed computer skills in Excel, Word, email and internet. Ability to prioritize and complete many competing demands in order to meet strict deadlines with keen attention to detail. Must be highly service-oriented and possess strong interpersonal skills, and ability to work well in a team environment.Demonstrated ability exercise tact, good judgment and diplomacy when dealing with staff, faculty and students. Applicants are also expected to show evidence of a commitment to equity, diversity, inclusion, and the promotion of a respectful and collegial learning and working environment.

Assets (Nonessential):

Experience working in a post-secondary or public sector environment is preferred.Knowledge of the Universitys Guide to Financial Management is an asset.

To be successful in this role you will be:

AccountableApproachableEfficientMeticulousOrganizedPossess a positive attitude",,https://www.glassdoor.com/partner/jobListing.htm?pos=111&ao=102921&s=58&guid=000001702fec1280bb2212d1a785c202&src=GD_JOB_AD&t=SR&extid=1&exst=EL&ist=&ast=EL&vt=w&slr=true&cs=1_0d9ba070&cb=1581351965776&jobListingId=3480641957,3480641957,glassdoor,University of Toronto
new,Research Associate (Limited Term)- 2 Year Term,University of Toronto,Toronto,2020-02-08,"The University of Toronto Electric Vehicle Research Centre (UTEV) is seeking a dynamic and independent Research Associate to lead and conduct research in the area of Vehicle Electrification. The researcher will take a leadership role to fulfill the research goals of the principal investigator (PI). Specifically, research at UTEV focuses upon identifying new system topologies to substantially increase efficiency and safety of electric vehicle powertrains. In order to facilitate electric vehicle adoption, UTEV also focuses upon achieving ubiquitous electric vehicle charging infrastructure through on-board charging systems and wireless charging technology.

Responsibilities

Lead research and development of power electronic systems (both software and hardware development)

Liaise with contractors and suppliers to develop aforementioned power electronic systems.

Provide research project support for graduate students: monitor technical progress of graduate students, and support the achievement of research project objectives.

Develop and execute research vision with PI to achieve research goals.

Work with PIs and graduate students to track research progress/milestones, organize research project reviews with internal UTEV staff and external UTEV partners.

Collaborate with national and international sponsors to facilitate technology transfer: coordinate IP discussions with the UofT Innovations and Partnerships Office (IPO), support the process of knowledge transfer and commercialization of research developments.

Grant / Invention disclosure / Patent writing: develop and submit research grant applications. Prepare project reports for sponsors. Prepare and write invention disclosures and patent filings.

Publish both at conferences and in journals.

Monitor global EV developments - Product and Technology Watch / New Developments.

Qualifications:

Ph.D. in Electrical Engineering specializing in power electronics.

Excellent communication skills

Demonstrated excellent leadership/organization as a team leader in R&D projects.

Demonstrated research excellence in the area of power electronics with strong publication record in premier power electronics venues.

Demonstrated experience with topologies, control and modulation of power electronic converters for electric vehicle charging and traction applications.

Demonstrated experience with efficiency calculations, optimization techniques, real-time control, thermal design, gate driver design, and practical issues in energy systems.

Extensive experience in design and prototyping of medium power, power electronic converter systems (above 10kW).

Knowledge of SAE/IEC/UL standards related to the deployment of power electronic converters in electric vehicles.

Advanced skills with the following analysis and design tools: PLECS, MATLAB and Altium Designer or equivalent. .

Advanced skills in embedded software design for DSPs (C/C++) and FPGAs (Altera or Xilinx).

Skilled with MS Office and Linux.

Travel: None

Notes:

Candidates are requested to submit a cover letter, CV, and a 1- to 2-page research vision in their online application. Applicants research vision should convey how the candidate plans to use their power electronics expertise in transforming the electric vehicle industry.

This is a 2-year term position with possibility of renewal.",,https://www.glassdoor.com/partner/jobListing.htm?pos=113&ao=437149&s=58&guid=000001702fec1280bb2212d1a785c202&src=GD_JOB_AD&t=SR&extid=1&exst=EL&ist=&ast=EL&vt=w&slr=true&cs=1_1a58a202&cb=1581351965777&jobListingId=3486028010,3486028010,glassdoor,University of Toronto
new,"Director, Institutional Initiatives",University of Toronto,Toronto,2020-02-08,"The Vice-President, Research & Innovation (VPRI) portfolio supports the University of Toronto as a top public research university in the world. Our mission is to create the most supportive environment possible so that our researchers, innovators and learners can do what they do best advance understanding and apply new knowledge. Our work supports, fosters and promotes the research and innovation culture and activities of our faculty, staff and students, along with our partner hospitals, funding sponsors, and partners in the public and private sector. VPRI provides a full range of services including guidance to faculty, staff and students on funding opportunities, research agreement negotiation, oversight and accountability services including research accounting, environmental health and safety, innovation and entrepreneurship, partnerships, policies and procedures, and institutional awards and honours.

Reporting to the Assistant Vice-President, Research Services, but exercising significant independence, the Director is responsible for providing the highest standards of professionalism and dedication to achieve maximum quality and productivity in the delivery of research support mechanisms, tools and services within the University of Toronto community. The incumbent will provide ongoing innovation in the development and delivery of services to the research community and will be a strategic leader in the Division of the Vice-President Research & Innovation (VPRI). The position provides leadership, strategic planning and direction for services provided by their staff to facilitate optimal participation and maximum success in a range of sponsored research opportunities that operate at the institutional level and through which millions of dollars are secured annually, helping to attract and retain world-class faculty members, graduate students and other research personnel. Key programs overseen by the Institutional Initiatives team include, for example, CFI, CRC, and the Ontario Research Fund.

Qualifications:

Education:

University degree; graduate degree preferred or the equivalent combination of education and experience.

Experience:

Seven to Ten (7-10) years of progressive experience in research administration or related research or research management activities. Extensive knowledge of and experience in a research-intensive university environment. Experience in engagement with external bodies; success in attracting external funding and extensive knowledge of funding procedures; substantial experience in research management preferable. Experience negotiating research contracts, and promoting research opportunities. Staff management and leadership experience, preferably in a unionized environment.

Skills:

Expert knowledge of Canadian research administration policies and practices. Depth and breadth of knowledge of research funding programs, and related university policies, procedures, and regulations, knowledge of university structures & operations. Advanced financial analysis and planning ability to support strategic planning of major research funding allocations. Proven ability to liaise, build and maintain relationships with internal and external stakeholders, strong contract negotiation skills. Exceptional communication skills (written and oral), presentation and interpersonal skills. Highly developed strategic planning skills. Understanding of risk assessment and mitigation.

Other:

Ability to manage a complex and varied operation in a high-demand environment, meeting the highest standards in quality and productivity, ability to strategically manage multiple projects with competing deadlines in a results-oriented environment. Demonstrated ability to convey information and problem solve with a high degree of creativity, flexibility, proactivity and planning. Requirement to maintain strict confidentiality. Working knowledge of the Universitys Administrative Management Systems, or equivalent.

Travel: None",,https://www.glassdoor.com/partner/jobListing.htm?pos=114&ao=437149&s=58&guid=000001702fec1280bb2212d1a785c202&src=GD_JOB_AD&t=SR&extid=1&exst=EL&ist=&ast=EL&vt=w&slr=true&cs=1_74c76eea&cb=1581351965778&jobListingId=3486028028,3486028028,glassdoor,University of Toronto
new,Translational Research Program Officer,University of Toronto,Toronto,2020-02-04,"About us:

Home to over 40 departments and institutes, the University of Toronto's Faculty of Medicine lies at the heart of the Toronto Academic Health Science Network and is a global leader in ground-breaking research and education, spanning clinical medicine, basic science and the rehabilitation sciences sectors.

Your opportunity:

The Department of Laboratory Medicine and Pathobiology (LMP) occupies a unique position at the interface between basic biomedical science and clinical practice. We are an assembly of over 350 investigators, scientists, and clinicians, who educate and mentor trainees pursuing undergraduate, graduate, and postgraduate medical studies, engaged in investigating disease mechanisms and patterns and translating new knowledge and discoveries into improved health outcomes for patients and populations.

As Translational Research Program Officer, you will serve as a key resource for students and faculty of the Translational Research Program (TRP); a two-year professional Masters of Health Science program, where our students learn to catalyze transformation of scientific discoveries into problem solving applications that benefit human health. You will lead recruitment initiatives and promote the program to prospective students and employers. You will build close relationships with students as you track and facilitate their success through the program and beyond. Leveraging your well-developed analytical and problem solving skills, you will support the Program Director and senior program leadership in building an enriched and inclusive curriculum and learning experience, and seeking opportunities to engage organizational partners in the process.

Your responsibilities will include:

Advising students on program and course requirements and providing support and general referrals to students in distressAnalyzing, scoring, ranking incoming applicationsPromoting programs at recruitment events and promoting partnerships with internal and external organizationsDetermining logistics and activities for events and programmingCoordinating the production and distribution of communications materials and writing grant applicationsAnalyzing service delivery and internal processes and recommending improvementsDirecting the activities of a staff-appointed employee

Essential Qualifications:

Bachelor's Degree or acceptable combination of equivalent experienceMinimum three years of progressively responsible administrative experience in a university environment coordinating academic programsDemonstrated student recruitment experience, including coordinating events and developing promotional and outreach materialsExperience fostering partnerships with internal and external stakeholders, including prospective students and facultyExperience collecting, interpretation and analyzing data from multiple sources for reportingExperience preparing communication materials and grant applicationsExperience developing new procedures and processes and seeing them through from conception to implementation, and evaluating existing programs and systems and making recommendations for changeExperience supervising appointed staff within a unionized environmentAdvanced proficiency working with MS Office Suite, learning management systems, content management systems, survey tools and e-mail marketing tools (MailChimp, Constant Contact)Excellent communication skills, both written and oral, with the ability to communicate with a diverse audienceStrong leadership skills, including the ability to persuade, encourage and motivate others while fostering strong relationships and coordinating teamsProven ability to assume responsibility and manage own work with little supervision or direction while supervising and supporting staffPossesses exceptional organizational skills and the flexibility to quickly adapt to shifting priorities, demands and timelines while working with high volumes and competing deadlinesProactive and highly resourceful with a strong aptitude for analyzing situations and data and applying solid problem solving skillsDemonstrated ability to predict the need for changes and react quickly to make recommendations and/or implement new policies/processesShows sound judgment in the handling of sensitive and confidential mattersConducts all business in a welcoming and professional manner

Assets (Nonessential):

Knowledge of the Faculty of Medicine and its hospital and industry affiliationsKnowledge of University and graduate policies and procedures with regard to the School of Graduate Studies (SGS)

To be successful in this role you will be:

AccountableProblem solverSelf-directedTeam player",,https://www.glassdoor.com/partner/jobListing.htm?pos=115&ao=102921&s=58&guid=000001702fec1280bb2212d1a785c202&src=GD_JOB_AD&t=SR&extid=1&exst=EL&ist=&ast=EL&vt=w&slr=true&cs=1_d3c329bf&cb=1581351965779&jobListingId=3481023462,3481023462,glassdoor,University of Toronto
new,Executive Assistant,University of Toronto,Toronto,2020-02-08,"Under the direction of the Executive Director, Equity, Diversity and Inclusion, the Executive Assistant will provide a high level of executive confidential administrative support. In addition to managing the calendar, the incumbent provides case management support, committee, project, event, logistic and administrative support to the Executive Director, Equity, Diversity and Inclusion. The incumbent develops communication materials, undertakes research on a variety of topics, and develops presentations (including PowerPoint).The incumbent will have daily access to confidential and sensitive information.

The Executive Assistant is responsible for managing the Office and is expected to work with limited direction, executing a significant amount of judgment, tact, diplomacy, confidentiality and discretion in all aspects of the role. The incumbent acts as a central contact between senior administrators and faculty, both internal and external to the University, including senior leaders from the Office of the President, the Provost, and the Vice-President of Human Resources and Equity. The Executive Assistant must be able to handle multiple projects and tasks simultaneously in a highly confidential and credible manner.

The incumbent works in a complex environment that requires a high degree of sensitivity, responsiveness and a need to maintain absolute confidentiality. The incumbent must be a highly motivated, flexible and energetic individual who enjoys the challenge of working in a dynamic, fast-paced environment.

(MINIMUM)

Education:

University degree or an equivalent combination of education and experience.

Experience:

Six to Eight (6-8) years of related experience required, preferably within a post-secondary or government environment. Demonstrated communication and administrative support in a dynamic senior executive office. A thorough understanding of equity, diversity, inclusion, and discrimination and harassment prevention frameworks. Professional experience in and understanding of complex issues related to equity and diversity as they relate to the student experience and the workplace strongly preferred. Demonstrated excellent administrative skills and coordination skills. Demonstrated knowledge and understanding of equity, diversity, and inclusion including discrimination faced by marginalized communities. Demonstrated experience with successful large and small event planning. Relevant experience working/volunteering in a student society or campus organization an asset. Experience working within a post-secondary context is strongly preferred.

Skills:

Proficiency with MS Office (including Excel and Outlook) experience using databases as well as project management tools; familiarity with Microsoft Sharepoint an asset. Familiarity with databases.

Other:

Strong oral and written communication, interpersonal, analytical, decision-making and organizational skills. Demonstrated ability to draft clear and concise correspondence. Strong customer-service orientation. Demonstrated initiative, accuracy and meticulous attention to detail. Demonstrated judgment, tact, discretion and ability to handle complex matters of a sensitive and confidential nature. Ability to organize a heavy and fluctuating workload in a changing environment. Ability to work under pressure and to meet deadlines. Ability to assimilate and interpret significant amounts of information. Ability to work effectively and professionally, both independently and within a team environment.",,https://www.glassdoor.com/partner/jobListing.htm?pos=116&ao=102921&s=58&guid=000001702fec1280bb2212d1a785c202&src=GD_JOB_AD&t=SR&extid=1&exst=EL&ist=&ast=EL&vt=w&slr=true&cs=1_67424171&cb=1581351965780&jobListingId=3486458007,3486458007,glassdoor,University of Toronto
new,Academic Advisor - Intercultural Learning & Experience,University of Toronto,Toronto,2020-02-08,"About us:

The Rotman School of Management is part of the University of Toronto, a global centre of research and teaching excellence at the heart of Canadas commercial capital. Rotman is a catalyst for transformative learning, insights and public engagement, bringing together diverse views and initiatives around a defining purpose: to create value for business and society. Visit rotman.utoronto.ca

Your opportunity:

The Rotman Commerce program is offered jointly by the Rotman School of Management and the Faculty of Arts and Science. It is a highly respected, highly competitive program within the business, financial and academic communities. The Rotman Commerce Academic Services Team serves approximately 2900 in-program undergraduate business students of the Bachelor of Commerce program. Rotman Commerce offers its students a rich and rigorous academic program alongside ample opportunities to develop themselves personally and professionally.

As the Academic Advisor - Intercultural Learning & Experience, you will be responsible for ensuring that Rotman Commerce students receive accurate, timely and responsive advising on academic matters (e.g. program and course selection, academic policy/procedure, program progression and degree requirements, etc.) and for developing programs and supports to promote academic success with an emphasis on intercultural learning and experience.

Your responsibilities will include:

Advising students on academic and/or financial matters by providing options and consequences incorporating personal circumstances impacting academic success and an understanding of an individual's background

Acting as the first point of contact for program-related enquiries

Providing detailed information on program and/or course eligibility requirements, procedures, policies and deadlines

Reviewing and approving changes to program requirements for exceptional cases

Monitoring student degree progress

Developing program and service materials

Leading seminars and/or workshops

Conceptualizing, organizing and executing event activities

Qualifications:

Essential Qualifications:

Bachelor's Degree or acceptable combination of equivalent education and experience.

Minimum four (4) years, full time, progressively more senior work experience in student advising, student services or related area

Demonstrated skills, training and experience in advising on academic and programmatic matters, student development programming and group facilitation in a University setting

Knowledge and experience in academic policy and procedure, preferably at the University of Toronto

Expertise with intercultural diversity, equity, and international learning opportunities

Demonstrated ability to design and implement programming that integrates and supports all students in the global classroom

Demonstrated ability to organize and prioritize work; strong attention to detail; demonstrated initiative and discretion

Well developed oral and written communication skills with exceptional presentation and group facilitation skills

Ability to work effectively with highly diverse and demanding communities of students

Demonstrated good judgement and ability to interact with others with tact, courtesy and patience

Ability to work under pressure with a large volume of work under limited supervision

Must be able to work independently and as part of a team

Excellent computer skills including MS Office (Word, Excel and PowerPoint) and e-mail

Assets (Nonessential):

Advanced degree in higher education, counselling or advising

Undergraduate/Graduate degree in business

Experience supervising student mentors and volunteers

Knowledge in the practical application of student development theory

Working knowledge of ROSI or similar Student Record System

Experience using social networking tools for student outreach and advising

Fluency in a second language other than English

To be successful in this role you will be:

Accountable

Communicator

Diplomatic

Organized

Responsible

Team player

Travel: None",,https://www.glassdoor.com/partner/jobListing.htm?pos=117&ao=437149&s=58&guid=000001702fec1280bb2212d1a785c202&src=GD_JOB_AD&t=SR&extid=1&exst=EL&ist=&ast=EL&vt=w&slr=true&cs=1_820226bb&cb=1581351965781&jobListingId=3486028009,3486028009,glassdoor,University of Toronto
new,Senior Financial Officer,University of Toronto,Toronto,2020-02-05,"About us:

The universitys second largest division, U of T Mississauga has 17 academic departments and offers 156 programs in 92 areas of study. Home to approximately 15,000 students and over 1,000 faculty and staff, the campus houses the Mississauga Academy of Medicine, Centre for Medicinal Chemistry and Institute for Management and Innovation. With its distinctive interdisciplinary programs such as forensic sciences and biomedical communications, U of T Mississauga offers a broad array of continuing education programs and professional masters programs. Established in 1967, the campus features award-winning architecture, robust community partnerships and a dynamic student environment set amongst 225 acres along the Credit River in Mississauga.

Your opportunity:

As a Senior Financial Officer, you will be working closely with various departments across UTM to ensure that business transactions are aligned with general accepted accounting principles and the University's financial policies. You will also be involved in complex financial analysis. You will be bring a strong understanding of accounting principles and be able to apply them to various issues. You will also possess superior verbal and written communication skills and a high level of professionalism.

Your responsibilities will include:

Overseeing the financial management of budgets that include strategic planning, analysis and forecasting

Interpreting and applying policies and procedures when making independent decisions

Forecasting and planning financial activities incorporating budgets with multiple sources of revenue and/or recoveries

Implementing plans and process improvements for financial administration activities

Applying the University Guide to Financial Management and other applicable policies, agency and regulatory requirements

Analyzing information to identify spending trends and recommend cost saving measures

Conducting financial research and analysis

Identifying and analyzing data discrepancies and taking necessary actions to correct errors

Qualifications:

Essential Qualifications:

Bachelor's Degree with emphasis in accounting or acceptable combination of equivalent experience. Accounting designation an asset.

Minimum five years relevant financial budget and accounting experience

Demonstrated experience with budgets, forecasts and variance analysis

Experience dealing with various levels in the organization

Strong ability to identify critical issues and problem solve independently

Excellent attention to detail

Advanced computer skills: Microsoft Office: Excel (Advanced formula & functions, pivot tables), Word, Power point

Excellent organization and time management skills and ability to prioritize tasks

Excellent verbal and written communication skills

Assets (Nonessential):

SAP experience an asset

Demonstrated cost accounting experience an asset

To be successful in this role you will be:

Accountable

Goal oriented

Motivated self-learner

Organized

Problem solver

Team player

Travel: None

Notes: This is an 18 month Term position.",,https://www.glassdoor.com/partner/jobListing.htm?pos=118&ao=437149&s=58&guid=000001702fec1280bb2212d1a785c202&src=GD_JOB_AD&t=SR&extid=1&exst=EL&ist=&ast=EL&vt=w&slr=true&cs=1_aec3c9f6&cb=1581351965782&jobListingId=3482439175,3482439175,glassdoor,University of Toronto
new,"Assistant Professor, Teaching Stream  Computer and Data Science",University of Toronto,Toronto,2020-02-08,"The Faculty of Applied Science and Engineering at the University of Toronto invites applications for a continuing teaching stream appointment in the field of computer and data science. The appointment will be to the Department of Mechanical & Industrial Engineering at the rank of Assistant Professor, Teaching Stream, with an expected start date of July 1, 2020, or shortly thereafter. The successful candidate will teach introductory and advanced courses in programming, data science, and related areas, primarily to students enrolled in the Facultys Engineering Science program.

Applicants are expected to have a PhD in engineering, computer science, statistics, data science, or a related field at the time of appointment or soon after. We seek candidates whose teaching interests complement and strengthen our existing departmental strengths in the Department of Mechanical & Industrial Engineering and the Division of Engineering Science. They must have a demonstrated balance of theoretical and practical skills, knowledge, and experience in computer science and data science with experience applying computer and data science across multiple engineering and non-engineering domains, and an interest in integrating engineering and design principles into computer and data science practice.

Candidates must have a demonstrated record of excellence in teaching and pedagogical inquiry, and have undergraduate teaching experience that includes lecture preparation and delivery, assessment, and broader curriculum development. Candidates must show a commitment to improving their pedagogical practices, and a record of teaching-related scholarly activities.

Evidence of excellence in teaching and pedagogical inquiry can be demonstrated through teaching accomplishments, awards and accolades, presentations at significant conferences, the teaching dossier submitted as part of the application including a strong teaching statement, sample syllabi, course materials, teaching evaluations, and teaching-related scholarly activity, as well as strong letters of reference from referees of high standing.

Applicants must have, or be eligible for, registration as a Professional Engineer in Canada.

Salary is commensurate with qualifications and experience.

Engineering Science is an accredited undergraduate engineering program within the Faculty of Applied Science and Engineering at the University of Toronto. The Division of Engineering Science is the administrative unit responsible for this program and has a world-renowned reputation for innovative engineering pedagogy that integrates theoretical rigour with engineering practicality. Students in Engineering Science take two years of a Foundation curriculum followed by two years of a discipline-specific Major curriculum. The successful applicant will teach computer science courses in the Foundation curriculum and will support and contribute to the ongoing development of existing and new data science-related courses in the Majors. For information about the Engineering Science program please visit: engsci.utoronto.ca.

The Faculty of Applied Science and Engineering offers opportunities for collaborative and interdisciplinary research and teaching, and the excitement of working with a diverse student population. Established in 1873, the Faculty of Applied Science and Engineering has earned an international reputation for excellence in education and knowledge creation and is known as a forward-thinking resource to address global concerns. The Department of Mechanical & Industrial Engineering is home to the top mechanical and industrial engineering programs in Canada and is involved with the delivery of courses in the Engineering Science Machine Intelligence and Robotics Majors. For more information about the Faculty of Applied Science and Engineering, please visit: engineering.utoronto.ca, and for more information about the Department of Mechanical & Industrial Engineering, please visit mie.utoronto.ca.

As the economic and intellectual hub of Canada, Toronto provides access to leading policy and decision makers at all levels, and is a vibrant, cosmopolitan and safe city.

All qualified candidates are invited to apply by clicking on the link below. Applications must include: 1. A cover letter and detailed curriculum vitae; 2. A teaching dossier, including a statement of teaching philosophy and interests, sample syllabi and course materials, teaching evaluations, teaching accomplishments, and teaching-related scholarly activities. Submission guidelines may be found at http://uoft.me/how-to-apply. It is recommended that attached documents be combined into one or two files in PDF/MS Word format.

Applicants must also arrange for three letters of reference (signed and on letterhead) to be sent by referees directly to the University by the closing date. These letters should comment specifically on the applicants teaching experience and expertise, and suitability for a teaching stream faculty position. These letters must be sent to: director.engsci@utoronto.ca.

All application materials, including reference letters, must be received by March 31, 2020.

The University of Toronto is strongly committed to diversity within its community and especially welcomes applications from racialized persons / persons of colour, women, Indigenous / Aboriginal People of North America, persons with disabilities, LGBTQ persons, and others who may contribute to the further diversification of ideas.

As part of your application, you will be asked to complete a brief Diversity Survey. This survey is voluntary. Any information directly related to you is confidential and cannot be accessed by search committees or human resources staff. Results will be aggregated for institutional planning purposes. For more information, please see http://uoft.me/UP.

All qualified applicants are encouraged to apply; however, Canadians and permanent residents will be given priority.",,https://www.glassdoor.com/partner/jobListing.htm?pos=120&ao=102921&s=58&guid=000001702fec1280bb2212d1a785c202&src=GD_JOB_AD&t=SR&extid=1&exst=EL&ist=&ast=EL&vt=w&slr=true&cs=1_c85c313a&cb=1581351965784&jobListingId=3486446874,3486446874,glassdoor,University of Toronto
new,"Executive Director, Partnerships",University of Toronto,Toronto,2020-02-06,"The Executive Director, Partnerships is responsible for the Faculty of Applied Science and Engineerings overall research partnership strategy. The incumbent is responsible for developing, leading and executing the Facultys partnership strategic plan to ensure the success of the Facultys research initiative. The Executive Director, Partnerships identifies, cultivates, and solicits corporations, government agencies, and other organizations (e.g. industry associations, NGOs, centers of excellence) with an interest partnering with the Faculty and in making grants to support research initiatives and teaching.

The Executive Director, Partnerships acts as an expert in business development and stakeholder management in a complex environment. This includes the ability to negotiate partnerships and influence key decision makers at the senior executive level within corporations, government and other key organizations that are part of the advanced research and innovation landscape within Toronto, Canada and globally. This position is responsible for the strategic and business planning, inclusive of setting and achieving partnership targets, and managing the partnerships budget.

Reporting to the Dean, the Executive Director, Partnerships works closely and partners with the Vice-Dean Research , the Executive Director, Advancement, Departmental Chairs and Institute Directors to advance the Facultys mission of global excellence and impact in research by:

Creating strong and sustained partnerships with major corporations, government agencies and research-based centers of excellence that support advanced research;

Creating, Developing and leading the implementation of the Facultys strategic partnerships plan;

Making decisions that advance the partnership business plan while also balancing the needs, concerns and opinions of a wide range of internal U of T stakeholders.

In support of the above, the incumbent also works in close partnership with the Office of the Vice President, Research and Innovation, Office of the Vice President, International, and Chief of Government Relations to maximize outreach efforts and ensure that partnership agreements are developed and executed effectively and efficiently.

Qualifications:

Education: PhD in a field of engineering or science, or equivalent combination of education and experience; P. Eng.

Experience: 10 years of relevant experience. Required to have direct experience in advanced research and development in engineering and/or applied science. This will be needed to liaise successfully with faculty members, corporate R&D partners, as well the Provincial and Federal governments. Proven success in executing large-scale, strategic research partnerships development, developing projects and executing business plans; carrying out and disseminating research within an academic environment acquired during a doctoral program. Proven experience in collaborative, industry-supported, research in engineering. Demonstrated experience in identifying and cultivating funded research partnerships with academic and corporate organizations engaged in advanced engineering research. Significant experience in industry, in areas such as business development, marketing, strategic planning, or management consulting, with proven success in revenue generation.

Deep understanding of advanced research, technology development and engineering. A nuanced understanding of the research and innovation landscape within Toronto, Canada and globally and established relationships with the key decision makers

Skills: Outstanding ability to speak and write clearly and persuasively. Ability to actively listen to partners, donors and faculty with a technical focus, identify areas of common interest, and to articulate a compelling case for the Faculty of Applied Science and Engineering. Exceptional ability to organize, and motivate faculty as well as external advocates and volunteers.

Other: Appreciation for new technologies and their role in society; familiarity with GTA companies and other relevant industries an asset. Proven ability to work collegially and effectively, across the university and across corporate organizations, with research administrators, principal investigators, advancement professionals, Faculty administrators, and other external constituencies.

Excellent analytical skills and an ability to solve problems in a creative and efficient manner are also essential. The position will require strong decision-making skills and superior planning and time management skills with a focus on executing and completing tasks under pressure and within deadlines.

Ability to travel and work off site within the GTA and international destinations.

Travel: Extended",,https://www.glassdoor.com/partner/jobListing.htm?pos=119&ao=437149&s=58&guid=000001702fec1280bb2212d1a785c202&src=GD_JOB_AD&t=SR&extid=1&exst=EL&ist=&ast=EL&vt=w&slr=true&cs=1_b29dd341&cb=1581351965783&jobListingId=3483348966,3483348966,glassdoor,University of Toronto
new,Assistant Professor - Pure Mathematics,University of Toronto,Mississauga,2020-02-07,"The Department of Mathematical and Computational Sciences at the University of Toronto Mississauga (UTM) invites applications for up to two tenure-stream appointments in the area of Pure Mathematics. The appointments will be at the rank of Assistant Professor, and will commence on July 1, 2020, or shortly thereafter.

Applicants must have a PhD degree in Mathematics or a related area by the time of appointment, or shortly thereafter, with a demonstrated record of excellence in research and a commitment to excellence in teaching. Candidates in all areas of Pure Mathematics will be considered.

We seek exceptional candidates whose research and teaching interests complement and enhance our existing departmental strengths (see our websites at http://www.utm.utoronto.ca/math-cs-stats/ and http://www.math.toronto.edu/). The successful candidate will be expected to pursue innovative and independent research at the highest international level and establish an outstanding, competitive, and externally funded research program. The successful candidate will be a member of the tri-campus graduate Department of Mathematics at the University of Toronto.

Candidates must provide evidence of research excellence as demonstrated by a record of publications in top-ranked Mathematics journals or forthcoming publications meeting high international standards, the submitted research statement, presentations at significant conferences, awards and accolades, and strong endorsements from referees of high standing.

Evidence of commitment to excellence in teaching will be provided through teaching accomplishments, the teaching dossier, a teaching statement, sample course syllabi, and the teaching evaluations submitted as part of the application, as well as strong letters of reference.

Salary will be commensurate with qualifications and experience.

The University of Toronto is an international leader in Mathematics research and education. It offers the opportunity to teach, conduct research, and live in one of the most diverse metropolitan areas in the world. For more information, please see our websites, http://www.utm.utoronto.ca/math-cs-stats/ and http://www.math.toronto.edu/.

All qualified candidates are invited to apply through MathJobs at: https://www.mathjobs.org/jobs/jobs/14479. Applicants must submit a cover letter; a current curriculum vitae; a list of publications; a research statement outlining current and future research interests; and a teaching dossier to include a teaching statement, sample course syllabi, and teaching evaluations. Applicants must also arrange to have at least four valid letters of reference (on letterhead, dated and signed) uploaded through MathJobs directly by the writers, including at least one primarily addressing the candidate's teaching, by the closing date.

Review of applications will begin after November 14, 2019 and applicants should endeavour to have all materials submitted by then, however applications will be accepted until the position is filled. For additional enquiries, please contact Julia Martyn, Chairs Assistant, at julia.martyn@utoronto.ca.

The University of Toronto is strongly committed to diversity within its community and especially welcomes applications from racialized persons / persons of colour, women, Indigenous / Aboriginal People of North America, persons with disabilities, LGBTQ persons, and others who may contribute to the further diversification of ideas.

All qualified candidates are encouraged to apply; however, Canadians and permanent residents will be given priority.",,https://www.glassdoor.com/partner/jobListing.htm?pos=122&ao=102921&s=58&guid=000001702fec1280bb2212d1a785c202&src=GD_JOB_AD&t=SR&extid=1&exst=EL&ist=&ast=EL&vt=w&slr=true&cs=1_5b455ad2&cb=1581351965786&jobListingId=3331646717,3331646717,glassdoor,University of Toronto
new,Indigenous Research Officer,University of Toronto,Toronto,2020-02-06,"About us:

The Dalla Lana School of Public Health is a Faculty of the University of Toronto that originated as one of the Schools of Hygiene begun by the Rockefeller Foundation in 1927. The School went through a dramatic renaissance after the 2003 SARS crisis and it is now the largest public health school in Canada, with more than 850 faculty, 1,000 students, and research and training partnerships with institutions throughout Toronto and the world. With $40.4 million in research funding per year, the School supports discovery in global health, tobacco impacts on health, occupational disease and disability, air pollution, inner city and Indigenous health, among many other areas.

Your opportunity:

The Waakebiness-Bryce Institute for Indigenous Health brings together researchers and educators across the University of Toronto to work with community partners and Indigenous peoples to address the complex factors that underlie disparities in health between Indigenous and non-Indigenous people.

As the Indigenous Research Officer, you will be an integral part of a dynamic team supporting with the culturally-based research initiatives at the Waakebiness-Bryce Institute for Indigenous Health. Working under the direction of the Director and/or Associate Director, you will be responsible for coordinating and supporting with cultural programming, data collection and tabulation, generating reports, Indigenous community and participant recruitment, and a variety of additional research related administrative tasks. Your background in research combined with your knowledge of Indigenous culture and health will contribute to advancing the Institutes overall goals and initiatives.

Your responsibilities will include:

Applying established western and Indigenous standards when preparing routine samples for research projects and/or experiments

Proofing and posting adverts to recruit Indigenous community partners and individual applicants and scheduling study participants

Disseminating and collecting research surveys and questionnaires

Maintaining a database and generating reports using Indigenous knowledges frameworks

Coordinating meeting schedules, agendas, materials, action and follow-up items

Coding qualitative and quantitative research data

Responding to enquiries within the defined scope of the role and redirecting as appropriate

Providing orientation to other team members on Indigenous and western work procedures and practices

Qualifications:

Essential Qualifications:

Bachelor's Degree or acceptable combination of equivalent experience.

Minimum two years of relevant experience working within an Indigenous research environment

Experience coordinating Indigenous academic research projects

Experience compiling Indigenous qualitative and quantitative research results and producing tables, figures and data reports

Demonstrated experience recruiting Indigenous community partners and study participants

Experience maintaining databases

Experience providing administrative support (i.e. scheduling and organizing research team meetings, preparing meeting materials, tracking progress on action items and deliverables)

Must have experience working with Indigenous communities in research

Demonstrated knowledge of applicable research western and Indigenous regulations, policies and guidelines

Knowledge of SPSS, SAS or other statistical software packages

Knowledge of the Indigenous determinants of health, and health inequalities, research and intersectionality

High level of Proficiency in Microsoft office products (Word, Excel, PowerPoint)

Excellent interpersonal, organizational and communications skills (oral and written) with an ability to multi-task and prioritize competing demands

Highly developed presentation skills

Demonstrated ability to exercise initiative, discretion, judgement, diplomacy, tact and confidentiality

Excellent attention to detail, particularly when drafting, proofreading, and/or editing written materials

Strong Customer service orientation

Ability to work effectively with a diverse population and work collaboratively within a dynamic team environment

Assets (Nonessential):

Knowledge or proficiency in an Indigenous language

To be successful in this role you will be:

Communicator

Efficient

Organized

Possess a positive attitude

Resourceful

Team player

Travel: None

Notes: This is a 1 year term position.",,https://www.glassdoor.com/partner/jobListing.htm?pos=121&ao=437149&s=58&guid=000001702fec1280bb2212d1a785c202&src=GD_JOB_AD&t=SR&extid=1&exst=EL&ist=&ast=EL&vt=w&slr=true&cs=1_89b3d7fe&cb=1581351965785&jobListingId=3483348974,3483348974,glassdoor,University of Toronto
new,Administrative Assistant to Associate Dean (TERM),University of Toronto,Toronto,2020-02-05,"About us:

Ranked the top school of social work in Canada and the second world-wide, the Factor-Inwentash Faculty of Social Work offers a professional Master of Social Work degree as well as doctoral education that produces strong researchers, educators, and leaders in the social work field. Through research, training, leadership, and service, its students and faculty address pressing social priorities ranging from aging, child welfare, HIV, mental health, trauma, and structural and neighbourhood violence.

Faculty and staff work together to provide an open, professional environment that fosters a culture built on respect, goal orientation, self-motivation, accountability, and teamwork. We believe in recognizing our employees contributions to the advancement of the divisions goals while promoting a strong commitment to work-life balance among our employees.

Your opportunity:

Under the direction of the Associate Dean, Academic (ADA), you will be responsible for overseeing the day-to-day delivery requirements and operational needs of the ADAs Office. You will be responsible for coordinating meeting schedules, agendas, materials, action and follow-up items. You will also be responsible for organizing, verifying, drafting, preparing and distributing education and programming related materials such as syllabi, course evaluations, strategic initiatives, accreditation documentations, etc. In addition, duties include the logistical implementation of Social Work academic program events including but not limited to the SWK theory week, orientation, student events, meetings and conferences involving the Office of the Associate Dean, Academic.

This position supports communications by writing, editing and maintaining digital content for print and on-line communication channels including the ADAs e-digest to students and the Facultys website. Serving as a resource to others, this position provides appropriate referrals to resources to faculty, staff and students, as well as provides guidance on the Universitys canvas-based on line teaching and learning environment.

Your responsibilities will include:

Overseeing day-to-day service delivery requirements and operational needs

Coordinating meeting schedules, agendas, materials, action and follow-up items

Keeping well-informed on leadership commitments and priorities

Coordinating tasks for projects and other strategic initiatives with stakeholders

Writing and editing digital communications

Drafting and editing content for print and/or online communications channels

Conceptualizing, organizing and executing event activities

Qualifications:

Essential Qualifications:

(MINIMUM)

Advanced College Diploma (3 years) in Business Administration or acceptable combination of equivalent experience.

Minimum three years experience in an administrative role supporting senior management preferably within a University or higher education environment.

Experience coordinating meeting schedules, agendas, materials, action and follow-up items; taking minutes

Experience coordinating tasks for projects and other strategic initiatives with stakeholders

Experience conceptualizing, organizing and executing event activities

Experience writing and editing digital communications; experience maintaining information on websites.

A high level of proficiency with Microsoft Word, Excel, PowerPoint and related software applications to perform a variety work.

Proven ability to exhibit the highest standards of professional ethics including confidentiality and integrity, with a confident demeanor and excellent rapport when interacting with all levels of faculty, staff, students, alumni and other constituencies

Excellent verbal and written communication skills (spelling, grammar) including editing and proofreading.

Demonstrated ability to perform duties with a high level of professionalism, flexibility, discretion, judgment, diplomacy and tact.

Highly professional and proactive, and demonstrate the ability to quickly adapt to changing circumstances and confidently identify and manage priorities.

Strong attention to detail but with the ability to process multiple requests and tasks in a timely manner.

Must have excellent interpersonal skills and be a team player.

Must possess a thorough knowledge of professional office procedures, good judgment, discretion and problem solving skills.

To be successful in this role you will be:

Achievement oriented

Approachable

Diplomatic

Efficient

Meticulous

Multi-tasker

Problem solver

Travel: None

Notes:

This posting is for a term opportunity that will end on December 22, 2020.",,https://www.glassdoor.com/partner/jobListing.htm?pos=124&ao=437149&s=58&guid=000001702fec1280bb2212d1a785c202&src=GD_JOB_AD&t=SR&extid=1&exst=EL&ist=&ast=EL&vt=w&slr=true&cs=1_f02cb3bb&cb=1581351965787&jobListingId=3482439167,3482439167,glassdoor,University of Toronto
new,Web Analyst/Developer,University of Toronto,Toronto,2020-02-04,"As a member of the Digital Creative Services team in University of Toronto Communications (UTC), the Web Analyst/Developer is responsible for the web-based support of the Universitys main website (utoronto.ca). The Analyst/Developer analyses, recommend and assist in the implementation of new web resources and applications and make recommendations for enhancements. Works with other members of the UTC team to consult, design, develop, implement, make recommendations and maintain the website and customize online tools, including databases, surveys, message boards and forms. Analysing user and business needs; designing, testing and modifying programming code to ensure compliance with best practices.

The position is also responsible for the development, assessment and reporting of website analytics across a number of central University channels through web-based tools and databases including a website inventory and Google Analytics. The Web Analyst/Developer proactively collects, analyzes and presents website performance insights, advising on key trends and issues on an ongoing basis. Based on this information, the Web Analyst provides recommendations for improvement.

(MINIMUM)

Education:

Bachelors degree in related field or acceptable equivalent of education and experience.

Experience:

Four (4) years relevant experience interpreting and analyzing web and social media analytics for communications insights, creating and presenting regular reports as part of an integrated team of designers, developers and subject-matter experts. Experience with database design, implementation and management within multi-server, enterprise-level web infrastructures; developing and preparing analytics reports. Hands-on technical experience maintaining databases in PHP frameworks and MySQL.
Experience measuring website performance with integrated social media components and APIs an asset.

Skills:

Excellent knowledge of Google Analytics, Google Tag Manager and proprietary social media analytics platforms (Twitter, Facebook, Instagram)Demonstrated ability to extract, analyze and interpret website and social media analytics in order to produce reports that identify and deprive actionable insights;Proficiency producing data visualizations using Excel, Tableau, or other similar softwareExcellent knowledge of modern web development frameworks including but not limited to PHP, HTML5, CSS/SASS/SCSS, JavaScript/JQuery and strong knowledge of accessible web design practices.Knowledge of current AODA legislation and ability to apply AA/AAA standards to existing code.Must be proficient in theming and customizing Drupal 7 and 8 instances. Strong proficiency in current web design trends and practices and persistent web-database integration.Demonstrated proficiency in GIT and other SVN frameworks and in Gulp.js or other task runners.Strong understanding of Quality Assurance in a multi-developer environment.Skilled in working with legacy code and incrementally upgrading using progressive enhancement principles.

Other:

Excellent interpersonal skills, demonstrated ability to work effectively independently and as part of a project team. Excellent problem solving and analytical skills. Organizational skills and demonstrated ability to work within tight timelines, to exercise good judgment. Ability to learn continually on-the-job, to keep abreast of rapid changes in systems, programming languages, and user requirements in highly dynamic environment. Excellent communications skills, superior attention to detail, client-focused and team-oriented; Professional demeanour and ability to exercise tact, judgment, discretion and a high degree of political acuity.",,https://www.glassdoor.com/partner/jobListing.htm?pos=123&ao=102921&s=58&guid=000001702fec1280bb2212d1a785c202&src=GD_JOB_AD&t=SR&extid=1&exst=EL&ist=&ast=EL&vt=w&slr=true&cs=1_c81022bf&cb=1581351965786&jobListingId=3481023837,3481023837,glassdoor,University of Toronto
new,Acting Chief Administrative Officer,University of Toronto,Toronto,2020-01-30,"Reporting to the Vice-President and Provost, and working with the Provostial leadership team, the Chief Administrative Officer (CAO) provides leadership and strategic direction for the overall business administration activities of the Division of the Vice-President and Provost (DVPP), and ensures the efficient and effective management of the DVPPs resources. The incumbent will lead through influence and work with key leaders to achieve the vision of the Division of the Vice-President and Provost and provide oversight of the implementation of administrative strategies that will support the Vice-President and Provosts mission and priorities. The CAO develops and executes organizational change management plans and strategies to address changes in administrative strategy including roles and responsibilities, organizational structure, and culture. The incumbent will act as a top advisor to the Vice-President and Provost and oversees critical strategic administrative issues that require attention; identify strategic issues that require intervention; advocate on behalf of the Vice-President and Provost to further the priorities of the Division; and ensure that operational strategies and programs are consistent with and support broader University of Toronto goals, within the framework of relevant legislation and University policies and procedures.

The incumbent oversees the delivery of administrative services and the development, implementation and evaluation of strategic short and long-term administrative plans that support the mission of the DVPP. These Administrative Services include Finance, Human Resources, Information Technology, Space Management, and Risk Management. The CAO is responsible for developing, coordinating and implementing excellent standards in the core administrative systems that support all areas within the DVPP, including all Vice-Provostial portfolios; Student Life; Enrolment Services; Centre for Teaching Support and Innovation; all Provostial Advisors; and units managed jointly with other divisions such as the Office of Indigenous Initiatives and the Sexual Violence Prevention and Support Centre. As the Vice-President and Provosts key financial and operational advisor, the CAO provides advice and support to the Vice-President and Provost, Vice-Provosts, and portfolio Directors.

The CAO is also responsible for tracking, implementing and reporting on commitments and expenditures from the Provosts central funds managed on behalf of the institution. These funds support activity within the academic divisions and include capital projects; research allowances for endowed chairholders, CRCs, Presidential Teaching Awardees, and University Professors; large donation matching; property acquisition; and mitigation of external risks. The CAO also manages the Provosts Legal Fund.

Additionally, the CAO provides finance and administrative services for the Presidents Office, including financial management and oversight for operating accounts and trust funds, payroll and other HR processes, and space management. The CAO also supports operations led by Presidential Advisors, such the Centre for the Environment, Climate Change and Sustainability.

The CAO manages salary administration for Principals and Deans, as well as the implementation of perquisites offered by the Provost, and oversees the review of all expense claims by Principals, Deans and Vice-Presidents to either the Provost or the President as the one-up authority.

The incumbent also provides strategic guidance and advice to Academic divisions on matters of finance, human resources, and operations. In this capacity, the CAO maintains excellent lines of communications and builds trusting relationships with Deans, divisional CAOs, and other senior administrative staff. As may be needed from time to time, the CAO leads an ad hoc administrative consultation team on behalf of the Vice-President and Provost to provide advice to divisions on administrative issues identified in cyclical reviews. The CAO also works on projects and initiatives to further the goals of the University as a whole.

The CAO represents the DVPP in consultation with, or advice to, other shared services divisions in regards to University-wide administrative practices, processes or policies.

Qualifications:

(MINIMUM)

Education:

Masters degree in Business Administration, Information Management, Finance or related professional designation or an equivalent combination of education and experience in the fields of finance, administration, operations and human resources

Experience:

A minimum of ten (10) years of senior level administrative support experience, preferably in an academic environment with experience across a range of University functions and operations (e.g., student services, registrarial services, business services operations). Experience in strategic planning, change management and policy development and implementation. Demonstrated knowledge of and experience in business process review and information technology project management, including how to adapt to new technologies and human resource management systems. Experience with effective management in a unionized environment. Demonstrated knowledge and experience with the Universitys budget and administrative policies as well as with managing a large operating budget including budget planning, modeling and forecasting.

Skills:

Superior interpersonal and communications skills,

Strong strategic and financial planning and management skills,

Strong problem solving skills and creativity,

Sophisticated understanding of administrative services (e.g. finance, human resources, facility operation, etc.)

Strong project management and negotiation skills,

Demonstrated commitment to equity and diversity.

Other:

Must be highly self-motivated and sustain a high degree of initiative. Must be a talented and fluent writer, able to concisely summarize information and provide a rationale for action. Must have sound judgment, tact, policy and analytical skills, and an eye for detail. Must be able to identify and understand emerging issues as well as set and manage priorities. Must have the ability to meet tight deadlines and to perform well under pressure. Must be able to deal with confidential information that has legal and labour relations implications. Must be able to work both independently and within a team environment.

Travel: None

Notes:

This is a Term position ending December 31, 2020.

Overtime on evenings and weekends will be required.",,https://www.glassdoor.com/partner/jobListing.htm?pos=126&ao=437149&s=58&guid=000001702fec1280bb2212d1a785c202&src=GD_JOB_AD&t=SR&extid=1&exst=EL&ist=&ast=EL&vt=w&slr=true&cs=1_8a8d0bd9&cb=1581351965789&jobListingId=3476502729,3476502729,glassdoor,University of Toronto
new,Assistant Professor - Materials and Manufacturing,University of Toronto,Toronto,2020-01-18,"THIS POSTING HAS BEEN EXTENDED. APPLICATIONS WILL BEGIN TO BE REVIEWED ON FEBRUARY 25, 2019.

The Department of Materials Science and Engineering (MSE) in the Faculty of Applied Science & Engineering invites applications for a tenure stream appointment in Materials and Manufacturing at the rank of Assistant Professor. The appointment will commence on July 1, 2019, or shortly thereafter.

The successful candidate will show leadership, innovation and excellence in research and teaching in the area of materials and manufacturing. They are expected to have extensive experience in manufacturing or materials science based research focusing on manufacturing technologies, experimental and computational facets of materials design, and metallic/non-metallic materials for new applications.

Areas of interest include, but are not limited to, digital or additive manufacturing processes, scalable micro/nano-manufacturing, bio-manufacturing, formative or hybrid printing, manufacturing data analytics and re-manufacturing, optimization and diagnostics of manufacturing processes, sustainable design of manufacturing processes.

Applicants are expected to have a PhD or equivalent in Metallurgy, Materials Science and Engineering, or a related field, by the time of appointment. Postdoctoral or industrial experience is an asset.

Successful candidates will be expected to pursue innovative and independent research at the highest international level, to initiate and lead an outstanding, competitive and externally funded research program, and to teach at both the undergraduate and graduate levels. Candidates should have demonstrated excellence in research and teaching. Excellence in research is evidenced primarily by publications or forthcoming publications in leading journals or conferences in the field, presentations at significant conferences, awards and accolades, and strong endorsements by referees of high international standing. Evidence of excellence in teaching will be demonstrated by strong communication skills, a teaching dossier submitted as part of the application, including a compelling statement of teaching philosophy highlighting areas of interest and accomplishments, sample syllabi, and teaching evaluations, as well as strong letters of recommendation.

Eligibility to register as a Professional Engineer in Ontario is strongly desirable.

Salary will be commensurate with qualifications and experience.

Review of applications will begin on February 25, 2019, and to ensure full consideration applicants should endeavor to have all materials, including reference letters, submitted by then; however, applications will be accepted until the position is filled.

You must submit your application online by clicking on the link below.

As part of your online application, please include a curriculum vitae, a summary of your previous research and future research plans, and a substantial article-length writing sample, as well as a teaching dossier including a statement of teaching experience and interests, your teaching philosophy and accomplishments, sample syllabi, and teaching evaluations. For further information about the application process, please see the submission guidelines at http://uoft.me/how-to-apply. Applicants must also arrange for three letters of reference to be sent directly by the referees (on letterhead, signed and scanned), by email to the MSE department at strumas@ecf.utoronto.ca. Applications without any reference letters will not be considered; it is your responsibility to make sure your referees send us the letters while the position remains open.

For more information about our department, please visit our home page at www.mse.utoronto.ca.

The University of Toronto is strongly committed to diversity within its community and especially welcomes applications from racialized persons / persons of colour, women, Indigenous / Aboriginal People of North America, persons with disabilities, LGBTQ persons, and others who may contribute to the further diversification of ideas.

As part of your application, you will be asked to complete a brief Diversity Survey. This survey is voluntary. Any information directly related to you is confidential and cannot be accessed by search committees or human resources staff. Results will be aggregated for institutional planning purposes. For more information, please see http://uoft.me/UP.

All qualified candidates are encouraged to apply; however, Canadians and permanent residents will be given priority.",,https://www.glassdoor.com/partner/jobListing.htm?pos=125&ao=102921&s=58&guid=000001702fec1280bb2212d1a785c202&src=GD_JOB_AD&t=SR&extid=1&exst=EL&ist=&ast=EL&vt=w&slr=true&cs=1_6b179433&cb=1581351965788&jobListingId=3067979506,3067979506,glassdoor,University of Toronto
new,Compensation Advisor,University of Toronto,Toronto,2020-02-04,"Reporting to the Senior Compensation Consultant, and Manager, USW Job Evaluation Services, and working closely with the Manager, Compensation, the incumbent is responsible for assisting in providing a broad range of analytical and administrative services relating to Compensation Programs for various employee groups and in support of the overall compensation service.

Responsibilities include providing analysis and assistance in administering the Universitys pay policies and programs including job evaluation, salary surveys, salary administration;; collecting and summarizing compensation related information; researching information, providing data collection in support of collective bargaining for various employee groups. The incumbent will also be responsible of maintaining job evaluation databases; facilitating and/or supporting rating meetings; The incumbent will support and manage a variety of Compensation initiatives, special projects and committees by conducting research, providing analytical and/or administrative guidance; participating in the development and delivery of training for HR Managers/Directors and HR Consultants on compensation matters and providing support to the annual performance assessment process.

The Compensation Advisor is an integral part of the compensation team and is expected to maintain a high standard of professionalism, striving to ensure timely, quality results for the assigned tasks while maintaining an up-to-date knowledge of relevant University policies, collective agreements and business practices.

The incumbent will also provide support to the USW JE team by responding to enquiries, troubleshooting and resolving problems related to the SES/U questionnaire, Job Evaluation Administration Portal and JDExpert; providing training and/or technical guidance to managers and HR on job evaluation applications; tracking and monitoring USW JE dispute status, coordinating data for the USW dispute resolution process including maintaining records and preparing dispute resolution files for Referees and/or Arbitrators.

Qualifications:

(MINIMUM)

Education:

University degree plus working towards the completion of a related professional designation such as CHRP or Certified Compensation Professional or an acceptable equivalent combination of education and experience.

Experience:

Minimum two (2) years of experience in a Human Resources or functional analyst position within the context of a large organization. Experience with compensation, job evaluation and salary administration. Experience with, HR policies and processes and HR software preferred.

Skills:

Computer skills including intermediate to advanced skills in spreadsheet, database and word processing software, strong knowledge of HRIS systems. Proven analytical and problem solving skills.

Other:

Excellent oral and written communication skills, presentation, facilitation and interpersonal solving skills. Ability and judgement to handle confidential information, Ability to establish and maintain positive and cooperative working relationships, especially during difficult situations such as a strike. Ability to explain technical concepts and complex regulations to a non-technical audience. Strong customer service orientation. Demonstrated initiative and ability to work both independently and within a team environment. Ability to work effectively with multiple and conflicting priorities; commitment to quality of service delivery; creativity and initiative; an awareness of and sensitivity to diversity

Travel: None

Notes:

This is a Term position ending June 30 2021.",,https://www.glassdoor.com/partner/jobListing.htm?pos=127&ao=437149&s=58&guid=000001702fec1280bb2212d1a785c202&src=GD_JOB_AD&t=SR&extid=1&exst=EL&ist=&ast=EL&vt=w&slr=true&cs=1_0039dd57&cb=1581351965790&jobListingId=3481100430,3481100430,glassdoor,University of Toronto
new,Assistant Professor - Contractually Limited Term (Professoriate) - Computer Science,University of Toronto,Toronto,2020-02-08,"The Department of Computer and Mathematical Sciences, University of Toronto Scarborough (UTSC) invites applications for a three-year contractually limited term appointment in Computer Science as the Mendelzon Visiting Assistant Professor, to begin on July 1, 2020, and will end on June 30, 2023.

Applicants must have a Ph.D. in Computer Science or a related field by the date of appointment or shortly thereafter, and must demonstrate excellence in research and teaching. We seek candidates whose research and teaching interests complement and strengthen our existing departmental strengths. The successful candidate will be expected to pursue innovative and independent research at the highest international level and to establish an outstanding, competitive, and externally funded research program.

Excellence in research will be demonstrated by publications in leading computer science journals and/or conferences, or forthcoming publications meeting high international levels, presentations at significant computer science conferences, a strong research statement submitted as part of the application, awards and accolades, and strong endorsements by referees of top international stature. Evidence of excellence in teaching will be demonstrated by teaching accomplishments, the teaching dossier submitted as part of the application including a strong teaching statement, sample course syllabi, and the teaching evaluations, as well as strong endorsements from referees. Candidates are also expected to show evidence of a commitment to equity, diversity, inclusion, and the promotion of a respectful and collegial learning and working environment demonstrated through the application materials.

The University of Toronto is an international leader in Computer Science research and education. The successful candidate for this position will be expected to contribute to the enrichment of academic programs at the Universitys Scarborough campus. More information about the Department of Computer & Mathematical Sciences can be found at https://www.utsc.utoronto.ca/cms/faculty-of-computer-science. The successful candidate will also be a member of the tri-campus Graduate Department of Computer Science at the University of Toronto. They will be expected to participate actively in the Graduate Department of Computer Science (https://web.cs.toronto.edu/)

Salary will be commensurate with qualifications and experience.

Application material for the position must be submitted online through AcademicJobsOnline, https://academicjobsonline.org/ajo/jobs/15737. It must include the candidate's cover letter, curriculum vitae, a research statement, a teaching dossier (including a teaching statement, sample syllabi, and teaching evaluations) and at least three letters of recommendation uploaded to AcademicJobsOnline directly by the writers (on letterhead, signed and scanned). If you have questions about this position, please contact Jolyn Duan, jolyn.duan@utoronto.ca in the Department of Computer and Mathematical Sciences.

Review of applications will begin after February 10, 2020; however applications will be accepted until the position is filled.

The Mendelzon Visiting Assistant Professorship is a position created in memory of Alberto Mendelzon, FRSC, distinguished computer scientist, and former chair of the Department of Computer and Mathematical Sciences, University of Toronto Scarborough.

The University of Toronto offers the opportunity to teach, conduct research, and live in one of the most diverse and vibrant metropolitan areas in the world.

The University of Toronto is strongly committed to diversity within its community and especially welcomes applications from racialized persons/persons of colour, women, indigenous/Aboriginal People of North America, persons with disabilities, LGBTQ persons, and others who may contribute to the further diversification of ideas.

All qualified candidates are encouraged to apply; however, Canadians and permanent residents will be given priority.",,https://www.glassdoor.com/partner/jobListing.htm?pos=128&ao=437149&s=58&guid=000001702fec1280bb2212d1a785c202&src=GD_JOB_AD&t=SR&extid=1&exst=EL&ist=&ast=EL&vt=w&slr=true&cs=1_8befaf4f&cb=1581351965791&jobListingId=3440324389,3440324389,glassdoor,University of Toronto
new,"Assistant Professor - Child Welfare with Indigenous Children, Families & Community",University of Toronto,Toronto,2020-02-08,"The Factor-Inwentash Faculty of Social Work, University of Toronto invites applicants for a tenure-stream position at the rank of Assistant Professor in the area of child welfare with Indigenous children, families and community. The appointment will commence July 1, 2020 or shortly thereafter.

The successful candidate will also be eligible to be named the Factor-Inwentash Chair in Child Welfare. The Chair appointment will be for a five-year term, renewable following a favourable review.

Candidates are expected to have an emerging program of research and experience especially focused in practice with Indigenous communities and organizations and may include an emphasis on disproportionality and disparity and a human rights perspective. We are seeking candidates who have experience of and engagement with Indigenous peoples, with a focus on child welfare. Long-term experience and engagement with Indigenous communities, organizations, and institutions and evidence of understanding the importance of consensus-building relationships is required.

Candidates must have a PhD in social work or a related field by the time of appointment or shortly thereafter, with a demonstrated record of excellence in research and teaching. We seek candidates whose research and teaching interests complement and strengthen our existing strengths. The successful candidate will be expected to pursue innovative and independent research at the highest international level and to establish an outstanding, competitive, and externally funded research program.

The candidate must demonstrate research excellence and an emerging research reputation, as evidenced by the demonstrated ability to attract external funding, field-relevant peer-reviewed publications or forthcoming publications meeting high international standards, conference presentations, awards and accolades, the submitted research statement, and strong endorsements by referees of high standing including a letter of support commenting on Indigenous community engagement. The candidate must demonstrate excellence in teaching, as evidenced by a teaching dossier outlining experience and accomplishments, teaching statement, sample course syllabi, and teaching evaluations, as well as strong letters of reference. Clinical/practice experience will serve as an application strength.

Salary will be commensurate with qualifications and experience.

The Factor-Inwentash Faculty of Social Work is the first faculty of social work in Canada. We rank number one in Canada and number two in the world. Over 30 full-time faculty members generate almost five million dollars in yearly grant funding that has significant local, national and global impact. Our strong commitment to social justice, diversity and inclusion is reflected in our highly selective MSW and PhD programs. Our MSW program has an admission selectivity rate of less than 30 percent. The Factor-Inwentash Faculty of Social Work pursues excellence in the investigation and development of new knowledge that will have an impact on social work practice, social policy, social work education, and civic advancement. For more information about the Factor-Inwentash Faculty of Social Work, please visit our website at http://socialwork.utoronto.ca.

The Faculty values innovation and collaboration and is involved in several collaborative interdisciplinary programs and joint degrees that include Addiction Studies; Aging, Palliative and Supportive Care Across the Life Course; Contemporary East and Southeast Asian Studies; Community Development; Ethnic and Pluralism Studies; Health Services and Policy Research; Public Health Policy; Sexual Diversity Studies; Women and Gender Studies; and Womens Health.

This position is part of the University of Torontos response to the calls to action in Canadas Truth and Reconciliation Commission (TRC) report. Preference will be given to candidates who self-identify as Indigenous. Recognizing that there are a variety of terms that potential candidates may use to self-identify, the University uses the term Indigenous in this search, which forms part of the U of T Response to Canadas Truth and Reconciliation Commission, to encompass the people of Turtle Island, including those who identify as First Nations, Mtis, Inuk (Inuit), Alaska Native, Native American, and Native Hawaiian people.

All qualified candidates are invited to apply online by clicking the link below. Applications must include a cover letter, full curriculum vitae, teaching dossier (including a statement of teaching philosophy, sample syllabi, and teaching evaluations), a brief outline of current and proposed future research interests, and two samples of published papers, working papers, or recent academic work (20 pages maximum each). Applicants must also arrange to have three letters of reference sent directly by the referee via email (on letterhead and signed), including a letter of support commenting on their Indigenous community engagement, to socialwork.admin@utoronto.ca by the closing date. If you have questions about this position, please contact socialwork.admin@utoronto.ca .

Submission guidelines can be found at http://uoft.me/how-to-apply. Review of applications will begin on October 7, 2019. The position will remain open until filled.

The University of Toronto is strongly committed to diversity within its community and especially welcomes applications from racialized persons/persons of colour, women, Indigenous/Aboriginal people of North America, persons with disabilities, LGBTQ persons, and others who may contribute to the further diversification of ideas.

As part of your application, you will be asked to complete a brief Diversity Survey. This survey is voluntary. Any information directly related to you is confidential and cannot be accessed by search committees or human resources staff. Results will be aggregated for institutional planning purposes. For more information, please see http://uoft.me/UP.

All candidates are encouraged to apply; however, Canadians and permanent residents will be given priority.",,https://www.glassdoor.com/partner/jobListing.htm?pos=129&ao=437149&s=58&guid=000001702fec1280bb2212d1a785c202&src=GD_JOB_AD&t=SR&extid=1&exst=EL&ist=&ast=EL&vt=w&slr=true&cs=1_5e9332c2&cb=1581351965792&jobListingId=3485846662,3485846662,glassdoor,University of Toronto
new,Research Analyst,University of Toronto,Toronto,2020-02-04,"About us:

The Dalla Lana School of Public Health is a Faculty of the University of Toronto that originated as one of the Schools of Hygiene begun by the Rockefeller Foundation in 1927. The School went through a dramatic renaissance after the 2003 SARS crisis and it is now the largest public health school in Canada, with more than 850 faculty, 1,000 students, and research and training partnerships with institutions throughout Toronto and the world. With $40.4 million in research funding per year, the School supports discovery in global health, tobacco impacts on health, occupational disease and disability, air pollution, inner city and Indigenous health, among many other areas.

Your opportunity:

The Population Health Analytics Lab focuses on research to inform the prevention of chronic diseases and sustainable health systems. Our analytically-driven approach draws from rich demographic, behavioural, social, clinical, and health outcomes data. We inform decision-making related to improving health system performance, reduced inequities, and fiscal sustainability. We work directly with health system stakeholders and decision-makers to translate knowledge to action and enhance the meaningfulness of our studies.

As the Research Analyst, you will be responsible for applying analytic research expertise to a number of projects using administrative health and population-based data in a secure data environment.. You will develop study designs, create study cohorts and conduct statistical analyses according to defined plans. You will interpret data, prepare tables and work collaboratively with project teams to assist in preparing reports, manuscripts and presentations. Your background in health administrative data, solid communication and organizational skills will be crucial to your success in this role.

Your responsibilities will include:

Analyzing and writing program scripts to extract, reformat and analyze data

Preparing draft statistical reports and summaries from data collected

Formatting research results to be presentable and easily comprehensible

Fostering positive relationships with project partners, advising on research project design and ensuring that research practices adhere to policies and procedures

Delivering presentations at conferences

Tracking and monitoring research activities and informing stakeholders of project progress

Maintaining project records and checking that projects adhere to ethical and privacy requirements

Qualifications:

Essential Qualifications:

Master's Degree with a background in biostatistics, epidemiology or acceptable combination of equivalent experience.

Minimum three years of relevant work experience that includes manipulating and analysing large health administrative databases or equivalent

Experience conducting statistical analysis using SAS (including SAS macros)

Experience with multiple types of statistical analysis, including: binomial, and multinomial logistic regression, Poisson regression, negative binomial regression, categorical data analysis, survival analysis, predictive modelling, imputation methods

Experience in analysing complex survey data (e.g., Canadian Community Health Survey), including incorporating bootstrap and other survey procedures

Experience with Vital Statistics databases

Experience drafting data-access paperwork for data access (e.g. Project Activation Worksheet, Privacy Impact Assessment, Dataset Creation Plan)

Experience writing and submitting manuscripts for publication in peer-reviewed journals

Experience presenting at academic conferences

Familiarity with privacy protection procedures

Experience with data management and resolving data issues

Substantive knowledge and expertise in biostatistics, chronic disease epidemiology and chronic disease prevention

High proficiency with MS Office Suite such as Word, PowerPoint, and other software packages and programming languages currently used to collect, analyze and report data

Demonstrated ability to prioritize and manage several projects simultaneously

Strong communication (written and verbal), and interpersonal skills

Excellent organizational skills, time management and problem-solving skills with the ability to meet conflicting priorities and balance multiple projects

Demonstrates initiative and possesses a strong commitment to research work.

Strong commitment to accuracy and attention to detail

To be successful in this role you will be:

Efficient

Intuitive

Organized

Problem solver

Resourceful

Team player

Travel: None

Notes: This is a 1 year term position.",Hot,https://www.glassdoor.com/partner/jobListing.htm?pos=102&ao=437149&s=58&guid=000001702fec1280bb2212d1a785c202&src=GD_JOB_AD&t=SR&extid=1&exst=EL&ist=&ast=EL&vt=w&slr=true&cs=1_8d3a2e01&cb=1581351965768&jobListingId=3481250319,3481250319,glassdoor,University of Toronto
new,Research Associate (Limited Term),University of Toronto,Toronto,2020-01-22,"Prof. Daniel M Roy, in the Department of Computer and Mathematical Sciences of the University of Toronto Scarborough, invites applicants for the position of Research Associate (Limited Term) to conduct collaborative research in mathematical statistics outlined in an awarded NFRFE-2018 New Frontier in Research proposal, titled Rebuilding the Foundations of Bayesian Statistics on Nonstandard Analysis.

The proposed research in mathematical statistics aims to characterize the set-theoretic relationships between Bayesian and frequentist notions of optimality in statistical decision theory. The approach is to use nonstandard analysis to replace countably additive (prior) probability measures with hypercountably additive probability measures. The project will also look at the connection between frequentist admissibility in location models and recurrence of Markov chains; the role of hyperfinite sets in establishing the existence of so-called matching priors to connect confidence intervals and credible regions; and the relationship with approaches based on charges.

This opportunity of a Research Associate (Limited Term) is a 2-year appointment and the anticipated start date is March 20, 2020.

Job Duties:

The candidate will be responsible for the conceptualization, execution, communication, and dissemination of mathematical research in service of the proposal described above and as directed by Prof. Daniel M. Roy. Beyond these responsibilities, the successful candidate may be expected to participate in the preparation of research presentations; grant applications; research supervisions of two or more students and other trainees; and the organization of workshop/conferences. At all times, the individual is expected to support the overall research and teaching missions of Roys group.

Qualifications:

(Minimum Qualifications)

Candidates must have a Ph.D. in Mathematics or Mathematical Statistics and at least two(2) years of postdoctoral experience, with demonstrated academic and research excellence in at least two of the following academic areas: mathematical statistics or measure theory; mathematical logic; and descriptive set theory. Excellence is to be demonstrated through publications in high-quality peer-reviewed journals in statistics, mathematics, and/or related fields. It is also essential that the candidate highlight their ability to work independently, e.g., by single-author publications; experience presenting research, as evidence through invited seminars; past experience organizing scientific/mathematical workshop/conferences/etc.; past experience supervising students in research.

Travel: Limited. The Research Associate will be expected to present research at academic conferences.

Travel: Limited

Notes:

This is a 2-year appointment, with the possibility of extension, depending on approval of supervisor based on performance and funding.

All individuals interested in this position must arrange for the following items to be submitted:

Cover letter, arguing for ones suitability for the project, in particular, by demonstrating excellence in research related in at least two of mathematical statistics or measure theory, mathematical logic, and descriptive set theory and demonstrating adequate mathematical training in order to ramp up to carrying out research at the intersection of mathematical statistics and mathematical logic.

Curriculum Vitae.

Best two (2) papers (in PDF format); applicants should provide descriptions of their role in any joint work, along with contact details for coauthors.

At least two (2) references, but no more than three (3), ideally one at arms length (i.e., not an advisor, coauthor, or member of the same institution). Letters should speak to the applicants independence in research. These letters of recommendation are to be send directly by the referees to Prof. Daniel Roy at droy@utstat.toronto.edu.

All qualified candidates are encouraged to apply; however, Canadians and permanent residents will be given priority.

The University of Toronto is strongly committed to diversity within its community and especially welcomes applications from racialized persons/persons of colour, women, Indigenous/Aboriginal People of North America, persons with disabilities, LGBTQ persons, and others who may contribute to the further diversification of ideas.

Benefits: A detailed overview of benefits for research associates may be found here.",Hot,https://www.glassdoor.com/partner/jobListing.htm?pos=104&ao=437149&s=58&guid=000001702fec1280bb2212d1a785c202&src=GD_JOB_AD&t=SR&extid=1&exst=EL&ist=&ast=EL&vt=w&slr=true&cs=1_55763c5c&cb=1581351965770&jobListingId=3470136995,3470136995,glassdoor,University of Toronto
new,Chief Administrative Officer,University of Toronto,Toronto,2020-01-30,"The Leslie Dan Faculty of Pharmacy at the University of Toronto is Canadas leading pharmacy school and has a world class reputation in both pharmacy practice and pharmaceutical sciences education and research. Named the top pharmacy school in Canada and fourth worldwide by QS World University Rankings, we offer innovative education programs and conduct cutting-edge research that is multidisciplinary and encompasses all aspects of patient care and drug therapy.

The Leslie Dan Faculty of Pharmacys main building sits at the heart of Torontos Discovery District, a nexus of government, scientific innovation, academic teaching hospitals, and entrepreneurial creativity. Our building is an iconic landmark representing the contribution of pharmacy practice and pharmaceutical sciences to the improvement of patient care.

The Chief Administrative Officer is a strategic leader and advisor who ensures that the Leslie Dan Faculty of Pharmacy is well positioned to realize its mission and vision. Reporting to the Dean, and working with the Facultys senior administrative leadership team, the Chief Administrative Officer provides leadership and strategic direction for the overall revenue generation and business administration activities, and ensures the efficient and effective strategic management of the Facultys resources.

The Chief Administrative Officer is a multidimensional role overseeing the delivery of administrative services that include Finance, Human Resources, Information & Learning Technology, Facility Operations, Capital and Renovation Project Management as well as Risk Management. The Chief Administrative Officer has full managerial authority over the administrative staff in each of these areas.

In consultation with the Dean, the Chief Administrative Officer is responsible for developing and implementing excellent standards in the core administrative systems that support faculty, staffs and students and instilling a culture of inclusiveness, social accountability, professionalism, innovation, respect and excellence.

Qualifications:

(MINIMUM)

Education:

Masters degree in Business Administration or related professional designation or an equivalent combination of education and experience in the fields of finance, administration, operations and human resources

Experience:

Minimum 8 years of professional management experience working in a complex and culturally diverse environment in Higher Education or relevant experience. Experience in the following: overseeing a significant administrative portfolio of finance, human resources, facility operation and services, space management, capital and renovation project management, health and safety, and risk management; working in a collaborative and collegial environment; managing in a unionized environment; developing and managing large budgets; in project management. Experience in environmental monitoring, equipment monitoring systems, and inventory control systems.

Skills:

Highly developed entrepreneurial skills and record of achievement in this area. Superior interpersonal and communications skills. Strong strategic and financial planning and management skills. Sophisticated understanding of administrative services (e.g. finance, human resources, facility operation, etc.). Strong project management and negotiation skills. Demonstrated commitment to equity and diversity. Ability to manage multiple conflicting priorities and unexpected emergencies. Knowledge of relevant Faculty and University Policies.

Travel: None",Hot,https://www.glassdoor.com/partner/jobListing.htm?pos=107&ao=437149&s=58&guid=000001702fec1280bb2212d1a785c202&src=GD_JOB_AD&t=SR&extid=1&exst=EL&ist=&ast=EL&vt=w&slr=true&cs=1_c6be4a4e&cb=1581351965772&jobListingId=3476502732,3476502732,glassdoor,University of Toronto
new,Digital Content Marketing Officer,University of Toronto,Toronto,2020-01-29,"About us:

The University of Toronto Scarborough is a place of energy, enthusiasm and passion. Our commitment to inclusive excellence attracts the brightest learners, scholars and employees from around the globe. Our success has been made possible by the opportunity given to us by our Indigenous hosts to operate on their territory, and we cherish our continuing partnerships with these communities. The University of Toronto Scarborough is an exciting campus with unlimited potential. Join us on our journey.

Your opportunity:

The Marketing & Communications team at The University of Toronto Scarborough is growing and we are looking for dynamic, innovative digital storytellers to join us. Our team is a highly collaborative group of Marketing Communications professionals, driven to find new and creative ways to reach our audiences. We uncover the most inspiring and impactful stories from our communities and share those moments with audiences locally, nationally and internationally. We bring the U of T story to life, every day.

We are looking for a talented Digital Content Marketing Officer to join the team. In this role you will contribute to the implementation of an integrated multi-channel digital marketing strategy for U of T Scarborough. You should have extensive experience creating compelling digital content, building engaging social campaigns, and advising on best practices and strategies to maximize digital advertising, marketing and communications initiatives. This role requires a collaborative communicator with the ability to build strong relationships with stakeholders and partners. You should have expert level understanding of social platforms and related audiences. You should also have a talent for crafting custom content and messaging appropriate for each platform and audience. We are a data-driven team so a thorough understating of analytics is critical. U of T Scarborough is rich with diverse stories and we need someone to join the team and help bring these stories to the world.

If you are interested in working with an iconic Canadian brand, are excited at the prospect of being a part of a purpose-driven organization with a social conscience, and thrive in a fast paced, team environment, this might be the perfect opportunity for you.

Innovative, convention-challenging, agile creatives are asked to apply! Whether you are from higher education, media, broadcast, start-up, non-profit, or another sector, bring your talents to our team.

Join us and help share the U of T Scarborough story.

Your responsibilities will include:

Implementing digital communication plans across a broad range of marketing/communication channels

Advising on best practices and strategies to maximize digital communication initiatives

Developing a digital media plan that supports marketing/communications strategy

Creating and maintaining presence on social media platforms and advising on best practices and strategies for content marketing

Developing and implementing content generation and marketing plans that support strategic objectives

Fostering and maintaining positive relationships with targeted social media communities

Analyzing the effectiveness of campaigns and/or programs using metrics

Qualifications:

Essential Qualifications:

Bachelor's Degree specializing in digital media, digital marketing, communications or an acceptable combination of equivalent experience

Minimum four years experience implementing integrated multi-channel digital and social marketing and communications strategies that drive strategic business objectives

Proven experience conceptualizing, developing and executing high impact, digital marketing campaigns based on departmental strategic plans

Extensive experience managing Google AdWords, the Google Display Network, LinkedIn, Instagram, YouTube, Facebook, WeChat, and social media advertising (including paid) in a complex organization.

Comprehensive understanding of Google Analytics and other ROI tracking tools

Demonstrated experience creating innovative digital marketing solutions

Proven ability to build highly engaged social communities

Demonstrated experience balancing competing priorities and multiple projects concurrently and within tight timelines

Well-informed on industry best practices and trends in digital communications

Demonstrated experience pitching original story ideas and completing all phases of the creative process including: concept development, research, interviews, writing, recording, editing, distribution, etc.

Senior level writing and editing skills

Advanced content creation skills with vast experience and expertise in video production, editing, sound and lighting

Deep knowledge of digital media platforms, digital marketing and audience segmentation principles, practices and techniques to successfully expand online audiences

Thorough understanding of SEO and its function in driving content strategy

Well-informed on digital applicable copyright, access and privacy laws

Strong working knowledge of Adobe Creative Suite

Superior communications skills both written and oral

Applicants are also expected to show evidence of a commitment to equity, diversity, inclusion, and the promotion of a respectful and collegial learning and working environment

Assets (Nonessential):

Secondary language skills an asset (ie. French, Spanish, Portuguese, Mandarin, Hindi, etc.)

To be successful in this role you will be:

Adaptable

Articulate

Efficient

Insightful

Organized

Resourceful

Travel: None

Notes:

Please include a link to your demo reel or portfolio with your application.

A full copy of the job description is available upon request from the UTSC HR Office.",Hot,https://www.glassdoor.com/partner/jobListing.htm?pos=109&ao=437149&s=58&guid=000001702fec1280bb2212d1a785c202&src=GD_JOB_AD&t=SR&extid=1&exst=EL&ist=&ast=EL&vt=w&slr=true&cs=1_ecdcc757&cb=1581351965774&jobListingId=3475492165,3475492165,glassdoor,University of Toronto
